Routine mediastinoscopy and esophageal ultrasound fine-needle aspiration in patients with non-small cell lung cancer who are clinically N2 negative: a prospective study.Despite normal mediastinal (N2) lymph nodes shown on positron emission tomography (PET) and CT, some physicians routinely perform mediastinoscopy and/or endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).A prospective trial on patients with NSCLC who were clinically staged N2 negative by both integrated PET/CT and CT scan. All underwent mediastinoscopy and EUS-FNA and if N2 negative underwent thoracotomy with thoracic lymphadenectomy.There were 153 patients (107 men). Of these, 136 patients were clinically staged N0 and 17 patients were clinically staged N1. Of the 136 patients who were staged as N0, 5 patients (3.7%) had positive EUS-FNA results (three in the subcarinal node), and 4 patients (2.9%) had positive mediastinoscopy results (all in the #4R node; one was N3). Six of the remaining 127 patients (4.7%) had N2 disease after resection. Seventeen patients were clinically staged as N1 by integrated PET/CT. Four patients (23.5%) had positive EUS-FNA results (two in the subcarinal node), 3 patients (17.6%) had positive mediastinoscopy results (all in #4R node; two were N2 and one was N3), and none of the remaining 10 patients had N2 disease after resection. Patients with unsuspected N2 disease were twice as likely (relative risk, 2.1; 95% confidence interval, 1.24 to 2.51; p = 0.02) to have a maximum standardized uptake value (maxSUV) > 10 and poorly differentiated cancer (relative risk, 2.1; 95% confidence interval, 1.14 to 2.38; p = 0.03).We do not recommend routine mediastinoscopy or EUS-FNA in patients who are clinically staged as N0 after both integrated PET/CT and CT. However, these procedures should both be considered in patients clinically staged as N1 after PET/CT, and/or in those with adenocarcinoma, upper-lobe tumors, or tumors with a maxSUV > or = 10.Dual-time point scanning of integrated FDG PET/CT for the evaluation of mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer diagnosed as operable by contrast-enhanced CT.To evaluate whether dual-time point scanning with integrated fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose ((18)F-FDG) positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET/CT) is useful for evaluation of mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer diagnosed as operable by contrast-enhanced CT.PET/CT data and pathological findings of 560 nodal stations in 129 patients with pathologically proven non-small cell lung cancer diagnosed as operable by contrast-enhanced CT were reviewed retrospectively. Standardized uptake values (SUVs) on early scans (SUVe) 1h, and on delayed scans (SUVd) 2h after FDG injection of each nodal station were measured. Retention index (RI) (%) was calculated by subtracting SUVe from SUVd and dividing by SUVe. Logistic regression analysis was performed with seven kinds of models, consisting of (1) SUVe, (2) SUVd, (3) RI, (4) SUVe and SUVd, (5) SUVe and RI, (6) SUVd and RI, and (7) SUVe, SUVd and RI. The seven derived models were compared by receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis. k-Fold cross-validation was performed with k values of 5 and 10. p<0.05 was considered statistically significant.Model (1) including the term of SUVe showed the largest area under the ROC curve among the seven models. The cut-off probability of metastasis of 3.5% with SUVe of 2.5 revealed a sensitivity of 78% and a specificity of 81% on ROC analysis, and approximately 60% and 80% on k-fold cross-validation.Single scanning of PET/CT is sufficiently useful for evaluating mediastinal and hilar nodes for metastasis.The clinical stage of non-small cell lung cancer as assessed by means of fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scanning is less accurate in cigarette smokers.The treatment of non-small cell lung cancer depends on the stage, and this is clinically best determined by using fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography. We evaluated the effect smoking has on the accuracy of this test.We performed a prospective cohort study evaluating the accuracy of clinical stage compared with pathologic stage between cigarette smokers and nonsmokers with non-small cell lung cancer. All patients were assigned a clinical TNM stage after fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scanning and then underwent meticulously pathologic TNM staging. If N2, N3, or M1 negative, patients underwent thoracotomy with complete thoracic lymphadenectomy. The clinical and pathologic stages were compared.There were 246 patients: 52 never smoked (NS group), 112 quit at least 1 month before fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography (Q group), and 82 were still smokers (S group). The 3 groups were similar for stage and histology. The overall accuracy was 83%, 80%, and 64% for the NS, Q, and S groups, respectively (P = .03). The accuracy for the T status was 88%, 84%, and 86%; accuracy for the N2 lymph nodes was 96%, 75%, and 72%; and accuracy for the N1 lymph nodes was 92%, 78%, and 80%, respectively, favoring the NS group. The greater the pack-year history, the greater the N2 inaccuracy (P = .04). Multivariate analysis showed that status of smoking (P = .026) and maxSUV value (P = .014) were independent predictors of fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography accuracy.Patients with non-small cell lung cancer who continue to smoke at the time of their fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scan have less accurate clinical staging compared with those who stopped 1 month before or who never smoked. As the pack-years increase, the accuracy for the N2 nodes decrease. Nonsmokers have the most accurate clinical staging.Non-small cell lung cancer: dual-modality PET/CT in preoperative staging.To determine the accuracy of dual-modality positron emission tomographic (PET)-computed tomographic (CT) imaging, as compared with PET alone and CT alone, in the staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Twenty-seven patients with NSCLC underwent staging with combined fluorine 18 fluorodeoxyglucose PET and CT. CT, PET, and coregistered PET/CT images were evaluated separately by two different physicians for each imaging modality, and disease stage was determined by using TNM and American Joint Committee on Cancer staging systems. Histopathologic results served as the reference standard. The statistical significance of differences among CT, PET, and PET/CT was determined by using the McNemar test.Overall tumor stage was correctly classified as 0-IV with CT in 19 patients, with PET in 20 patients, and with PET/CT in 26 patients. PET/CT findings when compared with PET findings led to a treatment change for four patients (15%) and when compared with CT findings led to a treatment change for five patients (19%). Differences in the accuracy of overall tumor staging between PET/CT and CT (P =.008) and between PET/CT and PET (P =.031) were significant. Primary tumor stage was correctly determined in more patients with PET/CT than with either PET alone or CT alone. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of regional lymph node staging, respectively, were 89%, 94%, 89%, 94%, and 93%, with PET/CT; 89%, 89%, 80%, 94%, and 89% with PET; and 70%, 59%, 50%, 77%, and 63% with CT. Fourteen distant metastases were detected in four patients with CT, four were detected in two patients with PET, and 17 were detected in four patients with PET/CT.Use of dual-modality PET/CT significantly increases the number of patients with correctly staged NSCLC and thus has a positive effect on treatment.Improved radiologic staging of lung cancer with 2-[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography and computed tomography registration.To determine if volumetric nonlinear registration or registration of thoracic computed tomography (CT) and 2-[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) datasets changes the detection of mediastinal and hilar nodal disease in patients undergoing staging for lung cancer and if it has any impact on radiologic lung cancer staging.Computer-based image registration was performed on 45 clinical thoracic helical CT and FDG-PET scans of patients with lung cancer who were staged by mediastinoscopy and/or thoracotomy. Thoracic CT, FDG-PET, and registration datasets were each interpreted by 2 readers for the presence of metastatic nodal disease and were staged independently of each other. Results were compared with surgical pathologic findings.One hundred and thirty lymph node stations in the mediastinum and hila were evaluated each on CT, PET, and registration datasets. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value, respectively, for detecting metastatic nodal disease for CT were 74%, 78%, 55%, 88%; for PET with CT side by side, 59% to 76%, 77% to 89%, 48% to 68%, and 84% to 91%; and for CT-PET registration, 71% to 76%, 89% to 96%, 70% to 86%, and 90% to 91%. Registration images were significantly more sensitive in detecting nodal disease over PET for 1 reader (P = 0.0156) and were more specific than PET (P = 0.0107 and 0.0017) in identifying the absence of mediastinal disease for both readers. Registration was significantly more accurate for staging when compared with PET for both readers (P = 0.002 and 0.035).Registration of CT and FDG-PET datasets significantly improved the specificity of detecting metastatic disease. In addition, registration improved the radiologic staging of lung cancer patients when compared with CT or FDG-PET alone.Impact of point spread function reconstruction on thoracic lymph node staging with 18F-FDG PET/CT in non-small cell lung cancer.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the impact of point spread function (PSF) reconstruction on quantitative values and diagnostic accuracy of FDG PET/CT for nodal staging in non-small cell lung cancer.Fifty-eight consecutive PET/CT examinations were reconstructed with both ordered subset expectation maximization (OSEM) and PSF algorithms. Two readers independently performed a randomized blinded review of PET/CT examinations and gave a nodal status (N0, N1, N2, or N3) to each PET data set. When discordant, a consensus was reached with a third reader. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (NPV), and positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) were assessed and compared using a McNemar test. All PET data sets were then independently analyzed to extract quantitative PET values in 208 nodes and compare them using Bland-Altman analysis.Bland-Altman analysis showed that, on average, PSF reconstruction increased SUVmax, SUVmean, and node/background ratios by 48%, 28%, and 27%, respectively. This increase was more marked for nodes less than 1 cm than for nodes 1 cm or greater (P < 0.0001 for SUVmax, SUVmean, and node/background ratios). Point spread function PET had higher sensitivity (97%) and NPV (92%) than OSEM PET (78% and 57%, respectively; P = 0.01 and P = 0.04, respectively). Negative LR was 0.04 for PSF PET and 0.31 for OSEM PET.By improving activity recovery, especially for nonenlarged nodes, PSF significantly improves the sensitivity, NPV, and negative LR of FDG-PET for nodal staging in non-small cell lung cancer. These data suggest that preoperative invasive nodal staging may be omitted in the case of a negative PSF FDG-PET/CT.Cost-effectiveness of hybrid PET/CT for staging of non-small cell lung cancer.Although the diagnostic effectiveness of integrated PET/CT for staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) has already been proven, it remains to be determined if tumor staging with combined metabolic and anatomic imaging is also cost-effective. The objective of this study was to evaluate from a payers' perspective the cost-effectiveness of staging NSCLC with CT alone (representing the mainstay diagnostic test) and with integrated PET/CT.The study is based on 172 NSCLC patients from a prospective clinical study who underwent diagnostic, contrast-enhanced helical CT and integrated PET/CT. Imaging was performed at the University Hospital Ulm between May 2002 and December 2004. To calculate treatment costs, we differentiated among cost for diagnosis, cost for nonsurgical treatment according to the clinical diagnosis, and cost for surgical procedures according to the clinical tumor stage.The diagnostic effectiveness in terms of correct TNM staging was 40% (31/77) for CT alone and 60% (46/77) for PET/CT. For the assessment of resectability (tumor stages Ia-IIIa vs. IIIb-IV), 65 of 77 patients (84%) were staged correctly by PET/CT (CT alone, 70% [54/77]). The incremental cost-effectiveness ratios per correctly staged patient were $3,508 for PET/CT versus CT alone. The incremental cost-effectiveness ratios per quality-adjusted life year gained were $79,878 for PET/CT vs. CT alone, decreasing to $69,563 assuming a reduced loss of utility (0.10 quality-adjusted life years) due to surgical morbidity.Cost-effectiveness analyses showed that costs for PET/CT are within the commonly accepted range for diagnostic tests or therapies. Therefore, reimbursement of PET/CT for NSCLC staging can be also recommended from an economic point of view.Low dose non-enhanced CT versus standard dose contrast-enhanced CT in combined PET/CT protocols for staging and therapy planning in non-small cell lung cancer.To evaluate low dose non-enhanced CT and standard dose contrast-enhanced CT in combined PET/CT protocols for staging and therapy planning of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Retrospective analysis was performed of 50 consecutive patients with proven NSCLC who had been referred for primary staging (n=41) or restaging (n=9). All patients underwent a multi-phase PET/CT consisting of a low dose non-enhanced attenuation scan and an arterial and portal-venous contrast-enhanced CT scan followed by whole-body PET. Fused datasets of non-enhanced and contrast-enhanced PET/CT were compared per patient by using the TNM staging system, and per lesion regarding localisation, characterisation and delineation of tumour lesions. The staging results were validated either by histopathology or by clinical-radiological follow-up for >or=6 months.In 47/50 patients, the results of T staging did not differ between the two PET/CT protocols. Three patients could only be correctly classified as having T4 tumours after contrast application. Regarding N staging, both protocols yielded the same results. In M staging, there was only one patient with an improvement of the results as a result of contrast application. The lesion-based analysis of 92 sites showed no difference in the accuracy of lesion localisation and only one revision of lesion characterisation by contrast-enhanced PET/CT. The assessment of tumour delineation was altered by contrast application in 58/92 sites (p<0.0001). In 10/50 patients, contrast-enhanced PET/CT detected additional clinically important findings.In patients with advanced NSCLC, contrast-enhanced CT as part of the PET/CT protocol more accurately assessed the TNM stage in 8% of patients compared with non-contrast PET/CT. However, for planning of 3D conformal radiotherapy and non-conventional surgery, contrast-enhanced PET/CT protocols are indispensable owing to their superiority in precisely defining the tumour extent.Fusion positron emission/computed tomography underestimates the presence of hilar nodal metastases in patients with resected non-small cell lung cancer.The 5-year survival for patients with resected stage II (N1) non-small cell lung cancer ranges from 40% to 55%. No data exist addressing the benefit of neoadjuvant therapy for patients with stage II disease. This is largely in part due to the lack of a reliable, minimally invasive method to assess hilar nodes. This study is aimed at determining the ability of fusion positron emission/computed tomography (PET/CT) to identify hilar metastases in patients with resected non-small cell lung cancer.A retrospective review of surgically resected patients with fusion PET/CT within 30 days of resection was performed. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for PET/CT in detecting hilar nodal metastases was calculated for a range of maximum standardized uptake values (SUVmax). Hilar nodes from patients with falsely positive PET/CT scans were analyzed for the presence of histoplasmosis. Additionally, the impact of hilar node size greater than 1 centimeter on the calculated values was assessed.There were 119 patients evaluated. The number of lymph nodes resected ranged from 1 to 12 (X=2.98). There was decreased sensitivity and increased specificity with higher SUVmax cutoff values. At the standard SUVmax value of 2.5, the sensitivity and specificity were only 48.5% and 80.2%. The addition of size of hilar node by CT led to a modest improvement in sensitivity at all SUVmax cutoff values.Fusion PET/CT lacks sensitivity and specificity in identifying hilar nodal metastasis in patients with resected non-small cell lung cancer. Further prospective studies assessing the utility of PET/CT versus alternative sampling techniques are warranted.[Value of endobronchial ultrasound-transbronchial needle aspiration biopsy for diagnosis of PET-CT positive mediastinal lymph nodes].To evaluate the clinical value of endobronchial ultrasound-transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) biopsy for diagnosis of PET-CT positive mediastinal lymph nodes.One hundred and twenty-six patients with lung cancer undergoing both PET-CT scanning and EBUS-TBNA biopsy in the First Affiliated Hospital of Guanzhou Medical College from July 2008 to August 2010 were included in this study. There were 89 male and 37 female patients with a mean age of 56.3 years (range 34 to 81 years). (18)FDG-PET was considered positive in mediastinal nodes if the PET-CT reported hypermetabolic activity consistent with malignant disease (standardized uptake value > 2.5). All of the patients were clinically followed up.Among the 126 patients, 185 stations of lymph nodes were punctured. The mean diameter of the nodes was 13.6 mm and the range was 6 - 23 mm. There were no procedural complications. The diagnostic accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of EBUS-TBNA were 95.7%, 95.7%, and 100%, respectively.EBUS-TBNA is a minimally invasive, highly effective and accurate, practical and safe procedure for diagnosis of PET-CT positive mediastinal lymph nodes.[Utility of PET/CT for mediastinal staging of non-small cell lung cancer in stage III (N2)].To evaluate the accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography with (18)F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) and computed tomography (PET/CT) in mediastinal lymph node staging in patients with potentially operable (N2) non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and to ascertain the role of invasive staging in verifying positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) results.A retrospective study of consecutive patients with pathologically-proven NSCLC and N2 staging by enhanced CT was performed. A PET/CT scan was performed for all the patients. Lymph node staging was pathologically confirmed when it was possible or by consensus in the Thoracic Cancer Committee. Sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value and positive predictive value of PET/CT in N2 cases were determined.A total of 34 patients with N2 by CT were evaluated. PET/CT showed N2 in 30 patients. Discrepancies were found in four patients, two patients were classified as N1 in PET/CT and two patients as N0. Lymph node staging was pathologically confirmed in 20 patients. No false positives were found in PET/CT study. Sensitivity was 94.7%, specificity and positive predictive values were 100% and negative predictive value was 50%.Our data show that integrated PET/CT provides high sensitivity and positive predictive value in mediastinal nodal staging of NSCLC patients. Therefore, in patients with potentially resectable lung cancer, neoadjuvant chemotherapy candidate, mediastinoscopy could be reserved for restaging after induction therapy.Pattern and predictors of false positive lymph node involvement on positron emission tomography in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.Objectives The aim of this study was to elucidate the optimal parameters for diagnosing false positive (FP) lymph nodes (LNs) in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.Methods We reviewed 292 patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) imaging was performed at 1 hour (early) post-FDG injection and repeated 2 hours (delayed) after injection. We analyzed the relationship between the pathology of LNs and the results of PET, and the percent change in the standardized uptake value (%ΔSUV) between the two time-points.Results Eighteen of 46 cases (39.1%) in the FP group showed higher SUVs for their LNs compared with those for primary tumor, whereas 13.2% in the true positive group (p = 0.032) had higher SUVs for their LNs. Thirty-four of 36 cases in the true positive group had %ΔSUV ranging from 0% to 61.5% compared with only 13 of 33 in the FP group. Twenty out of 22 cases (90.9%) where %ΔSUV was over 61.5% or under 0% were considered as FP.Conclusions Patients with higher SUVs for LNs than for primary tumors and patients with extremely high or low %ΔSUVs tended to have FP LNs.Efficacy of helical dynamic CT versus integrated PET/CT for detection of mediastinal nodal metastasis in non-small cell lung cancer.The purpose of our study was to compare the diagnostic efficacies of helical dynamic CT and integrated PET/CT for the prediction of mediastinal nodal metastasis in stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).One hundred forty-three patients with stage T1 NSCLC underwent both helical dynamic CT and integrated PET/CT followed by surgical nodal staging. In helical dynamic CT, patients were regarded to have stage N2 disease when a nodule showed a peak enhancement > or = 110 H or a net enhancement > or = 60 H. In integrated PET/CT, nodes were regarded as positive for malignancy when they showed > or = 3.5 in maximum standardized uptake value with a discrete margin and more 18F-FDG uptake than mediastinal structures. Sensitivities, specificities, and accuracies for mediastinal nodal metastasis detection were compared for helical dynamic CT and integrated PET/CT using the McNemar test.Of the 143 patients, 34 (24%) had positive mediastinal nodes. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for mediastinal nodal metastasis prediction on helical dynamic CT were 65% (22 of 34 patients), 89% (97 of 109), and 83% (119 of 143), respectively, whereas those on integrated PET/CT were 56% (19 of 34), 100% (109 of 109), and 90% (128 of 143). The p values were 0.664, < 0.001, and 0.015.In stage T1 NSCLC, contrast-enhanced helical dynamic CT better predicts, but not significantly so, mediastinal nodal metastasis than PET/CT, whereas PET/CT shows perfect specificity and higher accuracy than helical dynamic CT.Presurgical staging of non-small cell lung cancer: positron emission tomography, integrated positron emission tomography/CT, and software image fusion.To compare the diagnostic accuracy of positron emission tomography (PET) and integrated PET/CT and to evaluate the performance of software fusion for staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Thirty-six patients (17 men and 19 women) with NSCLC underwent staging with integrated PET/CT followed by mediastinal lymph node dissection and tumor resection. Twenty-five of the 36 patients (69%) underwent separate CT studies for software fusion of images. Two blinded reviewers analyzed in consensus all PET images, and an experienced radiologist was added to assess integrated and software-fused PET/CT images. Histopathologic findings served as "gold standard" for determining the diagnostic accuracy of all modalities.Reviewers examining PET and integrated PET/CT classified T stage accurately in 67% (20 of 30 patients) and 97% (29 of 30 patients), respectively (p < 0.05). Overall, interpretations based on PET staged 57% (17 of 30 patients) correctly, over-staged 6 patients (20%), and under-staged 7 patients (23%). Interpretations based on integrated PET/CT correctly staged 83% (25 of 30 patients), over-staged 3 patients (10%), and under-staged 2 patients (7%). The overall staging accuracy of integrated PET/CT was significantly higher than that of PET (p < 0.05). Automatic software fusion of separately obtained PET and CT studies was successful in 68% of the patients but failed in 32%. In successful software fusion cases, the results of software fusion with regards to T stage and N stage were not different from integrated PET/CT.Integrated PET/CT compared with PET alone was associated with 26% points-greater overall diagnostic accuracy (p = 0.01). The software fusion method failed to provide acceptable co-registration in > 30% of the patients.Diagnostic performance of (18)F-FDG PET/CT for lymph node staging in patients with operable non-small-cell lung cancer and inflammatory lung disease.As (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) is taken up by inflammatory lymph nodes, it could be falsely interpreted as metastasis. Therefore, we evaluated the diagnostic ability of positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) for lymph node staging of lung cancer when inflammatory lung disease coexisted. Patients with operable non-small-cell lung cancer and FDG-avid lymph nodes were retrospectively classified into two groups; those with inflammatory lung disease (ILD) and those without it (NILD). Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis was performed for maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax), pattern of FDG uptake, maximum Hounsfield unit, and size, and then the areas under the ROC curves (AUCs) were compared between subgroups. There were 124 patients (ILD/NILD = 38/86) and 396 FDG-avid lymph nodes (ILD/NILD = 140/256). The average number of FDG-avid lymph nodes was greater in ILD (3.7 vs. 2.9, p = 0.039), whereas the proportion of metastasis was higher in NILD (25.4% vs. 11.4%, p = 0.002). With all N1-N3 lymph nodes and the NILD group, the AUC values of all four parameters were significantly greater than 0.5 (p < 0.05), and SUVmax was the most valuable parameter for lymph node metastasis. However, in the ILD group, only the AUC value of SUVmax was significantly greater than 0.5. These results were reproduced when analyses were performed with N1-N2 lymph nodes. In conclusion, SUVmax was the most valuable PET/CT parameter for assessment of lymph node metastasis in patients with operable non-small-cell lung cancer. In addition, it was the only valuable parameter when inflammatory lung disease coexisted.[The value of extra-lung lesions on ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT in improving diagnosis of lung cancer].¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT has several shortcomings in discriminating between lung carcinoma and pulmonary benign lesions. The aims of the present study is to explore the value of extra-lung lesions on ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT image in the diagnosis of lung cancer.A total of 126 suspected lung cancer patients underwent ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT scan. Preliminary diagnoses were based on the PET characteristics, SUVmean value, and CT characteristics of the lesions in the lung, and the diagnoses were modified based on the detected extra-lung lesions. The difference between the two methods and their disparity were calculated.Extra-lung lesions were identified on the PET/CT image in 81 patients; extra-lung metastasis modified 13 probable malignancies to affirmative malignancy and 1 probable malignancy to benign lesion. Non-metastasis modified 2 probable malignancies to affirmative malignancy and 1 probable malignancy to benign lesion. Fifteen were correct, whereas 2 were misdiagnosed. The diagnoses modification rate was 13.5% (17/126), and the modified diagnoses accuracy is 88.2% (15/17).Extra-lung lesions demonstrated on ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT improved the diagnostic accuracy of lung cancer. Tuberculosis was identified as the most important reason for false positive diagnoses after modification by extra-lung lesions.Integrated positron-emission tomography for nodal staging in lung cancer.As lymph node metastasis is the most important factor determining the surgical outcome of lung cancer, we evaluated the accuracy and clinical usefulness of functional imaging with integrated positron-emission tomography and computed tomography in nodal staging of non-small-cell lung cancer. Between October 2003 and August 2004, 43 newly diagnosed patients underwent curative surgical resection or mediastinoscopic nodal biopsy after chest computed tomography as well as whole-body functional imaging for clinical staging. Based on histopathologic findings in the lymph nodes, we compared the diagnostic usefulness of computed tomography and functional imaging. Twenty-two patients were N0 stage, 6 were N1, 11 were N2, and 4 were N3. Although functional imaging seemed to be superior for evaluation of N2 nodes, there were no significant differences in the sensitivity, specificity, positive-predictive value, negative-predictive value, or accuracy. The situation was similar for N1 nodes, and there were no significant differences except for the false-negative rate. High false-positive and negative-rates for N2 lymph nodes suggest that functional imaging should not replace mediastinoscopy.Standard uptake value of positron emission tomography in clinical stage I lung cancer: clinical application and pathological correlation.The aim of this study was to assess the standard uptake value in clinical stage I non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and its correlation with pathological status and prognosis.We retrospectively reviewed 674 patients diagnosed with NSCLC between January 2002 and June 2005. Patients with clinical stage I diseases undergone a preoperative positron emission tomography-computed tomography scan followed by anatomic resection. We reviewed the clinical features of 152 patients with an average follow-up of 87 months.We analysed the clinical features of 108 patients with stage I NSCLC and 44 patients with non-stage I NSCLC. There were no statistical differences in age, histological type, location or tumour differentiation between the two groups. In the Stage I group, the patients had lower maximum standard uptake value (SUVmax; 3.80 ± 3.17 vs 5.73 ± 3.65, P = 0.001), lower carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels (2.86 ± 4.80 vs 9.11 ± 17.21 ng/ml, P = 0.027) and smaller tumour size (2.39 ± 0.98 vs 3.73 ± 2.04 cm, P < 0.001). The patients with higher SUVmax had a more advanced pathological stage, poorer tumour differentiation and larger tumour size. A higher SUVmax was an independent factor predicting an advanced pathological stage (SUVmax ≥ 3.3, odds ratio 3.246). The median survival of patients with SUVmax ≥ 3.3 and SUVmax <3.3 were 64.32 and 53.08 months, respectively (P = 0.654).Higher preoperative 18-fluorodeoxyglucose uptake by a tumour was significantly associated with an advanced pathological stage but not correlated with a poorer prognosis. An aggressive preoperative work-up for occult N2 disease should be emphasized, avoiding inappropriate thoracotomy.Integrated PET/CT in non small cell lung cancer staging--clinical and pathological agreement.Integrated PET/CT has become a fundamental tool in the preoperative assessment of non small lung cancer (NSCLC) providing useful anatomical and metabolic information to characterize tumoral lesions and to detect unsuspected metastatic disease.To compare the agreement between clinical and pathological staging before and after the use of PET/CT.Retrospective study of patients with NSCLC who underwent potentially curative surgery throughout 10.5 years. Cohen's kappa coefficient was used to evaluate staging agreement.One hundred and fifty patients were evaluated, 78% males, with a mean age of 65 (±9.6) years. Thirteen percent were submitted to neoadjuvant chemotherapy. PET/CT was performed in 41%. Global agreement between clinical and pathological staging was 51% (kappa=0.3639). There was a statistically significant difference between the staging results in patients who underwent PET/CT, when compared to the subgroup who did not (p=0.003). For those with PET/CT false negatives occurred in less 39%, false positives in more 12% and clinical and pathological staging coincided in more 27%. The overall results reflected an improvement in the agreement between clinical and pathological staging in the PET/CT subgroup (67%, kappa=0.5737 vs 40%, kappa=0.2292). PET/CT accuracy was enhanced when patients re-staged after neoadjuvant therapy were excluded and a substantial staging agreement was obtained for those who had the exam only for staging purposes (73%, kappa=0.6323).Inclusion of PET/CT in NSCLC preoperative assessment improved the accuracy of the clinical staging, with a good level of agreement with pathological staging.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography integrated with computed tomography to determine resectability of primary lung cancer.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography integrated with computed tomography (FDGPET/CT) was evaluated as a routine staging technique for primary lung cancer.We prospectively compared FDG-PET/CT in determining clinical stage and surgical indication with conventional staging not including positron emission tomography (PET). A total of 50 consecutive patients diagnosed with primary lung cancer by cytological or histological examination were studied; 20 of them underwent surgery.Discrepancies between the two staging methods were observed in 14 patients (28%). The stage assigned by PET increased in 12 cases (24%) and decreased in 2 (4%). PET staging was accurate in eight cases with otherwise undetected distant metastases (M1) but was incorrect in six cases, including five where it overdiagnosed nodal metastases (N). Two clinical N3 patients (4%) would have missed a chance of surgery if the surgical indication had been determined by PET staging alone. According to our criteria for surgery, other patients were assigned correctly to surgery by PET staging. The maximum standard uptake value (maxSUV) of all primary lesions ranged from 0 to 23.0 (mean +/- SD, 8.0 +/- 4.4). The mean maxSUV among surgical cases (5.8 +/- 3.6) was significantly smaller than among nonsurgical cases (9.5 +/- 4.2) (P < 0.05).Staging examination including FDG-PET/CT and brain magnetic resonance imaging ordinarily can determine the clinical stage and resectability of primary lung cancer. False-positive findings in regional lymph nodes, possibly reflecting past infectious disease, are the most important remaining problem.[Comparing serum tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan with PET-CT for lung cancer diagnosis].Positron emission tomography-computed tomography (PET-CT) is a new bio-imaging system which combined metabolic with anatomic imaging. This system has better three-dimensional definition and earlier tumor detection potential. This study was to compare the accuracy of tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan with PET-CT for lung cancer diagnosis and staging.A total of 43 lung cancer patients diagnosed by operation or acupuncture, received breast CT scan, tumor antigen detection, and PET-CT scan, were selected. The accuracies of these 2 methods and their impacts on lung cancer staging were compared.The accurate diagnosis rate of tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan was 67.44%, and that of PET-CT scan was 90.70%. Local focus detection rates were 86.05% and 95.35%, respectively; mediastinal lymph nodes detection rates were 65.12% and 83.72%, respectively. PET-CT detected 6 cases of distant metastasis which were not detected by tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan. Compared with CT scan, 5 (11.63%) cases were upstaged and 7 (16.28%) cases were downstaged by PET-CT, which led to therapeutic strategy changes in 4 (9.3%) cases.Compare with tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan, PET-CT scan is more sensitive and accurate in diagnosing and staging lung cancer.Mediastinal lymph node staging by means of positron emission tomography is less sensitive in elderly patients with non-small-cell lung cancer.We sought to identify the impact of age on the sensitivity and specificity of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET-CT; CT) on mediastinal lymph node staging of patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC).We conducted a retrospective review of 206 consecutive patients with histologically proven NSCLC who underwent resection and/or mediastinoscopy in our center between September 2004 and January 2007. All of these patients had preoperative staging with integrated PET-CT as an adjunct to chest CT before resection and/or mediastinoscopy. Diabetic patients and patients who received neoadjuvant chemotherapy were excluded. The pathologic results of all of these cases were reviewed and correlated with those on CT and integrated PET-CT.The sensitivity and positive predictive values (PPV) of PET-CT in mediastinal nodal staging were significantly lower in elderly patients (age>or=65 years; sensitivity, 42%; PPV, 66%) than in younger patients (age<65 years; sensitivity, 52%; PPV, 74%). Specificity and negative predictive values were similar in both groups.PET-CT staging of the mediastinum is less sensitive in elderly patients with NSCLC who have a lower PPV. Positive mediastinal uptake on PET-CT should be verified by mediastinoscopy, irrespective of age. Elderly patients with positive mediastinal uptake should not be refuted a curative intent surgical resection on the basis of positive mediastinal uptake alone.[The advantage of Positron Emission Tomography combined with Computer Tomography (PET-CT) in the diagnosis of lung cancer (experience with 408 patients)].The authors analyzed the results of PET-CT scans made with oncological indications among 408 patients. One hundred and fifty-four PET-CTs were done to characterize pulmonary foci, after which in 59 cases lung surgery was performed. The method's sensitivity in respect to malignancy was 100%, specificity was 56%. Staging of affected lymph nodes resulted in 17 mediastinoscopies and 54 thoracotomies. In the former indications PET-CT-positive lymph nodes always need cytologic/histologic verification. M-staging done with PET-CT was performed in 141 cases, mediastinal restaging of patients having received neoadjuvant chemotherapy was done in 24 cases. The latter indications we consider superfluous because of the diagnostic inaccuracy of PET-CT. In 175 cases we analyzed the frequently determining factor of the PET-CT scan in the indication of lung surgery. The authors wish to share their experience for the better use of this method and to accelerate the inclusion of PET-CT into the diagnostic protocol.Standard PET/CT of the chest during shallow breathing is inadequate for comprehensive staging of lung cancer.The incidence of malignancy associated with subcentimeter pulmonary nodules (micronodules) in patients with malignant disease has been reported to be as high as 58%. Thus, detection of small lung nodules is important for appropriate staging of lung cancer. Because of respiratory motion, small parenchymal lung lesions can be missed on CT acquired during shallow breathing. Micronodules are usually too small to be characterized reliably with 18F-FDG PET. We aimed to determine the incidence of missed pulmonary micronodules on PET/CT studies acquired during shallow breathing.The study included 142 consecutive cancer patients (62 male and 80 female; mean age, 54 y) who underwent whole-body PET/CT during shallow breathing and breath-hold CT of the chest during maximal inspiration. CT findings were reviewed independently, and noncalcified nodules missed on the shallow-breathing scan were evaluated for size, location, and metabolic activity.Breath-hold chest CT detected an additional 125 parenchymal lung nodules (mean size, 3.4 +/- 1.6 mm; range, 1-9 mm) in 48 (34%) of the 142 patients. In these patients, 3 nodules, on average, were missed during shallow breathing. In 18 patients (13%), micronodules were identified exclusively on breath-hold images. None of the missed nodules demonstrated 18F-FDG uptake.Acquisition of standard PET/CT chest images during shallow breathing is inadequate for comprehensive cancer staging.[Application of ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT in pulmonary disease: a report of 419 cases].The application and the value of PET/CT in lung cancer are on the way to development. The aim of this study is to summarize the data from 419 patients with pulmonary tumor or tumor-like disease and to explore the appliance of PET/CT.From Dec 2007 to Aug 2011, 594 patients with pulmonary tumor or tumor-like disease underwent PET/CT examination during the different course of treatment, which were treated by single surgery team from Peking University Cancer Hospital. Of these patients, 419 cases diagnosed pathologically were included into study. The clinicapathological and follow-up data were collected to analyze the value of PET/CT in diagnosis, TNM staging, therapy response evaluation and posttherapy monitoring.Four hundred and nineteen cases comprised of 63 benign and 356 malignant, of which, 338 were primary lung cancer, and 18 were metastases. The SUVmax cutoff was defined as 2.5 to differentiate the benign and malignant disease. PET/CT obtained the role of diagnosis with sensitivity as 85.0%, specificity as 52.4%, accuracy rate as 79.2%, positive predictive value as 89.2% and negative predictive value as 42.9%, respectively. Of 338 primary cases, 275 underwent PET/CT at initial diagnosis, in which, 46 (16.7%) distant metastasis were found, including 8 additional metastasis not found by conventional utilities. Six of 43 recurrences were found by PET/CT following conventional examination. In T staging, SUVmax is positively correlated with diameter of tumors (P<0.05). In N staging, 610 stations of lymph nodes were resected from 168 cases, with 37 stations predicted as positive by PET/CT and 102 stations pathologically proven positive, therefore, calculating the sensitivity as 36.3%, specificity as 93.9%, accuracy rate as 84.3%, positive predictive value as 54.4% and negative predictive value as 88.0%, respectively. Ten patients underwent PET/CT scan for chemotherapy response evaluation, with SUVmax changing following T downstaging.PET/CT is one optional method for diagnosis of pulmonary tumors. In TNM staging, PET/CT showed the superiority than conventional utilities in M staging, but possesses the high specificity but inferior sensitivity in N staging. Therefore, PET/CT should be used as routine examination for postoperation follow-up. Furthermore, PET/CT performed the outstanding role in chemotherapy response evaluation.Diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging can be used in place of positron emission tomography for N staging of non-small cell lung cancer with fewer false-positive results.One of the deficiencies of positron emission tomography for N staging in lung cancer is a false-positive result caused by concurrent lymphadenitis. Recently, diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging has been reported to be able to image tumors of body organs. The aim of this study is to examine the usefulness of diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging for N staging of non-small cell lung cancer compared with positron emission tomography-computed tomography.Both positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging were prospectively used in 88 patients before surgical intervention for non-small cell lung cancer to examine 734 lymph node stations. The diagnostic results of positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging were compared. The diameters of the metastatic foci within lymph nodes were measured on hematoxylin and eosin-stained sections to compare the detectable size of metastatic foci between positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging.The accuracy of N staging in the 88 patients was 0.89 with diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging, which was significantly higher than the value of 0.78 obtained with positron emission tomography-computed tomography (P = .012), because of less overstaging in the former. Among the 734 lymph node stations examined pathologically, 36 had metastases, and the other 698 did not. Although there was no significant difference in the diagnosis of the 36 metastatic lymph node stations between the 2 methods, diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging was more accurate for diagnosing the 698 nonmetastatic stations than positron emission tomography-computed tomography because of fewer false-positive results (P = .002). The detectable size of metastatic foci within lymph nodes was 4 mm in both positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging.Diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging can be used in place of positron emission tomography-computed tomography for N staging of non-small cell lung cancer with fewer false-positive results compared with positron emission tomography-computed tomography.Outcomes of mediastinoscopy and surgery with or without neoadjuvant therapy in patients with non-small cell lung cancer who are N2 negative on positron emission tomography and computed tomography.The objectives of this study were (1) to assess the results of mediastinoscopy and mediastinal lymphadenectomy and (2) to compare outcomes of surgical treatment with or without neoadjuvant therapy in patients with non-small cell lung cancer who are N2 negative on integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET/CT).This was a retrospective, single-institution review of patients with non-small cell lung cancer who were N2 negative on CT and PET/CT. All patients underwent mediastinoscopy; if N2 positive, patients underwent neoadjuvant therapy followed by pulmonary resection, and if N2 negative, patients underwent pulmonary resection with mediastinal lymphadenectomy.Between 2003 and 2007, there were 750 patients (547 men). Of these, 51 patients were N2 positive at mediastinoscopy and then underwent neoadjuvant therapy (mediastinoscopy N2 group), and 699 were N2 negative at mediastinoscopy and then underwent mediastinal lymphadenectomy. Mediastinal lymphadenectomy revealed that 635 had N0 or N1 disease (N2-negative group), and 64 had N2 disease (surgery N2 group). Overall 5-year survival was 73% for the N2-negative group, 44% for the surgery N2 group, and 47% for the mediastinoscopy N2 group. Disease-free 5-year survival was 59% for the N2-negative group, 27% for the surgery N2 group, and 29% for the mediastinoscopy N2 group.We found that there were no significant differences in overall and disease-free survivals between the surgery N2 group and the mediastinoscopy N2 group. The benefit of neoadjuvant therapy in patients with PET/CT-negative but mediastinoscopy-positive N2 disease should be confirmed by randomized studies.Evaluation of pulmonary nodules and lung cancer with one-inch crystal gamma coincidence positron emission tomography/CT versus dedicated positron emission tomography/CT.Dedicated positron emission tomography (PET)/CT scanners using BGO and related detectors (d-PET) have become standard imaging instruments in many malignancies. Hybrid gamma camera systems using NaI detectors in coincidence mode (g-PET) have been compared to d-PET but reported usefulness has been variable when gamma cameras with half-inch to three-fourth-inch thick crystals have been used without CT. Our aim was to compare g-PET with a 1-in.-thick crystal and inbuilt CT for lesion localization and attenuation correction (g-PET/CT) and d-PET/CT in patients presenting with potential and confirmed lung malignancies. One hour after (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG), patients underwent BGO d-PET/CT from jaw to proximal thigh. This was followed by one to two bed position g-PET/CT 194 +/- 27 min after FDG. Each study pair was independently analysed with concurrent CT. d-PET/CT was interpreted by a radiologist experienced in both PET and CT, and g-PET/CT by consensus reading of an experienced PET physician and an experienced CT radiologist. A TNM score was assigned and studies were then unblinded and compared. Fifty-seven patients underwent 58 scan pairs over 2 years. Eighty-nine per cent concordance was shown between g-PET/CT and d-PET/CT for the assessment of intrapulmonary lesions, with 100% concordance for intrapulmonary lesions >10 mm (36 of 36). Eighty-eight per cent (51 of 58) concordance was shown between g-PET/CT and d-PET/CT for TNM staging. Coincidence imaging using an optimized dual-head 1-in.-thick crystal gamma camera with inbuilt CT compares reasonably well with dedicated PET/CT for evaluation of indeterminate pulmonary lesions and staging of pulmonary malignancies and may be of some value when d-PET/CT is not readily available.Diffusion-weighted MR imaging in comparison to integrated [¹⁸F]-FDG PET/CT for N-staging in patients with lung cancer.The purpose of this study was to prospectively determine the diagnostic accuracy of diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) using MRI in the staging of thoracic lymph nodes in patients with lung cancer, and to compare the performance to that of PET/CT.20 consecutive patients (pts) with histologically proven lung cancer were included in this study. In all pts FDG-PET/CT was routinely performed to stage lung carcinoma. Additionally, MRI (1.5T) was performed including native T1w, T1w post contrast medium, T2w, and DWI sequences. Regarding the N stage based on the results of the PET/CT there were 5 patients with N0, 3 patients with N1, 5 patients with N2 and 7 patients with N3. Image analysis was performed by two radiologists (R1 and R2), respectively. The reviewers had to chose between 1 (at least one lymph node within a station is malignant) or 0 (no lymph nodes suspicious for malignancy). First the T1 post contrast sequence was analyzed. In a second step the DWI sequence (b=800) was analyzed. Both steps were performed in a blinded fashion.MR imaging with or without DWI only agreed with the results of the PET/CT regarding the N stage in 80% of the patients-15% were understaged and 5% overstaged. There was excellent interobserver agreement; the N-staging result only differed in 1 patient for DWI, resulting in correlation coefficients of 0.98 for DWI and 1.0 for MRI. Compared to PET-CT MRI overstaged one and understaged 4 patients, while DWI overstaged one and understaged 3 patients. This resulted in correlation coefficients of 0.814 (R1 and R2) for MRI and 0.815 (R1) and 0.804 (R2) for DWI. Regarding the ADC values there were no significant differences between ipsilateral hilar (1.03 mm(2)/s ± 0.13), subcarinal (0.96 mm(2)/s±0.24), ipsilateral mediastinal (1.0mm(2)/s ± 0.18), contralateral mediastinal (0.93 mm(2)/s ± 0.23) and supraclavicular (0.9 mm(2)/s ± 0.23) lymph nodes.Diffusion-weighted imaging does not show a clear advantage over conventional MR protocols in the N-staging of lung cancer. MRI with or without DWI shows a moderately correlation with PET/CT with a tendency for understaging.Mediastinoscopy might not be necessary in patients with non-small cell lung cancer with mediastinal lymph nodes having a maximum standardized uptake value of less than 5.3.Accurate pretreatment staging in non-small cell lung cancer remains tantamount in formulating an appropriate treatment plan. The maximum standardized uptake value obtained with integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography has been proposed to be a predictor of malignancy in mediastinal lymph nodes. A recent study has also suggested that accuracy of integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography might be improved by increasing the maximum standardized uptake value used for calling a lymph node positive from 2.5 to 5.3. We tested the hypotheses that the maximum standardized uptake value is a predictor of individual lymph node metastasis in non-small cell lung cancer and that pathologic staging with mediastinoscopy might not be necessary in patients with a maximum standardized uptake value of less than 5.3 in their mediastinal lymph nodes.This is a retrospective review of 765 lymph nodes sampled from 110 patients in a single institution with biopsy-proved non-small cell lung cancer. All patients underwent integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography before biopsy or resection of their mediastinal lymph nodes. Surgical staging was the reference standard. All N2 lymph nodes were individually assessed according to station. Data were analyzed by using the Pearson chi(2) test.Twenty-one (19%) of 110 patients had N2 disease, and a total of 765 N2 lymph nodes were pathologically examined. The mean and median maximum standardized uptake values for N2 nodes with metastatic disease were 9.2 (95% confidence interval, 7.0-11.4) and 7.2 (range, 2.2-25.8), respectively. For benign N2 nodes, the mean and median maximum standardized uptake values were 1.5 (95% confidence interval, 1.4-1.6) and 1.0 (range, 1.0-9.6), respectively (P < .05). When integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scans were reinterpreted by using a maximum standardized uptake value of 5.3 as a cutoff for malignancy, sensitivity decreased from 93% to 81% (P = .15), specificity increased from 86% to 98% (P < .01), positive predictive value increased from 22% to 64% (P < .01), negative predictive value was unchanged at 99%, and overall accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography increased from 87% to 97% (P < .01).The maximum standardized uptake value is a predictor of individual lymph node metastasis in non-small cell lung cancer. Accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography is significantly improved by using a maximum standardized uptake value of 5.3 to assign malignancy, thereby dramatically decreasing the number of false-positive results. More importantly, these results suggest that some patients with non-small cell lung cancer with a maximum standardized uptake value less than 5.3 in their N2 lymph nodes might be able to forego mediastinoscopy and proceed directly to thoracotomy. This represents a significant change in the current management of standardized uptake value-positive mediastinal lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer.Is mediastinoscopy still the gold standard to evaluate mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with non-small cell lung carcinoma?In this study, we aimed to define the efficacy of F-18 FDG PET/CT for the detection of mediastinal lymph node metastases by comparing the mediastinal findings of F-18 FDG PET/CT with the histopathological results obtained either by mediastinoscopy or thoracotomy in patients with clinically operable non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).This is a prospective, single-institution study of 68 consecutive patients with suspected or pathologically proven, localized, clinically resectable NSCLC (8 females and 60 males; mean age: 60.36 ± 1.01 years, range: 43-78 years). The patients underwent integrated PET/CT scanning at the same PET center. Standard cervical mediastinoscopy and extended mediastinoscopy were performed to sample the lymph nodes. During thoracotomy, complete mediastinal lymph node dissection was routinely performed.Mediastinoscopy gave true positive results in 9 patients and true negative results in 57 patients. There were two false negative results. Mediastinoscopy had a sensitivity of 81.8% (95% CI: 63-82), a specificity of 100% (95% CI: 96-100), a PPV of 100% (95% CI: 77-100), a NPV of 96.6% (95% CI: 93-96), and an accuracy of 97% for the detection of mediastinal lymph node metastases. When PET/CT results were compared with postoperative pathological examination results, PET/CT correctly identified 48 out of 50 patients (96%) who did not have metastatic lymph node involvement. N2/N3 disease was correctly determined by PET/CT in 8 of 11 patients (72.7%) who had positive results on histological analysis. When only N2 and N3 nodal diseases were included in the calculation with the aim of making a comparison with mediastinoscopy (for mediastinal nodes), integrated PET/CT had a sensitivity of 72.7% (95% CI: 51-80), a specificity of 97.7% (95% CI: 92-99), a PPV of 88.9% (95% CI: 62-97), a NPV of 93.3% (95% CI: 88-95) and an accuracy of 92.6% (95% 83-95) for the detection of intrathoracic N2 and N3 nodal metastases.Our data shows that due to its high sensitivity and accuracy, mediastinoscopy is still the most reliable method to evaluate mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with NSCLC.Lymph node staging by means of positron emission tomography is less accurate in non-small cell lung cancer patients with enlarged lymph nodes: analysis of 1,145 lymph nodes.Despite documented superiority of integrated positron emission tomography-computerized tomography (PET-CT) over computerized tomography (CT) in lymph node staging in non-small cell lung cancer, little is known about the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of integrated PET-CT among enlarged lymph nodes. We sought to assess if PET-CT is uniformly accurate among enlarged and non-enlarged lymph nodes.A retrospective review of 206 consecutive patients with histologically proven non-small cell lung cancer who underwent resection and/or mediastinoscopy in our centre over 30 months period was carried out. All these patients had pre-operative staging with integrated PET-CT as an adjunct to chest CT prior to resection and/or mediastinoscopy. Diabetic patients (BM>or=8.0 mmol/l) and those who received neo-adjuvant chemotherapy were excluded. The pathological results of all these cases were reviewed and correlated with those on CT and integrated PET-CT.The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive and negative predictive values were higher in integrated PET-CT than CT alone in all lymph nodes, whether N1 or N2. When lymph nodes were stratified by size, the sensitivity of PET-CT was significantly higher among enlarged (>1cm) than non-enlarged (<or=1cm) lymph nodes (74% vs. 40%, P<0.0001), but with a significantly lower specificity (81% vs. 98%, P<0.0001) and a lower accuracy (78% vs. 90%, P 0.008).Integrated PET-CT remains superior to CT in nodal staging of non-small cell lung cancer. However, in the presence of enlarged lymph nodes, PET-CT becomes less specific, less accurate but more sensitive in detecting metastatic spread to the lymph nodes. Interpretation of PET-CT findings in NSCLC patients with enlarged lymph nodes (>1cm) should be with caution as the specificity of PET-CT is lower and its ability to detect truly negative nodes become reduced. NSCLC patients with enlarged nodes by CT criteria who are PET-CT negative may require cervical mediastinoscopy to rule out metastatic spread to these nodes. Prospective studies are warranted.Role of preoperative PET-CT in assessing mediastinal and hilar lymph node status in early stage lung cancer.Positron emission tomography combined with computed tomography (PET-CT) is important in the assessment and workup of lung cancer staging. However, inconsistencies between clinical image results obtained and pathologic findings of surgical specimens are still very common, particularly in patients with clinical early stage lung cancer. We sought to clarify the role of PET-CT in predicting mediastinal lymph node status preoperatively in clinical early stage lung cancer patients.The cases were collected retrospectively from January 2008 to February 2009. All patients were good surgical candidates, and clinically early-stage during the pre-op evaluation, which included CT, PET scan, and cardiopulmonary tests. All patients underwent surgery, with complete pathological evaluation of mediastinal lymph node (LNs). The pathological status and PET Standardized uptake value (SUV)(max) of mediastinal LNs were collected to calculate the ROC curve, and to determine the best cut-off value of PET SUV(max). Other cofactors, including sex, tumor size, tumor SUV(max), histology type, and lobar distribution, were analyzed utilizing correlation study, Chi-square test, and t-test for significance.A total of 83 patients were enrolled into the study. The majority of the cases were in pathological early stage (Stage I: 67.5%, Stage II: 12%). The cut-off point of mediastinal LN SUV(max) was 1.6 calculated by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve (sensitivity: 40%, specificity: 88.7%, negative predictive rate: 95.1%). The hilar LN SUV(max) was found to have a poor correlation to the final pathologic status of hilar nodes with insignificant p value (0.487). Tumor SUV(max) and increased hilar LN uptake (SUV(max) > 2.0) were found to be significantly correlated with the pathologic status of mediastinal LNs. The false positive rates by PET-CT scan in N1 and N2 nodes were 70% and 78%, respectively, primarily due to inflammatory process (as anthracosis the leading cause).Integrated PET-CT is a useful tool for predicting the negativity of mediastinal LN status pre-operatively in clinically early stage (Stages I and II) lung cancer but may be relatively inaccurate in predicting hilar LN status and largely confounded by false positives caused by inflammatory process.Efficacy of convex probe endobronchial ultrasound (CP-EBUS) assisted transbronchial needle aspiration for mediastinal staging in non-small cell lung cancer cases with mediastinal lymphadenopathy.Endobronchial ultrasound-guided transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) is a sampling method for the patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) that have enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes that are detected with computed tomography (CT). We aimed to investigate the value of EBUS-TBNA in sampling enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes in the patient with NSCLC.From January 2007 to May 2009, patients were diagnosed NSCLC with CT scans showing enlarged lymph nodes (node >1 cm) or a positron emission tomography (PET/CT) finding of the mediastinum underwent EBUS-TBNA.EBUS-TBNA was successfully performed in all 52 patients (mean age, 52 years; 45 men) from 93 mediastinal lymph nodes. EBUS detected lymph node metastasis in 40 patients (77%). 12 patients (23%) with negative lymph node samples were underwent mediastinoscopy. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of EBUS-TBNA in the detection of mediastinal metastasis were 95 %, 100%, 100%, 83%, and 96%, respectively. EBUS-TBNA was uneventful, and there were no complications.EBUS-TBNA is an effective, safe and minimally invasive procedure following PET/CT or CT scanning in the mediastinal staging of potentially operable NSCLC.Prediction of lymph node metastases in NSCLC. Three dimensional anatomical parameters do not substitute FDG-PET-CT.To distinguish between benign and malignant mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with NSCLC by comparing 2D and semi-automated 3D measurements in FDG-PET-CT.FDG-PET-CT was performed in 46 patients prior to therapy. 299 mediastinal lymph-nodes were evaluated independently by two radiologists, both manually and by semi-automatic segmentation software. Longest-axial-diameter (LAD), shortest-axial-diameter (SAD), maximal-3D-diameter, elongation and volume were obtained. FDG-PET-CT and clinical/FDG-PET-CT follow up examinations and/or histology served as the reference standard. Statistical analysis encompassed intra-class-correlation-coefficients and receiver-operator-characteristics-curves (ROC).The standard of reference revealed involvement in 87 (29%) of 299 lymph nodes. Manually and semi-automatically measured 2D parameters (LAD and SAD) showed a good correlation with mean intraclass coefficients of .80 and .72, respectively. Semi-automated prediction revealed the highest areas-under-the-ROC-curve for volume (.75, 95%CI: .69-81) and SAD (.75, 95%CI: .70-.81). AUC for LAD and maximal-3D diameter were about .68. Substantially lower accuracies were found for elongation (.57, 95%CI: .50-.64).Optimized semi-automated three dimensional parameters by CT cannot approximate reported data on FDG-PET-CT for lymph node assessment in NSCLC. SAD remains the most accurate and at the same time simple to achieve anatomical criterion for definition of NSCLC target lesions.The accuracy of integrated PET-CT compared with dedicated PET alone for the staging of patients with nonsmall cell lung cancer.The treatment of patients with nonsmall cell lung cancer (NSCLC) is determined by the stage. We evaluated the accuracy of staging using integrated positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) and compared it with dedicated PET visually correlated with CT scan.A prospective blinded trial was performed on a consecutive series of patients with NSCLC. Patients underwent integrated PET-CT scanning with 2-[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG-18). A radiologist assigned the T, N and M status. No sooner than 2 weeks the same radiologist read the dedicated PET alone, without the integrated CT images and a T, N and M status was assigned again. The most recent CT scan was available and visually correlated with both studies. All patients underwent biopsies of suspicious N2 or N3 lymph node or distant metastases and if negative, pulmonary resection with lymphadenectomy was performed.There were 129 patients. Integrated PET-CT is a better predictor than PET for all stages of cancer and achieved statistical significance for stage I (52% versus 33%, p = 0.03) and for stage II (70% versus 36%, p = 0.04). It also is a better overall predictor for T status (70% versus 47%, p = 0.001) and the N status (78% versus 56%, p = 0.008). Nodal analysis shows that integrated PET-CT was more accurate for the total N2 nodes (96% versus 93%, p = 0.01) and for the total N1 nodes (90% versus 80%, p = 0.001). It was also more sensitive, specific, and had a higher positive predictive value for both N2 and N1 nodes (p < 0.05 for all). Integrated PET-CT is significantly more sensitive at the 4R, 5, 7, 10 L and 11 stations and more accurate at the 7 and 11 lymph nodes stations than dedicated PET.Integrated PET-CT using FDG-18 better predicts stage I and II disease as well as the T and N status of patients with NSCLC when compared with dedicated PET alone. It is more accurate at some nodal stations but still only achieves an accuracy of 96% and 90% for the N2 and N1 nodes, respectively.Detection of nodal metastatic disease in patients with non-small cell lung cancer: comparison of positron emission tomography (PET), contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT), and combined PET-CT.Of 31 patients with lung cancer, 19 underwent PET-CT and 12 had CT followed by PET. Thoracic lymph nodes were sampled by mediastinoscopy or thoracotomy. Sensitivities, specificities, positive (PPV), and negative predictive values (NPV) were calculated based on histopathology. Ninety nodes (41 malignant) were identified. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV were 94%, 73%, 66%, and 96% for PET-CT, respectively. In 12 patients who underwent PET and CT separately, these values were 90%, 31%, 64%, and 71% for PET and 81%, 50%, 69%, and 66% for CT, respectively.Accuracy of helical computed tomography and [18F] fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography for identifying lymph node mediastinal metastases in potentially resectable non-small-cell lung cancer.Computed tomography (CT) and [18F] Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) are considered suitable methods for the noninvasive staging of the mediastinum. Our study was intended to estimate the efficacy of contrast-enhanced helical CT (hCT) and FDG-PET, alone and combined, in the diagnosis of lymph node mediastinal metastases.This study was a prospective and blind comparison of the efficacy of hCT and FDG-PET with two alternative reference standards, mediastinoscopy, and mediastinoscopy plus thoracotomy plus a 6-month follow-up to diagnose lymph node mediastinal metastases in 132 consecutive patients with potentially resectable non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC). The metastatic disease was assessed histopathologically. Further clinical information was obtained postoperatively after a median follow-up of 42 months.The prevalence of cN2,3 is 0.28. For hCT the sensitivity and specificity are 0.86 (95% CI, 0.70 to 0.93) and 0.67 (95% CI, 0.56 to 0.75), for PET 0.94 (95% CI, 0.81 to 0.98) and 0.59 (95% CI, 0.49 to 0.68), and for hCT and PET combined in-parallel 0.97 (95% CI, 0.84 to 0.99) and 0.44 (95% CI, 0.34 to 0.53), which translate into a negative predicted probability of 0.98 (95% CI, 0.88 to 1.00). The crude diagnostic odds ratio of PET in the total sample studied is 13.1, in the subgroup hCT+ 11.04 (3.0 to 40 0.1), and in the hCT- 3.5 (0.5 to 21.5). Similar results were obtained for hCT stratified by PET.hCT and PET perform similarly in the mediastinal staging of NSCLC, both tests are conditionally dependent and provide complementary information, and their diagnostic value mainly resides on the negative results.[Value of (18)F-FDG PET-CT in the preoperative N staging of non-small cell lung cancer].To evaluate the diagnostic value of PET-CT with (18)F-FDG in preoperative N staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), especially the additional value of CT attenuation and the dual-time-point imaging in determining the lymph nodes status.Forty-three NSCLC patients underwent curative surgical resection after integrated (18)F-FDG PET-CT examination. The initial scan images were analyzed by two methods. In the first method, the nodal status was determined by (18)F-FDG uptake only (method PET). In the second method, the nodal status was determined by uptake associated with CT attenuation (method PET and CT attenuation). Nodal uptake was interpreted visually and semi quantitatively. For dual-time-point imaging, a retention index (RI) > 10% was regarded as increasing trend. Histopathologic results served as the reference standard.On the per-nodal-station (group) basis, the diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, PPV, and NPV were 88.0%, 88.4%, 88.3%, 59.5% and 97.4%, respectively, by the method 1; 84.0%, 94.6%, 92.9%, 75.0% and 96.8%, respectively, by the method 2. The specificity and accuracy between these two methods had statistically significant difference (P < 0.05). Twenty-eight nodal groups underwent dual-time-point imaging and the differences of DeltaSUV(max) and RI between benign and malignant groups had no statistically significant difference (P > 0.05). Eleven groups were malignant in 23 lymph nodal groups which had an increasing trend. Among the 5 nodal groups which did not show increase in delayed scan, one group was malignant.(18)F-FDG PET-CT has high diagnostic value in the preoperative N staging of NSCLC, and combining uptake with CT attenuation of lymph nodes can improve the specificity and accuracy. For the lymph nodes with high uptake in the initial scan, increasing uptake in delayed scan has little effect in differential diagnosis, but no increasing in delayed phase is more prone to benign diagnosis.[Significance of dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET imaging in evaluation of hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis in non-small-cell lung cancer].To explore the diagnostic value of dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging in detecting hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis in non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Forty-six patients with NSCLC underwent standard whole body single-time 18F-FDG PET-CT scans and a delayed imaging for the thorax alone before surgery, meanwhile, the standard uptake value (SUV) and retention index (RI) were calculated.A total number of 584 lymph nodes were excised in the 46 patients. Of these, 134 metastatic lymph nodes were pathologically confirmed in 31 patients. There were 189 lymph nodes detected and suspected to be metastatic by standard single-time 18 F-FDG PET-CT imaging, and 161 by dual-time-point imaging. Therefore, the sensitivity, specificity, diagnostic accuracy, positive predictive value and negative predictive value in the detection of hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis were 87.3%, 84.0%, 84.8%, 61.9% and 95.7% by standard single-time 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging, versus 94.8%, 92.2%, 92.8%, 78.9% and 98.1%, respectively, by dual-time-point imaging. There was a statistically significant difference in the detection of lymph node metastasis between the standard single-time imaging and dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging.Dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging is more sensitive, specific and accurate than standard single-time 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging in the detection of hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis, and may provide more information for diagnosis, staging and treatment of non-small cell lung cancer.Non-small cell lung cancer: prospective comparison of integrated FDG PET/CT and CT alone for preoperative staging.To evaluate prospectively the accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) with use of fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG), compared with that of stand-alone CT, for the preoperative staging of non-small cell lung cancer, with surgical and histologic findings used as the reference standard.Institutional review board approval and patient informed consent were obtained. From November 2003 to February 2004, 106 patients (78 men, 28 women; mean age, 56 years) with non-small cell lung cancer underwent curative surgical resection (tumor resection and lymph node dissection) after stand-alone CT followed by integrated FDG PET/CT. Tumor stages were determined by using the TNM and American Joint Committee on Cancer staging systems. Histopathologic results served as the reference standard. Statistically significant differences in tumor staging between integrated PET/CT and stand-alone CT were determined with P < .05 obtained by using the McNemar test or with a generalized estimating equation.The primary tumor was correctly staged in 84 patients (79%) at stand-alone CT and in 91 patients (86%) at integrated FDG PET/CT (P = .25). For the depiction of malignant nodes, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of CT were 70% (23 of 33 nodal groups), 69% (248 of 360), and 69% (271 of 393), respectively, whereas those of PET/CT were 85% (28 of 33), 84% (302 of 360), and 84% (330 of 393) (P = .25, P < .001, and P < .001, respectively). There were 112 false-positive interpretations at CT for 54 hilar, 16 subcarinal, 29 paratracheal, 10 subaortic, and two pulmonary ligament nodal groups and one upper paratracheal group, compared with only 58 false-positive interpretations at PET/CT for 32 hilar, seven subcarinal, 13 lower paratracheal, and six subaortic nodal groups. There were 10 false-negative interpretations at CT for four hilar, two lower paratracheal, and two subcarinal nodal groups, one prevascular and retrotracheal group, and one inferior pulmonary group, but only five false-negative interpretations at PET/CT (one each for paratracheal, subaortic, subcarinal, inferior pulmonary, and hilar nodal groups).Integrated FDG PET/CT is significantly better than stand-alone CT for lung cancer staging and provides enhanced accuracy and specificity in nodal staging.STIR turbo SE MR imaging vs. coregistered FDG-PET/CT: quantitative and qualitative assessment of N-stage in non-small-cell lung cancer patients.To conduct a prospective comparison of the accuracy of short inversion time (TI) inversion-recovery (STIR) turbo spin-echo (SE) imaging and coregistered 2-[fluorine-18] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography (PET) with computed tomography (CT) (coregistered FDG-PET/CT) to assess the N-stage in non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients.A total of 115 consecutive NSCLC patients prospectively underwent CT, STIR turbo SE imaging, and FDG-PET, as well as surgical and pathological examinations. All STIR turbo SE images were obtained with a 0.9% saline phantom, which was placed alongside the chest wall of each patient, and coregistered FDG-PET/CTs were reconstructed using commercially available software. For quantitative assessments, the ratio of signal intensity (SI) of each lymph node to that of 0.9% saline phantom (lymph node-saline ratio [LSR]) and maximal standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) of each lymph node were calculated. Feasible threshold values were determined by using the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve-based positive test, and diagnostic capabilities of N-stage were compared by McNemar's test on a per patient basis.When feasible, threshold values were adopted, quantitative sensitivity (90.1%) and accuracy (92.2%) of STIR turbo SE imaging were significantly higher than those of quantitative and qualitative sensitivities (76.7% and 74.4%) and accuracies (83.5% and 82.6%) of coregistered FDG-PET/CT on a per patient basis (P < 0.05).STIR turbo SE imaging is at least as valid as coregistered FDG-PET/CT for quantitative and qualitative assessment of the N-stage for NSCLC patients.Prediction of pathologic node-negative clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma for optimal candidates undergoing sublobar resection.Patients with pathologic node-negative early lung cancer may be optimal candidates for sublobar resection. We aimed to identify predictors of pathologic lymph node involvement in clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma.The data from a multicenter database of 502 patients with completely resected clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma were retrospectively analyzed to determine the relationship between the lymph node metastasis status and tumor size on high-resolution computed tomography (HRCT) or maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) on [18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT). Revised SUVmax was used to correct interinstitutional discrepancies.In multivariate analyses, either a solid tumor size on HRCT (P = .001) or an SUVmax on FDG-PET/CT (P = .049) was an independent predictor of lymph node metastasis. The predictive criteria of pathologic node-negative early lung cancer were a solid tumor size of less than 0.8 cm or an SUVmax of less than 1.5. Patients who met the predictive criteria of pathologic node-negative disease had less pathologic invasiveness, such as lymphatic, vascular, or pleural invasion (P < .001), and better disease-free survival (P < .0001) than those who did not, and 86 (40.4%) of the 213 patients with T1b (2-3 cm) tumors met the predictive criteria.Either a solid tumor size or an SUVmax was a significant independent predictor of nodal involvement in clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma. The pathologic node-negative status criteria of a solid tumor size of less than 0.8 cm on HRCT or an SUVmax of less than 1.5 on FDG-PET/CT may be helpful for avoiding systematic lymphadenectomy for clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma, even in cases of T1b (2-3 cm) tumor.Staging of non-small-cell lung cancer with integrated positron-emission tomography and computed tomography.We compared the diagnostic accuracy of integrated positron-emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) with that of CT alone, that of PET alone, and that of conventional visual correlation of PET and CT in determining the stage of disease in non-small-cell lung cancer.In a prospective study, integrated PET-CT was performed in 50 patients with proven or suspected non-small-cell lung cancer. CT and PET alone, visually correlated PET and CT, and integrated PET-CT were evaluated separately, and a tumor-node-metastasis (TNM) stage was assigned on the basis of image analysis. Nodal stations were identified according to the mapping system of the American Thoracic Society. The standard of reference was histopathological assessment of tumor stage and node stage. Extrathoracic metastases were confirmed histopathologically or by at least one other imaging method. A paired sign test was used to compare integrated PET-CT with the other imaging methods.Integrated PET-CT provided additional information in 20 of 49 patients (41 percent), beyond that provided by conventional visual correlation of PET and CT. Integrated PET-CT had better diagnostic accuracy than the other imaging methods. Tumor staging was significantly more accurate with integrated PET-CT than with CT alone (P=0.001), PET alone (P<0.001), or visual correlation of PET and CT (P=0.013); node staging was also significantly more accurate with integrated PET-CT than with PET alone (P=0.013). In metastasis staging, integrated PET-CT increased the diagnostic certainty in two of eight patients.Integrated PET-CT improves the diagnostic accuracy of the staging of non-small-cell lung cancer.False-negative rate after positron emission tomography/computer tomography scan for mediastinal staging in cI stage non-small-cell lung cancer.To assess the false-negative (FN) rate of positron emission tomography (PET)-chest computed tomography (CT) scan in clinical non-central cIA and cIB non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) for mediastinal staging.Between January 2007 and December 2010, 402 patients with potentially operable NSCLC were assessed by thoracic CT scan and 18-fluoro-2-deoxy-d-glucose PET-CT for mediastinal staging and to detect extrathoracic metastases, of which 153 surgically treated patients (79 cIA and 74 cIB cases) were prospectively included in the study. Central tumours were excluded on the basis of CT scan criteria, defined as contact with the intrapulmonary main bronchi, pulmonary artery, pulmonary veins or the origin of the first segmental branches. CT scan was considered negative if lymph nodes were <1 cm at the smaller diameter. 18FDG PET-CT was considered negative when the high maximum standard uptake value (SUVmax) was <2.5. Non-invasive surgical staging was carried out in this group, and curative resection plus systematic mediastinal dissection was performed except in the event of unexpected oncological contraindication.Composite non-invasive staging (CT scan, PET-CT) showed a negative predictive value (NPV) of 92% (CI 83.6-96.8) in the cIA group and 85% (CI 74-92) in the cIB group. There were 6 of 79 (7.6%) false-negatives (FNs) in cIA and 11 of 74 (14.8%) in cIB. Multilevel pN2 were detected in four cases, all of them in the cIB group. The most frequently involved N2 was subcarinal (two cases) in cIA and right lower paratracheal (R4) and seven (five cases) in cIB. Occult (pN2) lymph nodes were more frequent in tumour sizes≥5 cm (pT2b, nine cases, four FNs, P=0.03), pN1, adenocarcinoma [excluding minimally invasive adenocarcinoma (MIA) and lepidic predominant growth (LPA)] (P=0.029) and female patients, but no other risk factors for mediastinal metastases were identified (age, clinical stage, tumour location, central or peripheral, P>0.05). Multilevel pN2 was significantly more frequent in the cIB group (P<0.03). In pT≤1 cm (T1a), NPV was significantly better (NPV=100%, P<0.05) than the other subgroups studied (IA>1 cm and IB).Composite results for non-invasive mediastinal staging (CT scan, PET-CT) showed 11% of FNs in cI stage (7.6% in non-central cIA and 14.8% in cIB). In tumours≤1 cm, NPV makes surgical staging unnecessary. In women with adenocarcinoma and non-central cIB, however, the high FN rate makes invasive staging necessary, particularly in pT2b to decrease the incidence of unexpected pN2 in thoracotomy.Positron emission tomography with CT in the evaluation of non-small cell lung cancer in populations with a high prevalence of tuberculosis.To determine the utility of positron emission tomography with CT (PET-CT) in the evaluation of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) in an Asian context where tuberculosis rates are moderately high.Case records of consecutive patients with NSCLC undergoing PET-CT at the Singapore General Hospital over a 1-year period were retrospectively reviewed. The authors evaluated the sensitivity and specificity of PET-CT at their institution using surgical pathology or the tincture of time as the gold standard.A total of 54 patients underwent PET-CT during this period. Seven patients were evaluated for solitary pulmonary nodule, for which PET-CT gave a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 75%. There was one patient with false positive PET-CT due to active tuberculosis. In total, 41 patients underwent PET-CT for staging of NSCLC. There was one false positive (patient was found to have active tuberculous lymphadenitis) and one false negative for NSCLC. This gave a sensitivity of 92.3% and a specificity of 95%. Histology from the adrenal glands was available in two patients with PET-CT that was positive for adrenal metastases. One proved to be benign whereas the other was consistent with metastasis. Two patients had PET-CT positive for liver metastases, which was verified by histology. Two patients with positive PET-CT for lesions in the colon turned out to be benign histologically.Positron emission tomography with CT for the evaluation and follow-up of solitary pulmonary nodule and NSCLC can provide additional useful information to conventional radiology for treatment planning and a non-invasive determination of prognosis. However, physicians need to be aware of the limitations of this imaging modality, particularly when tuberculosis has a high prevalence in the population.The maximum standardized 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose uptake on positron emission tomography predicts lymph node metastasis and invasiveness in clinical stage IA non-small cell lung cancer.In patients with clinical stage IA non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), we investigated whether the maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) by the tumor correlated with lymph node metastasis, intratumoral lymphatic and vascular invasion of tumor cells, and pleural invasion. From April 2005 to November 2008, 58 patients underwent a lobectomy with systematic hilar and mediastinal lymph node dissection for clinical stage IA NSCLC. All patients had integrated FDG-positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) performed in our center as part of the preoperative workup within one month of resection. The relationships between the SUVmax and pathologic results of lymph node metastasis, intratumoral lymphatic and vascular invasion of tumor cells, and pleural invasion were examined. Compared with tumors with an SUVmax < or = 2.0, tumors with an SUVmax>2.0 had more frequent lymph node metastasis, intratumoral lymphatic and vascular invasion of tumor cells and pleural invasion (all P<0.05). Our results suggest that in patients with clinical stage IA NSCLC, SUVmax is an important predictor of tumor invasiveness.Ratio of the maximum standardized uptake value on FDG-PET of the mediastinal (N2) lymph nodes to the primary tumor may be a universal predictor of nodal malignancy in patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer.The maximum standardized uptake value (maxSUV) on F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) scan of mediastinal (N2) lymph nodes may predict pathology in patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer. However, the maxSUV varies among PET scanners. Thus, we evaluated the ratio of the maxSUV of the lymph node to the primary tumor at different centers to determine whether it was a universal predictor of lymph node malignancy.This is a retrospective review of a prospective database. Patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer, a dedicated FDG-PET with the maxSUV of the primary lung tumor and FDG-avid mediastinal (N2) nodes reported (before therapy), and who underwent lymph node removal were eligible.There were 239 patients with 335 FDG-PET-positive N2 nodes at 14 different PET centers. The median ratio of the maxSUV of the lymph node to the maxSUV of the primary tumor of the pathologically proven malignant nodes was 0.58 (range, 0.32 to 1.61). Benign nodes had a median ratio of 0.40 (range, 0.21 to 1.10, p = 0.02). The median value was similar for all centers except one. Receiver operating characteristics analysis determined the optimal value of the ratio that maximized sensitivity to be 0.56 or greater (+LR 6.6, sensitivity 94%, specificity 72%).The ratio of the maxSUV of the mediastinal (N2) lymph node to the maxSUV of the primary tumor in patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer predicts mediastinal nodal pathology across different PET centers. When the ratio is 0.56 or greater, there is a 94% chance that the node is malignant. The ratio may take into account the different techniques used at different centers.Integrated fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG) PET/CT compared to standard contrast-enhanced CT for characterization and staging of pulmonary tumors eligible for surgical resection.Accurate staging is necessary to determine the appropriate therapy in patients with lung cancer. Few studies have compared integrated fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) and contrast-enhanced CT in the characterization and staging of pulmonary tumors considered eligible for surgical resection.To compare 18F-FDG PET/CT with standard contrast-enhanced CT for the diagnosis and staging of lung neoplasms eligible for surgical resection.Seventy-six consecutive patients (56 male, 20 female; mean age+/-SD, 63.4+/-20 years) with 84 pulmonary tumors suspected for malignancy and considered eligible for surgical resection were prospectively enrolled. Seventy-three malignant (65 non-small-cell lung carcinomas, one small-cell lung cancer, two carcinoids, and five metastases) and 11 benign lung tumors (three hamartomas, two sarcoidosis, one amyloidosis, one Wegener granulomatosis, one tuberculosis, and three areas of scarring) were finally diagnosed by histology. Tumor staging was based on the revised American Joint Committee on Cancer.In lesion characterization, the sensitivity and specificity of 18F-FDG PET/CT versus contrast-enhanced CT were 90% vs. 83% and 18% vs. 63% (P<0.05, McNemar test), respectively. In nodal staging, the sensitivity and specificity of 18F-FDG PET/CT versus contrast-enhanced CT were 78% vs. 46% and 80% vs. 93% (P<0.05), respectively.In patients with lung neoplasms considered eligible for surgical resection, (18)F-FDG PET/CT versus contrast-enhanced CT revealed higher sensitivity in nodal staging, but lower specificity both in lesion characterization and nodal staging.Effect of PET/CT on management of patients with non-small cell lung cancer: results of a prospective study with 5-year survival data.We investigated the incremental management impact and prognostic value of staging with (18)F-FDG PET/CT in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) being considered for potentially curative therapies.Information on 168 consecutive patients with NSCLC being considered for surgery or definitive radiotherapy with curative intent before PET/CT was entered into a prospective database. The pre-PET/CT management plan, based on conventional imaging (conventional CT, appropriately supplemented by bone scintigraphy or other modalities), was defined prospectively by referring clinicians before PET/CT results became available. After PET/CT, actual clinical management was recorded, and patients were followed up until 5 y or death. The appropriateness of PET/CT management plans was assessed by biopsy when available, clinical follow-up, and survival analysis.Stage was discordant on PET/CT and conventional imaging in 50.6% of patients (41.1% upstaged, 9.5% downstaged), with high management impact (change in treatment modality or curative intent) in 42.3% of patients. Both conventional imaging stage and PET/CT stage were strongly predictive of overall survival (OS) but there were greater differences between hazard rates and separations in the OS curves for stage groupings determined using PET/CT. OS was also strongly predicted by PET/CT-directed choice of therapy (P < 0.0001).PET/CT frequently affects patient management and strongly predicts OS in NSCLC, supporting the appropriateness of such changes.Mediastinal lymph nodes staging by 18F-FDG PET/CT for early stage non-small cell lung cancer: a multicenter study.Accurate staging of mediastinal lymph nodes metastases is critical for determining the application of stereotactic body radiation therapy (SBRT) for patients with early stage non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). In this multicenter study the accuracy of (18)F-FDG PET/CT to detect lymph node metastases was evaluated for early stage NSCLC.The data from the patients with stage1 NSCLC who received preoperative (18)F-FDG PET/CT staging and radical surgery was retrospectively reviewed of five centers from February 2004 to August 2010. The lymph node metastases were confirmed histopathologically after radical surgery. And the sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) were calculated for PET/CT staging.Two hundred patients were enrolled. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, PPV and NPV for lymph node metastases on PET/CT were 44%, 83%, 78%, 29% and 91%, respectively. There were eight and 19 cases positive for lymph node metastases with central (n=62) and peripheral (n=138) NSCLC (P>0.05), respectively.(18)F-FDG PET/CT was specific in N(0) staging for T(1-2) NSCLC. The NPV was about 91% in clinical N(0) patients, suggested that (18)F-FDG PET/CT may help to accurately stage N(0) patients and thus identify patients for SBRT.Accuracy of 18F-FDG PET/CT for lymph node staging in non-small-cell lung cancers.This retrospective study evaluated the diagnostic accuracy of 2-(F18)-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography ((18)F-FDG-PET)/computed tomography (PET/CT) in the preoperative diagnosis of metastatic mediastinal and hilar lymph node in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC).A total of 39 patients received preoperative (18)F-FDG PET/CT and the postoperative biopsy. We compared preoperative PET/CT scan results with corresponding intraoperative histopathalogic findings in 39 NSCLC patients. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive and negative predictive value of (18)F-FDG PET/CT were assessed.Histopathologic examination confirmed metastasis in 57 out of the 208 excised lymph nodes; 23 of the 57 nodes were mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of PET/CT in the preoperative diagnosis of mediastinal lymph node metastasis in NSCLC patients were 65%, 96.8%, 92%, 78.5% and 90%, respectively.PET/CT scan showed good accuracy in the preoperative diagnosis of mediastinal and hilar lymph node metastasis in the patients with NSCLC. We recommend that PET/CT scanning be used as a first-line evaluation tool for tumor diagnosis, therapy evaluation and follow-up.Pulmonary lesion assessment: comparison of whole-body hybrid MR/PET and PET/CT imaging--pilot study.To compare the performance of magnetic resonance (MR)/positron emission tomography (PET) imaging in the staging of lung cancer with that of PET/computed tomography (CT) as the reference standard and to compare the quantification accuracy of a new whole-body MR/PET system with corresponding PET/CT data sets.Institutional review board approval and informed consent were obtained. Ten patients in whom bronchial carcinoma was proven or clinically suspected underwent clinically indicated fluorine 18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET/CT and, immediately thereafter, whole-body MR/PET imaging with a new hybrid whole-body system (3.0-T MR imager with integrated PET system). Attenuation correction of MR/PET images was segmentation based with fat-water separation. Tumor-to-liver ratios were calculated and compared between PET/CT and MR/PET imaging. Tumor staging on the basis of the PET/CT and MR/PET studies was performed by two readers. Spearman rank correlation was used for comparison of data.MR/PET imaging provided diagnostic image quality in all patients, with good tumor delineation. Most lesions (nine of 10) showed pronounced FDG uptake. One lesion was morphologically suspicious for malignancy at CT and MR imaging but showed no FDG uptake. MR/PET imaging had higher mean tumor-to-liver ratios than did PET/CT (4.4 ± 2.0 [standard deviation] for PET/CT vs 8.0 ± 3.9 for MR/PET imaging). Significant correlation regarding the tumor-to-liver ratio was found between both imaging units (ρ = 0.93; P < .001). Identical TNM scores based on MR/PET and PET/CT data were found in seven of 10 patients. Differences in T and/or N staging occurred mainly owing to modality-inherent differences in lesion size measurement.MR/PET imaging of the lung is feasible and provides diagnostic image quality in the assessment of pulmonary masses. Similar lesion characterization and tumor stage were found in comparing PET/CT and MR/PET images in most patients.Is palpation of the nonresected pulmonary lobe(s) required for patients with non-small cell lung cancer? A prospective study.Video-assisted lobectomy is an increasingly used technique to treat patients with non-small cell lung cancer but it does not usually afford lung palpation.A prospective study was conducted on patients with tumors amenable to video-assisted lobectomy (noncentral lesion and <5 cm) who underwent open lobectomy via thoracotomy. All patients underwent 64-slice helical computed tomographic scan with intravenous contrast at 5-mm intervals and had integrated 2-deoxy-2-18F-fluoro-D-glucose positron emission tomography computed tomography 30 days or less before thoracotomy. Unsuspected malignant pulmonary nodules that were palpated and removed (from a different lobe than the one resected) and that were not imaged preoperatively were defined as cancer that would have been missed by video-assisted lobectomy.From January 2006 to February 2007, 166 patients had non-small cell lesions that were resected via thoracotomy, despite being amenable to video-assisted surgery, by one surgeon. Thirty-seven (22%) patients had pulmonary nodules that probably would have been missed by video-assisted lobectomy; 14 (8.4%) of these nodules were malignant. These were unsuspected M1 pulmonary lesions in 9 patients and unsuspected different types of primary non-small cell lung cancers in 5 patients. All missed lesions were less than 6 mm and in different lobes from the one resected. Nine (64%) of these 14 patients' primary known lesions were pathologic T1 lesions. Nine patients received adjuvant chemotherapy because of these unsuspected M1 nodules.Open lobectomy that affords palpation of the rest of the lung may discover nonimaged malignant pulmonary nodules in different lobes in 8% to 9% of patients with non-small cell lung cancer despite preoperative fine-cut chest computed tomographic scan with contrast and integrated integrated 2-deoxy-2-18F-fluoro-D-glucose positron emission tomography computed tomographic scanning. The clinical impact of these findings is unknown.Significance of PET/CT in determining actual TNM staging for patients with various lung cancers.We investigated the difference in TNM stage of lung cancer provided by PET/CT (combining positron emission tomography and computed tomography) as compared with TNM stage obtained with conventional imaging studies (CI) with contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) with iron contrast media. Sixty-seven cases of lung cancer were included in this study. Overall, the rate of correction of TNM staging was 70.1% after PET/CT. The correction rate for each factor was 32.8% in T, 37.3% in N, and 37.3% in M. High rates of correction were observed in small cell lung cancer (SCLC), with 75% (6/8 cases) obtained by PET/CT. When SCLCs were divided into limited disease (n = 6) involving 1 hemithorax, including mediastinal and contralateral hilar lymph nodes, and others (extensive disease, n = 2), the correction rate was as high as 80% for limited disease. In conclusion, PET/CT can provide actual TNM staging and recognition for oncologists in staging, which would not mislead to selection of inadequate subsequent treatment.Positron-emission tomography for lung cancer in a tuberculosis-endemic region.A potential limitation of integrated positron-emission tomography and computed tomography in non-small-cell lung cancer may be false-positive results due to granulomatous disease. This retrospective study examined the accuracy of this imaging modality for mediastinal nodal staging of non-small-cell lung cancer in Hong Kong where tuberculosis remains endemic. There were 249 lymph node stations evaluated in 107 patients, of whom 38 (36%) had active tuberculosis or evidence of previous tuberculosis. Imaging results were compared with histological findings. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of integrated imaging for mediastinal nodal staging were 52%, 86%, and 80%, respectively; the overall positive-predictive value for mediastinal nodal metastasis was 46%, and the overall negative-predictive value was 89%. The positive-predictive value for mediastinal nodal metastasis was 39% in patients with tuberculosis and 50% in controls; the negative-predictive value was high in both groups (92% and 87%). The likelihood ratio for true positives was 6.47 in patients with tuberculosis vs. 10.97 in controls. This suggests that the reliability of positron-emission/computed tomography may be substantially poorer in patients with tuberculosis. Histological confirmation should be considered mandatory in patients with suspected metastasis on integrated imaging.[Comparison between PET(-FDG) and computed tomography in the staging of lung cancer. Consequences for operability in 94 patients].Lung cancer, a major application of FDG/PET-CT, has recently been introduced in daily practice in France. The authors retrospectively studied its impact on the management of this disease.The results of PET-CT and conventional assessment (brain imaging, chest and abdominal CT and possibly bone scintigraphy) were compared in 94 patients, referred for the staging of non-small cell lung cancer, or the assessment of a solitary lung lesion. The impact of thoracic lymph node involvement on the operability of patients was studied in 44 patients.PET-CT revealed metastases in 20% of the patients without metastases found by conventional imaging and modified the stage of the disease in 28% of the cases. It changed the indication of surgical treatment in 19% of the cases and led to induction chemotherapy in two patients. In addition, two synchronous cancers were discovered. Regarding lymph node involvement, PET-CT remains of diagnostic value regardless of the scanner results.The impact of PET-CT in assessing non-small cell lung cancer was confirmed in the authors' practice. Its interest and the consequences in some patients misclassified with conventional assessment have been demonstrated.Contrast enhanced CT versus integrated PET-CT in pre-operative nodal staging of non-small cell lung cancer.The purpose of this study was to retrospectively evaluate the effectiveness of integrated positron emission tomography-computed tomography (PET-CT) in comparison with contrast enhanced CT (CE-CT) in pre-operative staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) by using surgical and pathological findings as the reference standard.From August 2008 to August 2009, 57 consecutive patients (50 males and 7 females; mean age, 59 years; range, 38-79 years) with NSCLC underwent conventional pre-operative lung cancer staging using clinical data and CE-CT of the chest, and integrated whole-body fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose PET-CT studies. Histopathological results served as the reference standard.Forty-eight of the 57 patients (84%) had no lymph node involvement (N0), five (9%) were found to have N1 disease, and four (7%) had N2 disease. There was a significant difference between CE-CT and PET-CT for nodal staging of N0 disease (P < 0.05). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of hilar and mediastinal lymph node staging were 56%, 73%, 28%, 90%, and 70%, with CE-CT, respectively; and 78%, 92%, 64%, 96%, and 89% with PET-CT, respectively.Integrated PET-CT is more accurate than CE-CT for lymph node staging in NSCLC.Evaluation of integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography accuracy in detecting lymph node metastasis in patients with adenocarcinoma vs squamous cell carcinoma.The aim of our study was to analyze the specificity and sensitivity of integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET/CT) in detecting nodal metastasis according to histology (adenocarcinoma vs squamous cell carcinoma), and to identify the factors related to false-negative findings.A retrospective, single-institution review of 353 consecutive patients with suspected or pathologically proven, potentially resectable non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) who had integrated PET/CT scanning at the same centre. Lymph node staging was pathologically confirmed on tissue specimens obtained at mediastinoscopy and/or thoracotomy. Statistical evaluation of PET/CT results was performed on a per-patient and per-nodal-station basis.A total of 2286 nodal stations (1643 mediastinal, 333 hilar and 310 intrapulmonary) were evaluated. Adenocarcinoma was the final diagnosis in 244 patients and squamous carcinoma in 109 patients. Nodes were positive for malignancy in 80 (32.8%) of 244 patients with adenocarcinoma (N1 = 31; N2 = 48 and N3 = 1) and in 32 (29.3%) of 109 with squamous carcinoma (N1 = 21 and N2 = 11). PET/CT in the adenocarcinoma group had a sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of 53.8, 91.5 and 79.1%, and in the squamous cell group, of 87.5, 81.8 and 83.5%, respectively in a per-patient analysis. In the analysis for N2 disease on a per-patient basis, the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 38.8, 97.4, and 85.7% for the adenocarcinoma group and 81.8, 91.8 and 90.8% in the squamous cell group. In the adenocarcinoma group, the mean diameter of false-negative lymph nodes was 7 mm (standard deviation [SD] ± 2.5 mm) compared with the diameter of true-positive lymph nodes of 12.5 (SD ± 4 mm; P < 0.00001). In the squamous cell group, the mean diameter of false-negative lymph nodes was 7.4 mm (SD ± 2.8 mm) compared with the diameter of true-positive lymph nodes of 14.7 (SD ± 6 mm; P < 0.005). In the adenocarcinoma group, false-negative lymph nodes were statistically correlated with the presence of vascular invasion and in the squamous cell group only with the maximum standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) < 5.4.The sensitivity of PET/CT in detecting nodal metastasis in patients with adenocarcinoma is too low to avoid any further invasive staging procedure. Ultrasound-guided needle biopsy or mediastinoscopy is still necessary in staging patients undergoing lung resection for adenocarcinoma.Routine mediastinoscopy and esophageal ultrasound fine-needle aspiration in patients with non-small cell lung cancer who are clinically N2 negative: a prospective study.Despite normal mediastinal (N2) lymph nodes shown on positron emission tomography (PET) and CT, some physicians routinely perform mediastinoscopy and/or endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).A prospective trial on patients with NSCLC who were clinically staged N2 negative by both integrated PET/CT and CT scan. All underwent mediastinoscopy and EUS-FNA and if N2 negative underwent thoracotomy with thoracic lymphadenectomy.There were 153 patients (107 men). Of these, 136 patients were clinically staged N0 and 17 patients were clinically staged N1. Of the 136 patients who were staged as N0, 5 patients (3.7%) had positive EUS-FNA results (three in the subcarinal node), and 4 patients (2.9%) had positive mediastinoscopy results (all in the #4R node; one was N3). Six of the remaining 127 patients (4.7%) had N2 disease after resection. Seventeen patients were clinically staged as N1 by integrated PET/CT. Four patients (23.5%) had positive EUS-FNA results (two in the subcarinal node), 3 patients (17.6%) had positive mediastinoscopy results (all in #4R node; two were N2 and one was N3), and none of the remaining 10 patients had N2 disease after resection. Patients with unsuspected N2 disease were twice as likely (relative risk, 2.1; 95% confidence interval, 1.24 to 2.51; p = 0.02) to have a maximum standardized uptake value (maxSUV) > 10 and poorly differentiated cancer (relative risk, 2.1; 95% confidence interval, 1.14 to 2.38; p = 0.03).We do not recommend routine mediastinoscopy or EUS-FNA in patients who are clinically staged as N0 after both integrated PET/CT and CT. However, these procedures should both be considered in patients clinically staged as N1 after PET/CT, and/or in those with adenocarcinoma, upper-lobe tumors, or tumors with a maxSUV > or = 10.The prognostic significance of maximum standardized uptake value of primary tumor in surgically treated non-small-cell lung cancer patients: analysis of 413 cases.Integrated PET/CT is widely used in the preoperative staging and prognostic assessment of non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients. The aims of this study were to evaluate the prognostic significance of SUVmax of primary tumor in patients undergoing surgical treatment and, in order to minimize technical interferences, to verify whether SUVmax standardized by SUVmax liver or SUVmax blood pool provided additional prognostic information.A retrospective study of 413 consecutive NSCLC patients undergoing potentially curative surgical resection after PET/CT obtained in the same PET center over a 6-year period. The SUVmax was calculated drawing region of interest around the primitive tumor, the liver, and the aortic arch in PET images. The same procedure was performed for 2 adjacent planes and the average of these measures was considered.Nine patients were considered 30-day postoperative deaths and were excluded from the analysis. At the end of the study, 312 (77.2%) of the 404 patients were alive (median follow-up, 26 months) and 92 had died (median survival, 17 months). At multivariate analysis tumor-node-metastasis stage, primary tumor grading and primary tumor SUVmax (T-SUVmax) were found to be independent prognostic factors, while T-SUVmax/SUVmax blood pool ratio, and T-SUVmax/SUVmax liver ratio were not.T-SUVmax is an independent predictor for survival in NSCLC patients undergoing surgery and might be helpful in guiding adjuvant treatment strategies. SUVmax of primary tumor normalized by SUV blood pool or SUV liver does not provide additional prognostic information.Dual-time point scanning of integrated FDG PET/CT for the evaluation of mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer diagnosed as operable by contrast-enhanced CT.To evaluate whether dual-time point scanning with integrated fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose ((18)F-FDG) positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET/CT) is useful for evaluation of mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer diagnosed as operable by contrast-enhanced CT.PET/CT data and pathological findings of 560 nodal stations in 129 patients with pathologically proven non-small cell lung cancer diagnosed as operable by contrast-enhanced CT were reviewed retrospectively. Standardized uptake values (SUVs) on early scans (SUVe) 1h, and on delayed scans (SUVd) 2h after FDG injection of each nodal station were measured. Retention index (RI) (%) was calculated by subtracting SUVe from SUVd and dividing by SUVe. Logistic regression analysis was performed with seven kinds of models, consisting of (1) SUVe, (2) SUVd, (3) RI, (4) SUVe and SUVd, (5) SUVe and RI, (6) SUVd and RI, and (7) SUVe, SUVd and RI. The seven derived models were compared by receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis. k-Fold cross-validation was performed with k values of 5 and 10. p<0.05 was considered statistically significant.Model (1) including the term of SUVe showed the largest area under the ROC curve among the seven models. The cut-off probability of metastasis of 3.5% with SUVe of 2.5 revealed a sensitivity of 78% and a specificity of 81% on ROC analysis, and approximately 60% and 80% on k-fold cross-validation.Single scanning of PET/CT is sufficiently useful for evaluating mediastinal and hilar nodes for metastasis.The clinical stage of non-small cell lung cancer as assessed by means of fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scanning is less accurate in cigarette smokers.The treatment of non-small cell lung cancer depends on the stage, and this is clinically best determined by using fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography. We evaluated the effect smoking has on the accuracy of this test.We performed a prospective cohort study evaluating the accuracy of clinical stage compared with pathologic stage between cigarette smokers and nonsmokers with non-small cell lung cancer. All patients were assigned a clinical TNM stage after fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scanning and then underwent meticulously pathologic TNM staging. If N2, N3, or M1 negative, patients underwent thoracotomy with complete thoracic lymphadenectomy. The clinical and pathologic stages were compared.There were 246 patients: 52 never smoked (NS group), 112 quit at least 1 month before fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography (Q group), and 82 were still smokers (S group). The 3 groups were similar for stage and histology. The overall accuracy was 83%, 80%, and 64% for the NS, Q, and S groups, respectively (P = .03). The accuracy for the T status was 88%, 84%, and 86%; accuracy for the N2 lymph nodes was 96%, 75%, and 72%; and accuracy for the N1 lymph nodes was 92%, 78%, and 80%, respectively, favoring the NS group. The greater the pack-year history, the greater the N2 inaccuracy (P = .04). Multivariate analysis showed that status of smoking (P = .026) and maxSUV value (P = .014) were independent predictors of fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography accuracy.Patients with non-small cell lung cancer who continue to smoke at the time of their fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scan have less accurate clinical staging compared with those who stopped 1 month before or who never smoked. As the pack-years increase, the accuracy for the N2 nodes decrease. Nonsmokers have the most accurate clinical staging.Non-small cell lung cancer: dual-modality PET/CT in preoperative staging.To determine the accuracy of dual-modality positron emission tomographic (PET)-computed tomographic (CT) imaging, as compared with PET alone and CT alone, in the staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Twenty-seven patients with NSCLC underwent staging with combined fluorine 18 fluorodeoxyglucose PET and CT. CT, PET, and coregistered PET/CT images were evaluated separately by two different physicians for each imaging modality, and disease stage was determined by using TNM and American Joint Committee on Cancer staging systems. Histopathologic results served as the reference standard. The statistical significance of differences among CT, PET, and PET/CT was determined by using the McNemar test.Overall tumor stage was correctly classified as 0-IV with CT in 19 patients, with PET in 20 patients, and with PET/CT in 26 patients. PET/CT findings when compared with PET findings led to a treatment change for four patients (15%) and when compared with CT findings led to a treatment change for five patients (19%). Differences in the accuracy of overall tumor staging between PET/CT and CT (P =.008) and between PET/CT and PET (P =.031) were significant. Primary tumor stage was correctly determined in more patients with PET/CT than with either PET alone or CT alone. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of regional lymph node staging, respectively, were 89%, 94%, 89%, 94%, and 93%, with PET/CT; 89%, 89%, 80%, 94%, and 89% with PET; and 70%, 59%, 50%, 77%, and 63% with CT. Fourteen distant metastases were detected in four patients with CT, four were detected in two patients with PET, and 17 were detected in four patients with PET/CT.Use of dual-modality PET/CT significantly increases the number of patients with correctly staged NSCLC and thus has a positive effect on treatment.Accuracy of positron emission tomography in mediastinal node assessment in coal workers with lung cancer.The purpose of this study was to explore the accuracy of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) in the assessment of mediastinal lymph node in coal workers who had non-small cell lung cancer. We retrospectively reviewed 42 retired coal workers who had lung cancer without distant metastasis, between May 2007 and May 2010. Regarding the mediastinal lymph nodes, when the standard uptake value was greater than 2.5, it was considered "malignancy positive." After histological examination of the mediastinal lymph nodes, anthracotic and metastatic ones were detected. The results of PET/CT were analyzed to determine its accuracy. Of these 42 patients, PET/CT detected 47 positive mediastinal lymph nodes in 24 patients with a mean SUV maximum of 6.2 (2.6-13.8). One hundred and thirty-one mediastinal lymph node foci were dissected. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of FDG-PET/CT in detecting nodal metastases were 84% (16/19), 65% (15/23), 66% (16/24), 83% (15/18), and 74% (31/42) on a per-patient basis, respectively. Mediastinal node staging with FDG-PET/CT in coal workers is insufficient due to the high false-positive rates due to the presence of pneumoconiosis. In these patients, an invasive technique such as mediastinoscopy seems mandatory for confirmation of ipsilateral or contralateral mediastinal lymph node metastasis.Improved radiologic staging of lung cancer with 2-[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography and computed tomography registration.To determine if volumetric nonlinear registration or registration of thoracic computed tomography (CT) and 2-[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) datasets changes the detection of mediastinal and hilar nodal disease in patients undergoing staging for lung cancer and if it has any impact on radiologic lung cancer staging.Computer-based image registration was performed on 45 clinical thoracic helical CT and FDG-PET scans of patients with lung cancer who were staged by mediastinoscopy and/or thoracotomy. Thoracic CT, FDG-PET, and registration datasets were each interpreted by 2 readers for the presence of metastatic nodal disease and were staged independently of each other. Results were compared with surgical pathologic findings.One hundred and thirty lymph node stations in the mediastinum and hila were evaluated each on CT, PET, and registration datasets. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value, respectively, for detecting metastatic nodal disease for CT were 74%, 78%, 55%, 88%; for PET with CT side by side, 59% to 76%, 77% to 89%, 48% to 68%, and 84% to 91%; and for CT-PET registration, 71% to 76%, 89% to 96%, 70% to 86%, and 90% to 91%. Registration images were significantly more sensitive in detecting nodal disease over PET for 1 reader (P = 0.0156) and were more specific than PET (P = 0.0107 and 0.0017) in identifying the absence of mediastinal disease for both readers. Registration was significantly more accurate for staging when compared with PET for both readers (P = 0.002 and 0.035).Registration of CT and FDG-PET datasets significantly improved the specificity of detecting metastatic disease. In addition, registration improved the radiologic staging of lung cancer patients when compared with CT or FDG-PET alone.Impact of point spread function reconstruction on thoracic lymph node staging with 18F-FDG PET/CT in non-small cell lung cancer.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the impact of point spread function (PSF) reconstruction on quantitative values and diagnostic accuracy of FDG PET/CT for nodal staging in non-small cell lung cancer.Fifty-eight consecutive PET/CT examinations were reconstructed with both ordered subset expectation maximization (OSEM) and PSF algorithms. Two readers independently performed a randomized blinded review of PET/CT examinations and gave a nodal status (N0, N1, N2, or N3) to each PET data set. When discordant, a consensus was reached with a third reader. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (NPV), and positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) were assessed and compared using a McNemar test. All PET data sets were then independently analyzed to extract quantitative PET values in 208 nodes and compare them using Bland-Altman analysis.Bland-Altman analysis showed that, on average, PSF reconstruction increased SUVmax, SUVmean, and node/background ratios by 48%, 28%, and 27%, respectively. This increase was more marked for nodes less than 1 cm than for nodes 1 cm or greater (P < 0.0001 for SUVmax, SUVmean, and node/background ratios). Point spread function PET had higher sensitivity (97%) and NPV (92%) than OSEM PET (78% and 57%, respectively; P = 0.01 and P = 0.04, respectively). Negative LR was 0.04 for PSF PET and 0.31 for OSEM PET.By improving activity recovery, especially for nonenlarged nodes, PSF significantly improves the sensitivity, NPV, and negative LR of FDG-PET for nodal staging in non-small cell lung cancer. These data suggest that preoperative invasive nodal staging may be omitted in the case of a negative PSF FDG-PET/CT.Incremental value of PET/CT Over CT for mediastinal nodal staging of non-small cell lung cancer: Comparison between patients with and without idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis.We aimed to compare the incremental value of FDG PET/CT over CT for the assessment of mediastinal nodal status between patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis (IPF) and those with NSCLC but without IPF.Forty-two patients with NSCLC and IPF (mean age, 66 years) were matched to 168 patients with NSCLC but without IPF (mean age, 65 years). Patients underwent surgical mediastinal nodal staging after both integrated PET/CT and contrast-enhanced CT scans had been obtained. Histopathologic nodal assessment served as the reference standard.PET/CT had better specificity (91% [29/32 patients] vs 47% [15/32]; p = 0.0002) and accuracy (83% [35/42] vs 50% [21/42]; p = 0.001) than CT did in patients with IPF. In patients without IPF, PET/CT was better than CT alone with regard to sensitivity (62% [26/42] vs 40% [17/42]; p = 0.0067), specificity (96% [121/126] vs 84% [106/126]; p = 0.0002), and accuracy (88% [147/168] vs 73% [123/168]; p < 0.0001). Thus, the incremental accuracy of PET/CT, which was 33% (14/42) for patients with IPF and 14% (24/168) for patients without IPF (p = 0.0041), was mainly the result of improved specificity.PET/CT offers significantly increased accuracy versus CT in mediastinal nodal staging in patients with NSCLC and IPF compared with patients with NSCLC but without IPF, mainly because of improved specificity.False-positivity of mediastinal lymph nodes has negative effect on survival in potentially resectable non-small cell lung cancer.It has been shown that increased metabolic activity of primary tumour has a negative effect on survival in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) staged with positron emission tomography integrated computed tomography (PET/CT). We hypothesized that an increased metabolic activity of mediastinal lymph nodes would have worse survival even if it is false.Three hundred and twenty-eight consecutive patients with NSCLC histology were imaged with PET/CT within 90 days of surgery between September 2005 and March 2009. Patients who had neoadjuvant chemotherapy (n = 22), patients with prior history of NSCLC (n = 9) or other malignancies within 5 years (n = 11) were excluded from the study. Patients with negative mediastinoscopy underwent resection. Pathological results were revised according to the seventh tumor-node-metastasis staging system. Kaplan-Meier test was used for survival. Log-rank and Cox analyses were used for comparisons.A total of 286 patients (262 male; mean age: 58.5 years) were evaluated. There were 22 (6.7%) operative deaths and none of the patients were lost to follow-up. The median follow-up in the remaining 264 patients was 26 months (range, 2-61 months). Tumour size, nodal spread and stage were all strongly associated with survival from NSCLC (P < 0.001). There were 63 true-positive, 65 false-positive (FP), 152 true-negative (TN) and six false-negative findings on mediastinal staging after PET/CT. The maximum standardized uptake value of primary tumour was significantly higher in FP patients than in TN patients (P = 0.012). After excluding pN2-positive patients, TN patients had better survival than FP patients (P = 0.006). Multivariate analysis showed that false-positivity of mediastinal lymph nodes was independently associated with worse survival (hazard ratio = 0.63; P = 0.02). There were 146 patients with pT1-4, pN0 treated with R0 surgical resection. Disease-free survival and overall survival were also significantly better for TN patients in completely resected group (P = 0.009 versus 0.016).We have shown that false-positivity of mediastinal lymph nodes had yielded worse survival in surgically staged or resected NSCLC patients staged with PET/CT. This result may help to allocate patients with potentially poor prognosis for considered additional therapy.Cost-effectiveness of hybrid PET/CT for staging of non-small cell lung cancer.Although the diagnostic effectiveness of integrated PET/CT for staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) has already been proven, it remains to be determined if tumor staging with combined metabolic and anatomic imaging is also cost-effective. The objective of this study was to evaluate from a payers' perspective the cost-effectiveness of staging NSCLC with CT alone (representing the mainstay diagnostic test) and with integrated PET/CT.The study is based on 172 NSCLC patients from a prospective clinical study who underwent diagnostic, contrast-enhanced helical CT and integrated PET/CT. Imaging was performed at the University Hospital Ulm between May 2002 and December 2004. To calculate treatment costs, we differentiated among cost for diagnosis, cost for nonsurgical treatment according to the clinical diagnosis, and cost for surgical procedures according to the clinical tumor stage.The diagnostic effectiveness in terms of correct TNM staging was 40% (31/77) for CT alone and 60% (46/77) for PET/CT. For the assessment of resectability (tumor stages Ia-IIIa vs. IIIb-IV), 65 of 77 patients (84%) were staged correctly by PET/CT (CT alone, 70% [54/77]). The incremental cost-effectiveness ratios per correctly staged patient were $3,508 for PET/CT versus CT alone. The incremental cost-effectiveness ratios per quality-adjusted life year gained were $79,878 for PET/CT vs. CT alone, decreasing to $69,563 assuming a reduced loss of utility (0.10 quality-adjusted life years) due to surgical morbidity.Cost-effectiveness analyses showed that costs for PET/CT are within the commonly accepted range for diagnostic tests or therapies. Therefore, reimbursement of PET/CT for NSCLC staging can be also recommended from an economic point of view.Prospective preoperative mediastinal lymph node staging by integrated positron emission tomography-computerised tomography in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer.Mediastinal lymph node staging determines the treatment strategy for non-small-cell lung cancer. This study aims to evaluate prospectively the accuracy of preoperative integrated 18-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography-computerised tomography ((18)FDG PET-CT) for mediastinal lymph node staging.Preoperative integrated (18)FDG PET-CT was used to analyse mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer. Nodal stations were identified according to the American Thoracic Society mapping system. Lymph nodes with a standardised uptake value (SUVmax) >3 were considered to be positive. The mediastinal lymph nodes were harvested during lung resection and the results of integrated (18)FDG PET-CT were compared to the mediastinal lymph node histology results.A total of 51 patients were enrolled in this study. The mean interval between integrated (18)FDG PET-CT and surgery was 31+/-15.8 days (range: 2-78 days). The mean mediastinal lymph node harvested and station number per patient during surgery were 11.8+/-5.6 (range: 2-27) and 3.8+/-1 (range: 2-6), respectively. The incidence of N2 pathological disease was 19.6%. The integrated (18)FDG PET-CT sensitivity and specificity were 40+/-30% and 85+/-11%, respectively. The positive and negative predictive values were 40+/-30% and 85+/-11%, respectively. False-positive results (six patients) were mainly due to inflammatory lymph nodes. False-negative results (six patients) were mainly due to infra-centimetrical, malignant lymph node invasion.The sensitivity of integrated (18)FDG PET-CT for mediastinal lymph node staging in patients selected for surgery is low. When positive mediastinal lymph nodes are detected, invasive mediastinal staging must be performed. On the other hand, the specificity is high: patients with negative integrated (18)FDG PET-CT can be operated upon without invasive mediastinal staging.Preoperative intrathoracic lymph node staging in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer: accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography.To evaluate the accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography with 18F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) and computed tomography (PET/CT) in preoperative intrathoracic lymph node staging in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and to ascertain the role of invasive staging in verifying positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) results.Retrospective, single institution study of consecutive patients with suspected or pathologically proven, potentially resectable NSCLC undergoing integrated PET/CT scanning in the same PET centre. Lymph node staging was pathologically confirmed on tissue specimens obtained at mediastinoscopy and/or thoracotomy. Statistical evaluation of PET/CT results was performed on a per-patient and per-nodal-station bases.A total of 1001 nodal stations (723 mediastinal, 148 hilar and 130 intrapulmonary) were evaluated in 159 patients. Nodes were positive for malignancy in 48 (30.2%) out of 159 patients (N1=17; N2=30; N3=1) and 71 (7.1%) out of 1001 nodal stations (N1=24; N2=46; N3=1). At univariate analysis, lymph node involvement was significantly associated (p<0.05) with the following primary tumour characteristics: increasing diameter, maximum standardised uptake value >9, central location and presence of vascular invasion. PET/CT staged the disease correctly in 128 out of 159 patients (80.5%), overstaging occurred in nine patients (5.7%) and understaging in 22 patients (13.8%). The overall sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of PET/CT for detecting metastatic lymph nodes were 54.2%, 91.9%, 74.3%, 82.3% and 80.5% on a per-patient basis, and 57.7%, 98.5%, 74.5%, 96.8% and 95.6% on per-nodal-station basis. With regard to N2/N3 disease, PET/CT accuracy was 84.9% and 95.3% on a per-patient basis and on per-nodal-station basis, respectively. Referring to nodal size, PET/CT sensitivity to detect malignant involvement was 32.4% (12/37) in nodes <10mm, and 85.3% (29/34) in nodes > or = 10mm.Our data show that integrated PET/CT provides high specificity but low sensitivity and accuracy in intrathoracic nodal staging of NSCLC patients and underscore the continued need for surgical staging.Additional value of PET-CT in the staging of lung cancer: comparison with CT alone, PET alone and visual correlation of PET and CT.Integrated positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) is a new imaging modality offering anatomic and metabolic information. The purpose was to evaluate retrospectively the accuracy of integrated PET-CT in the staging of a suggestive lung lesion, comparing this with the accuracy of CT alone, PET alone and visually correlated PET-CT. Fifty patients undergoing integrated PET-CT for staging of a suggestive lung lesion were studied. Their tumor, node, metastasis (TNM) statuses were determined with CT, PET, visually correlated PET-CT and integrated PET-CT. These TNM stages were compared with the surgical TNM status. Integrated PET-CT was the most accurate imaging technique in the assessment of the TNM status. Integrated PET-CT predicted correctly the T status, N status, M status and TNM status in, respectively, 86%, 80%, 98%, 70% versus 68%, 66%,88%, 46% with CT, 46%, 70%, 96%, 30% with PET and 72%, 68%, 96%, 54% with visually correlated PET-CT. T status and N status were overstaged, respectively, in 8% and 16% with integrated PET-CT, in 20% and 28% with CT, in 16% and 20% with PET, in 12% and 20% with visually correlated PET-CT and understaged in 6% and 4% with integrated PET-CT, versus 12% and 6% with CT, 38% and 10% with PET and 12% with visually correlated PET-CT. Integrated PET-CT improves the staging of lung cancer through a better anatomic localization and characterization of lesions and is superior to CT alone and PET alone. If this technique is not available, visual correlation of PET and CT can be a valuable alternative.Low dose non-enhanced CT versus standard dose contrast-enhanced CT in combined PET/CT protocols for staging and therapy planning in non-small cell lung cancer.To evaluate low dose non-enhanced CT and standard dose contrast-enhanced CT in combined PET/CT protocols for staging and therapy planning of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Retrospective analysis was performed of 50 consecutive patients with proven NSCLC who had been referred for primary staging (n=41) or restaging (n=9). All patients underwent a multi-phase PET/CT consisting of a low dose non-enhanced attenuation scan and an arterial and portal-venous contrast-enhanced CT scan followed by whole-body PET. Fused datasets of non-enhanced and contrast-enhanced PET/CT were compared per patient by using the TNM staging system, and per lesion regarding localisation, characterisation and delineation of tumour lesions. The staging results were validated either by histopathology or by clinical-radiological follow-up for >or=6 months.In 47/50 patients, the results of T staging did not differ between the two PET/CT protocols. Three patients could only be correctly classified as having T4 tumours after contrast application. Regarding N staging, both protocols yielded the same results. In M staging, there was only one patient with an improvement of the results as a result of contrast application. The lesion-based analysis of 92 sites showed no difference in the accuracy of lesion localisation and only one revision of lesion characterisation by contrast-enhanced PET/CT. The assessment of tumour delineation was altered by contrast application in 58/92 sites (p<0.0001). In 10/50 patients, contrast-enhanced PET/CT detected additional clinically important findings.In patients with advanced NSCLC, contrast-enhanced CT as part of the PET/CT protocol more accurately assessed the TNM stage in 8% of patients compared with non-contrast PET/CT. However, for planning of 3D conformal radiotherapy and non-conventional surgery, contrast-enhanced PET/CT protocols are indispensable owing to their superiority in precisely defining the tumour extent.Multimodality approach to mediastinal staging in non-small cell lung cancer. Faults and benefits of PET-CT: a randomised trial.Correct mediastinal staging is a cornerstone in the treatment of patients with non-small cell lung cancer. A large range of methods is available for this purpose, making the process of adequate staging complex. The objective of this study was to describe faults and benefits of positron emission tomography (PET)-CT in multimodality mediastinal staging.A randomised clinical trial was conducted including patients with a verified diagnosis of non-small cell lung cancer, who were considered operable. Patients were assigned to staging with PET-CT (PET-CT group) followed by invasive staging (mediastinoscopy and/or endoscopic ultrasound with fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA)) or invasive staging without prior PET-CT (conventional work up (CWU) group). Mediastinal involvement (dichotomising N stage into N0-1 versus N2-3) was described according to CT, PET-CT, mediastinoscopy, EUS-FNA and consensus (based on all available information), and compared with the final N stage as verified by thoracotomy or a conclusive invasive diagnostic procedure.A total of 189 patients were recruited, 98 in the PET-CT group and 91 in the CWU group. In an intention-to-treat analysis the overall accuracy of the consensus N stage was not significantly higher in the PET-CT group than in the CWU group (90% (95% confidence interval 82% to 95%) vs 85% (95% CI 77% to 91%)). Excluding the patients in whom PET-CT was not performed (n=14) the difference was significant (95% (95% CI 88% to 98%) vs 85% (95% CI 77% to 91%), p=0.034). This was mainly based on a higher sensitivity of the staging approach including PET-CT.An approach to lung cancer staging with PET-CT improves discrimination between N0-1 and N2-3. In those without enlarged lymph nodes and a PET-negative mediastinum the patient may proceed directly to surgery. However, enlarged lymph nodes on CT needs confirmation independent of PET findings and a positive finding on PET-CT needs confirmation before a decision on surgery is made.NCT00867412.Fusion positron emission/computed tomography underestimates the presence of hilar nodal metastases in patients with resected non-small cell lung cancer.The 5-year survival for patients with resected stage II (N1) non-small cell lung cancer ranges from 40% to 55%. No data exist addressing the benefit of neoadjuvant therapy for patients with stage II disease. This is largely in part due to the lack of a reliable, minimally invasive method to assess hilar nodes. This study is aimed at determining the ability of fusion positron emission/computed tomography (PET/CT) to identify hilar metastases in patients with resected non-small cell lung cancer.A retrospective review of surgically resected patients with fusion PET/CT within 30 days of resection was performed. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for PET/CT in detecting hilar nodal metastases was calculated for a range of maximum standardized uptake values (SUVmax). Hilar nodes from patients with falsely positive PET/CT scans were analyzed for the presence of histoplasmosis. Additionally, the impact of hilar node size greater than 1 centimeter on the calculated values was assessed.There were 119 patients evaluated. The number of lymph nodes resected ranged from 1 to 12 (X=2.98). There was decreased sensitivity and increased specificity with higher SUVmax cutoff values. At the standard SUVmax value of 2.5, the sensitivity and specificity were only 48.5% and 80.2%. The addition of size of hilar node by CT led to a modest improvement in sensitivity at all SUVmax cutoff values.Fusion PET/CT lacks sensitivity and specificity in identifying hilar nodal metastasis in patients with resected non-small cell lung cancer. Further prospective studies assessing the utility of PET/CT versus alternative sampling techniques are warranted.Diagnosis of the presence of lymph node metastasis and decision of operative indication using fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography and computed tomography in patients with primary lung cancer.We evaluate whether integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography and computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) scan can diagnose the presence of lymph node metastasis more accurately than computed tomography (CT) scan alone.Forty-two patients with lung cancer preoperatively underwent integrated PET/CT scan using FDG and CT scan and underwent pulmonary resection and lymph node dissection. We judged cases as lymph node metastasis if the lymph node visually accumulated FDG at PET/CT scan and measured 1 cm or greater in the short axis at CT scan. We retrospectively analyzed whether our judgments in each modality were consistent with the pathological diagnosis.Two-hundred and seventeen stations of lymph node were dissected and 21 stations (9.7%) were histologically diagnosed as positive metastasis. Thirty-two stations of lymph node visually accumulated FDG at PET/CT scan and 17 stations measured 1 cm or greater in the short axis at CT scan. Concerning the diagnosis of lymph node metastasis, PET/CT scan showed significantly higher sensitivity than CT scan (81% vs. 48%, p=0.024). The false-positive rate was significantly high in PET-positive lymph nodes measuring less than 1 cm in diameter. There were 4 false-negative lymph nodes with both scans. All of these were less than 7 mm in diameter and had a low percentage of metastatic foci in the lymph node. Concerning the diagnosis of N staging, there was no significant difference between PET/CT scan and CT scan (83% vs. 69%, p=0.124). However, the identification of N2 disease at PET/CT scan was significantly more accurate than that at CT scan (100% vs. 38%, p=0.031).PET/CT is superior to CT scan in lymph node staging. However, because the false-positive rate is high in PET-positive lymph nodes measuring less than 1 cm in diameter, we think that clinical background should be considered and other modalities or histological examinations should be undertaken if necessary. J. Med. Invest. 57: 305-313, August, 2010.Comparison of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography and mediastinoscopy in mediastinal staging of non-small cell lung cancer: analysis of 212 patients.Mediastinal staging is crucial to determine the prognosis and treatment options for patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). In this study, we compared the results of integrated positron emission tomography-computerised tomography (PET/CT) with those of mediastinoscopy in mediastinal staging of NSCLC patients.PET/CT and mediastinoscopy was performed on 250 consecutive patients diagnosed with NSCLC between September 2005 and March 2008. Thirty-eight patients were excluded from the study. Standard cervical mediastinoscopy was performed in all patients, and simultaneous extended cervical mediastinoscopy was performed in 52 patients with left sided lesions. Patients with negative mediastinoscopy underwent resection. The pathological results were correlated with PET/CT findings.A total of 212 patients (199 male, 13 female ; mean age : 58.3 years) were evaluated. In PET/CT analysis 60 true-positive, 45 false-positive, 103 true-negative and 4 false-negative patients were found. The rate of PET/CT positivity of mediastinal lymph nodes was 49.5%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and accuracy for PET/CT were 93.8%, 69.6%, 57.1%, 96.3% and 76.9% respectively. The incidence of N2 disease in NSCLC patients with negative mediastinal lymph node uptake on PET/CT was 3.7% (4 of 107). In univariate analysis, right upper lobe tumours were significantly (p < 0.05) more associated with occult N2 disease.In patients with positive mediastinal lymph node uptake on PET/CT invasive mediastinal staging appears necessary for exact staging. Mediastinoscopy can be omitted in NSCLC patients with negative mediastinal uptake on PET/CT in regions where the rate of PET/CT positivity of mediastinal lymph nodes is high.Imaging of proliferation with 18F-FLT PET/CT versus 18F-FDG PET/CT in non-small-cell lung cancer.To compare the diagnostic efficacies of (18)F-FLT and (18)F-FDG PET/CT in non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC), focusing on the correlation between FLT and FDG tumour uptake and tumour cell proliferation as indicated by the cyclin D1 labelling index.A total of 31 patients with NSCLC underwent FLT and FDG PET/CT scanning followed by surgery. PET/CT images were compared with the pathology. Tumour cell proliferation was assessed by cyclin D1 immunohistochemistry.The sensitivities of FLT and FDG PET/CT for the primary lesion were 74% and 94%, respectively (p=0.031). For N staging, 77% patients were correctly staged, 6% overstaged, 16% understaged by FLT, while the values for FDG were 77%, 16% and 6%, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and positive predictive value with FLT for lymph nodes were 65%, 98%, 93% and 89%, respectively, and 85%, 84%, 84% and 52% with FDG (p<0.01).Tumour SUV of FLT was significantly correlated with the cyclin D1 labelling index (r=0.644; p<0.01), but the SUV of FDG was not significantly correlated (r=0.293; p>0.05).In terms of N staging, FLT PET/CT resulted in understaging of more patients but overstaging of fewer patients, and for regional lymph nodes showed better specificity, accuracy and positive predictive value than FDG PET/CT in NSCLC. Tumour FLT uptake was correlated with tumour cell proliferation as indicated by the cyclin D1 labelling index, suggesting that further studies are needed to evaluate the use of FLT PET/CT for the assessment of therapy response to anticancer drugs.[Value of endobronchial ultrasound-transbronchial needle aspiration biopsy for diagnosis of PET-CT positive mediastinal lymph nodes].To evaluate the clinical value of endobronchial ultrasound-transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) biopsy for diagnosis of PET-CT positive mediastinal lymph nodes.One hundred and twenty-six patients with lung cancer undergoing both PET-CT scanning and EBUS-TBNA biopsy in the First Affiliated Hospital of Guanzhou Medical College from July 2008 to August 2010 were included in this study. There were 89 male and 37 female patients with a mean age of 56.3 years (range 34 to 81 years). (18)FDG-PET was considered positive in mediastinal nodes if the PET-CT reported hypermetabolic activity consistent with malignant disease (standardized uptake value > 2.5). All of the patients were clinically followed up.Among the 126 patients, 185 stations of lymph nodes were punctured. The mean diameter of the nodes was 13.6 mm and the range was 6 - 23 mm. There were no procedural complications. The diagnostic accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of EBUS-TBNA were 95.7%, 95.7%, and 100%, respectively.EBUS-TBNA is a minimally invasive, highly effective and accurate, practical and safe procedure for diagnosis of PET-CT positive mediastinal lymph nodes.[Utility of PET/CT for mediastinal staging of non-small cell lung cancer in stage III (N2)].To evaluate the accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography with (18)F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) and computed tomography (PET/CT) in mediastinal lymph node staging in patients with potentially operable (N2) non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and to ascertain the role of invasive staging in verifying positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) results.A retrospective study of consecutive patients with pathologically-proven NSCLC and N2 staging by enhanced CT was performed. A PET/CT scan was performed for all the patients. Lymph node staging was pathologically confirmed when it was possible or by consensus in the Thoracic Cancer Committee. Sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value and positive predictive value of PET/CT in N2 cases were determined.A total of 34 patients with N2 by CT were evaluated. PET/CT showed N2 in 30 patients. Discrepancies were found in four patients, two patients were classified as N1 in PET/CT and two patients as N0. Lymph node staging was pathologically confirmed in 20 patients. No false positives were found in PET/CT study. Sensitivity was 94.7%, specificity and positive predictive values were 100% and negative predictive value was 50%.Our data show that integrated PET/CT provides high sensitivity and positive predictive value in mediastinal nodal staging of NSCLC patients. Therefore, in patients with potentially resectable lung cancer, neoadjuvant chemotherapy candidate, mediastinoscopy could be reserved for restaging after induction therapy.Pattern and predictors of false positive lymph node involvement on positron emission tomography in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.Objectives The aim of this study was to elucidate the optimal parameters for diagnosing false positive (FP) lymph nodes (LNs) in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.Methods We reviewed 292 patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) imaging was performed at 1 hour (early) post-FDG injection and repeated 2 hours (delayed) after injection. We analyzed the relationship between the pathology of LNs and the results of PET, and the percent change in the standardized uptake value (%ΔSUV) between the two time-points.Results Eighteen of 46 cases (39.1%) in the FP group showed higher SUVs for their LNs compared with those for primary tumor, whereas 13.2% in the true positive group (p = 0.032) had higher SUVs for their LNs. Thirty-four of 36 cases in the true positive group had %ΔSUV ranging from 0% to 61.5% compared with only 13 of 33 in the FP group. Twenty out of 22 cases (90.9%) where %ΔSUV was over 61.5% or under 0% were considered as FP.Conclusions Patients with higher SUVs for LNs than for primary tumors and patients with extremely high or low %ΔSUVs tended to have FP LNs.Efficacy of helical dynamic CT versus integrated PET/CT for detection of mediastinal nodal metastasis in non-small cell lung cancer.The purpose of our study was to compare the diagnostic efficacies of helical dynamic CT and integrated PET/CT for the prediction of mediastinal nodal metastasis in stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).One hundred forty-three patients with stage T1 NSCLC underwent both helical dynamic CT and integrated PET/CT followed by surgical nodal staging. In helical dynamic CT, patients were regarded to have stage N2 disease when a nodule showed a peak enhancement > or = 110 H or a net enhancement > or = 60 H. In integrated PET/CT, nodes were regarded as positive for malignancy when they showed > or = 3.5 in maximum standardized uptake value with a discrete margin and more 18F-FDG uptake than mediastinal structures. Sensitivities, specificities, and accuracies for mediastinal nodal metastasis detection were compared for helical dynamic CT and integrated PET/CT using the McNemar test.Of the 143 patients, 34 (24%) had positive mediastinal nodes. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for mediastinal nodal metastasis prediction on helical dynamic CT were 65% (22 of 34 patients), 89% (97 of 109), and 83% (119 of 143), respectively, whereas those on integrated PET/CT were 56% (19 of 34), 100% (109 of 109), and 90% (128 of 143). The p values were 0.664, < 0.001, and 0.015.In stage T1 NSCLC, contrast-enhanced helical dynamic CT better predicts, but not significantly so, mediastinal nodal metastasis than PET/CT, whereas PET/CT shows perfect specificity and higher accuracy than helical dynamic CT.The clinical impact of integrated FDG PET-CT on management decisions in patients with lung cancer.To retrospectively evaluate the clinical impact of FDG PET-CT on the management pathway of patients with lung cancer.One hundred and sixty-one patients with suspected lung cancer undergoing FDG PET-CT during the study period were analyzed. Before PET-CT, lung cancer MDT recorded scan indication, conventional clinical stage, and proposed treatment plan. The accuracy of integrated PET-CT compared with stand alone CT in preoperative staging of lung cancer was evaluated with pathological staging used as the reference standard. The effect of PET-CT on the subsequent management of patients was also evaluated.The agreement between CT and integrated PET-CT in preoperative staging of lung cancer was significant (p<0.001). In 16 (10%) patients PET-CT excluded tumour as there was no FDG uptake. PET-CT revealed occult metastasis in 25 (16%) patients. It was also a better overall predictor for T status (64% vs. 58%) and N status (78% vs. 65%). For N staging PET-CT was more accurate for N1 (82% vs. 72%) and N2 (85% vs. 80%) disease. Regression analyses suggested that PET-CT was a better predictor of overall TNM staging for lung cancer. FDG PET scanning changed or influenced management decisions in 66 (41%) patients with lung cancer. Changes in TNM staging following PET-CT were significant predictors (p=0.02) in making a decision to abandon thoracotomies.Addition of PET-CT to comprehensive evaluation of lung cancer can have significant clinical impact. There is marked improvement in staging the disease. Patients were frequently spared unnecessary treatment, and management was more appropriately targeted. PET permits reduction in the number of thoracotomies performed for non-resectable disease with predicted reduction in the morbidity rate and cost associated with unnecessary interventions.Presurgical staging of non-small cell lung cancer: positron emission tomography, integrated positron emission tomography/CT, and software image fusion.To compare the diagnostic accuracy of positron emission tomography (PET) and integrated PET/CT and to evaluate the performance of software fusion for staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Thirty-six patients (17 men and 19 women) with NSCLC underwent staging with integrated PET/CT followed by mediastinal lymph node dissection and tumor resection. Twenty-five of the 36 patients (69%) underwent separate CT studies for software fusion of images. Two blinded reviewers analyzed in consensus all PET images, and an experienced radiologist was added to assess integrated and software-fused PET/CT images. Histopathologic findings served as "gold standard" for determining the diagnostic accuracy of all modalities.Reviewers examining PET and integrated PET/CT classified T stage accurately in 67% (20 of 30 patients) and 97% (29 of 30 patients), respectively (p < 0.05). Overall, interpretations based on PET staged 57% (17 of 30 patients) correctly, over-staged 6 patients (20%), and under-staged 7 patients (23%). Interpretations based on integrated PET/CT correctly staged 83% (25 of 30 patients), over-staged 3 patients (10%), and under-staged 2 patients (7%). The overall staging accuracy of integrated PET/CT was significantly higher than that of PET (p < 0.05). Automatic software fusion of separately obtained PET and CT studies was successful in 68% of the patients but failed in 32%. In successful software fusion cases, the results of software fusion with regards to T stage and N stage were not different from integrated PET/CT.Integrated PET/CT compared with PET alone was associated with 26% points-greater overall diagnostic accuracy (p = 0.01). The software fusion method failed to provide acceptable co-registration in > 30% of the patients.Diagnostic performance of (18)F-FDG PET/CT for lymph node staging in patients with operable non-small-cell lung cancer and inflammatory lung disease.As (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) is taken up by inflammatory lymph nodes, it could be falsely interpreted as metastasis. Therefore, we evaluated the diagnostic ability of positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) for lymph node staging of lung cancer when inflammatory lung disease coexisted. Patients with operable non-small-cell lung cancer and FDG-avid lymph nodes were retrospectively classified into two groups; those with inflammatory lung disease (ILD) and those without it (NILD). Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis was performed for maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax), pattern of FDG uptake, maximum Hounsfield unit, and size, and then the areas under the ROC curves (AUCs) were compared between subgroups. There were 124 patients (ILD/NILD = 38/86) and 396 FDG-avid lymph nodes (ILD/NILD = 140/256). The average number of FDG-avid lymph nodes was greater in ILD (3.7 vs. 2.9, p = 0.039), whereas the proportion of metastasis was higher in NILD (25.4% vs. 11.4%, p = 0.002). With all N1-N3 lymph nodes and the NILD group, the AUC values of all four parameters were significantly greater than 0.5 (p < 0.05), and SUVmax was the most valuable parameter for lymph node metastasis. However, in the ILD group, only the AUC value of SUVmax was significantly greater than 0.5. These results were reproduced when analyses were performed with N1-N2 lymph nodes. In conclusion, SUVmax was the most valuable PET/CT parameter for assessment of lymph node metastasis in patients with operable non-small-cell lung cancer. In addition, it was the only valuable parameter when inflammatory lung disease coexisted.[The value of extra-lung lesions on ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT in improving diagnosis of lung cancer].¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT has several shortcomings in discriminating between lung carcinoma and pulmonary benign lesions. The aims of the present study is to explore the value of extra-lung lesions on ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT image in the diagnosis of lung cancer.A total of 126 suspected lung cancer patients underwent ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT scan. Preliminary diagnoses were based on the PET characteristics, SUVmean value, and CT characteristics of the lesions in the lung, and the diagnoses were modified based on the detected extra-lung lesions. The difference between the two methods and their disparity were calculated.Extra-lung lesions were identified on the PET/CT image in 81 patients; extra-lung metastasis modified 13 probable malignancies to affirmative malignancy and 1 probable malignancy to benign lesion. Non-metastasis modified 2 probable malignancies to affirmative malignancy and 1 probable malignancy to benign lesion. Fifteen were correct, whereas 2 were misdiagnosed. The diagnoses modification rate was 13.5% (17/126), and the modified diagnoses accuracy is 88.2% (15/17).Extra-lung lesions demonstrated on ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT improved the diagnostic accuracy of lung cancer. Tuberculosis was identified as the most important reason for false positive diagnoses after modification by extra-lung lesions.Integrated positron-emission tomography for nodal staging in lung cancer.As lymph node metastasis is the most important factor determining the surgical outcome of lung cancer, we evaluated the accuracy and clinical usefulness of functional imaging with integrated positron-emission tomography and computed tomography in nodal staging of non-small-cell lung cancer. Between October 2003 and August 2004, 43 newly diagnosed patients underwent curative surgical resection or mediastinoscopic nodal biopsy after chest computed tomography as well as whole-body functional imaging for clinical staging. Based on histopathologic findings in the lymph nodes, we compared the diagnostic usefulness of computed tomography and functional imaging. Twenty-two patients were N0 stage, 6 were N1, 11 were N2, and 4 were N3. Although functional imaging seemed to be superior for evaluation of N2 nodes, there were no significant differences in the sensitivity, specificity, positive-predictive value, negative-predictive value, or accuracy. The situation was similar for N1 nodes, and there were no significant differences except for the false-negative rate. High false-positive and negative-rates for N2 lymph nodes suggest that functional imaging should not replace mediastinoscopy.Standard uptake value of positron emission tomography in clinical stage I lung cancer: clinical application and pathological correlation.The aim of this study was to assess the standard uptake value in clinical stage I non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and its correlation with pathological status and prognosis.We retrospectively reviewed 674 patients diagnosed with NSCLC between January 2002 and June 2005. Patients with clinical stage I diseases undergone a preoperative positron emission tomography-computed tomography scan followed by anatomic resection. We reviewed the clinical features of 152 patients with an average follow-up of 87 months.We analysed the clinical features of 108 patients with stage I NSCLC and 44 patients with non-stage I NSCLC. There were no statistical differences in age, histological type, location or tumour differentiation between the two groups. In the Stage I group, the patients had lower maximum standard uptake value (SUVmax; 3.80 ± 3.17 vs 5.73 ± 3.65, P = 0.001), lower carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels (2.86 ± 4.80 vs 9.11 ± 17.21 ng/ml, P = 0.027) and smaller tumour size (2.39 ± 0.98 vs 3.73 ± 2.04 cm, P < 0.001). The patients with higher SUVmax had a more advanced pathological stage, poorer tumour differentiation and larger tumour size. A higher SUVmax was an independent factor predicting an advanced pathological stage (SUVmax ≥ 3.3, odds ratio 3.246). The median survival of patients with SUVmax ≥ 3.3 and SUVmax <3.3 were 64.32 and 53.08 months, respectively (P = 0.654).Higher preoperative 18-fluorodeoxyglucose uptake by a tumour was significantly associated with an advanced pathological stage but not correlated with a poorer prognosis. An aggressive preoperative work-up for occult N2 disease should be emphasized, avoiding inappropriate thoracotomy.Integrated PET/CT in non small cell lung cancer staging--clinical and pathological agreement.Integrated PET/CT has become a fundamental tool in the preoperative assessment of non small lung cancer (NSCLC) providing useful anatomical and metabolic information to characterize tumoral lesions and to detect unsuspected metastatic disease.To compare the agreement between clinical and pathological staging before and after the use of PET/CT.Retrospective study of patients with NSCLC who underwent potentially curative surgery throughout 10.5 years. Cohen's kappa coefficient was used to evaluate staging agreement.One hundred and fifty patients were evaluated, 78% males, with a mean age of 65 (±9.6) years. Thirteen percent were submitted to neoadjuvant chemotherapy. PET/CT was performed in 41%. Global agreement between clinical and pathological staging was 51% (kappa=0.3639). There was a statistically significant difference between the staging results in patients who underwent PET/CT, when compared to the subgroup who did not (p=0.003). For those with PET/CT false negatives occurred in less 39%, false positives in more 12% and clinical and pathological staging coincided in more 27%. The overall results reflected an improvement in the agreement between clinical and pathological staging in the PET/CT subgroup (67%, kappa=0.5737 vs 40%, kappa=0.2292). PET/CT accuracy was enhanced when patients re-staged after neoadjuvant therapy were excluded and a substantial staging agreement was obtained for those who had the exam only for staging purposes (73%, kappa=0.6323).Inclusion of PET/CT in NSCLC preoperative assessment improved the accuracy of the clinical staging, with a good level of agreement with pathological staging.Lymph node metastasis diagnosis using positron emission tomography with 2-[18F] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose as a tracer and computed tomography in surgical cases of non-small cell lung cancer.Positron emission tomography with 2-[18F] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose as a tracer and computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) are utilized for the diagnosis of lymph node (LN) metastasis from lung cancer. In this study, we analyzed the diagnostic ability of FDG-PET for N staging by focusing on the clinical features of false-positive (FP) and false-negative (FN) cases.From March 2006 to February 2010, 112 patients underwent preoperative examinations using FDG-PET/CT followed by radical resection with hilar and mediastinal dissection. We analyzed their clinicopathological characteristics based on preoperative FDG-PET/CT findings and post-operative histopathological diagnosis of resected LNs.Based on the PET/CT results, 17 patients were misdiagnosed (9 FN and 8 FP). The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and negative and positive predictive values for N1/N2 were 50.0, 94.5, 84.0, 93.0 and 58.3%, respectively, whereas those for N2 were 57.8, 90.3, 84.8, 90.3 and 61.1%, respectively. FP findings more frequently occurred in cases with elevated white blood cell (WBC) count (P=0.015) and smokers (P=0.04). In the FN group, the maximum standardized uptake value for the primary tumour was lower than that in the true-positive (TP) group (P=0.01). The short-axis sizes of 71 LNs differently diagnosed by PET/CT and histopathology findings were significantly smaller in the FN group than the TP group (P<0.001), whereas there was no difference between TP and FP. As for FN LNs in the TP group, there was no significant difference.PET/CT showed a good ability to detect metastatic LNs, especially for N2 diagnosis. However, there were some limitations, especially in cases with elevated peripheral WBC count and/or smoking history.The role of integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography in the assessment of nodal spread in cases with non-small cell lung cancer.Integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET/CT) scanning has become the standard for oncologic imaging. We sought to determine the role of PET/CT in mediastinal non-small cell lung cancer staging. One hundred and twenty-seven consecutive patients were enrolled in the study where PET/CT was performed due to pathologically defined non-small cell carcinoma from a single center. They all underwent complete resection with a thoracotomy and systemic lymph node dissection (SLND) between October 2005 and January 2007. Postoperative pathology results of lymph node stations regarding the nodal spread and stage were compared with clinical stage obtained by PET/CT. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, negative predictive value (NPV) and positive predictive value (PPV) of PET/CT in N2 cases were determined to be 72.0%, 94.4%, 92.7%, 97.7% and 49.2%, respectively. Maximum standard uptake (SUV(max)) cut-off value for mediastinal N2 involvement in PET/CT was obtained by applying 'receiver operating characteristic' (ROC) analysis that was set to 5.2. Correct stage with PET/CT was established in 76.3% of cases. Staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), according to the PET/CT for which we determined 97.79% NPV, we consider that thoracotomy without preoperative mediastinal invasive staging in cases of negative mediastinal involvement in PET/CT can be certainly performed.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography integrated with computed tomography to determine resectability of primary lung cancer.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography integrated with computed tomography (FDGPET/CT) was evaluated as a routine staging technique for primary lung cancer.We prospectively compared FDG-PET/CT in determining clinical stage and surgical indication with conventional staging not including positron emission tomography (PET). A total of 50 consecutive patients diagnosed with primary lung cancer by cytological or histological examination were studied; 20 of them underwent surgery.Discrepancies between the two staging methods were observed in 14 patients (28%). The stage assigned by PET increased in 12 cases (24%) and decreased in 2 (4%). PET staging was accurate in eight cases with otherwise undetected distant metastases (M1) but was incorrect in six cases, including five where it overdiagnosed nodal metastases (N). Two clinical N3 patients (4%) would have missed a chance of surgery if the surgical indication had been determined by PET staging alone. According to our criteria for surgery, other patients were assigned correctly to surgery by PET staging. The maximum standard uptake value (maxSUV) of all primary lesions ranged from 0 to 23.0 (mean +/- SD, 8.0 +/- 4.4). The mean maxSUV among surgical cases (5.8 +/- 3.6) was significantly smaller than among nonsurgical cases (9.5 +/- 4.2) (P < 0.05).Staging examination including FDG-PET/CT and brain magnetic resonance imaging ordinarily can determine the clinical stage and resectability of primary lung cancer. False-positive findings in regional lymph nodes, possibly reflecting past infectious disease, are the most important remaining problem.[Comparing serum tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan with PET-CT for lung cancer diagnosis].Positron emission tomography-computed tomography (PET-CT) is a new bio-imaging system which combined metabolic with anatomic imaging. This system has better three-dimensional definition and earlier tumor detection potential. This study was to compare the accuracy of tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan with PET-CT for lung cancer diagnosis and staging.A total of 43 lung cancer patients diagnosed by operation or acupuncture, received breast CT scan, tumor antigen detection, and PET-CT scan, were selected. The accuracies of these 2 methods and their impacts on lung cancer staging were compared.The accurate diagnosis rate of tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan was 67.44%, and that of PET-CT scan was 90.70%. Local focus detection rates were 86.05% and 95.35%, respectively; mediastinal lymph nodes detection rates were 65.12% and 83.72%, respectively. PET-CT detected 6 cases of distant metastasis which were not detected by tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan. Compared with CT scan, 5 (11.63%) cases were upstaged and 7 (16.28%) cases were downstaged by PET-CT, which led to therapeutic strategy changes in 4 (9.3%) cases.Compare with tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan, PET-CT scan is more sensitive and accurate in diagnosing and staging lung cancer.Mediastinal lymph node staging by means of positron emission tomography is less sensitive in elderly patients with non-small-cell lung cancer.We sought to identify the impact of age on the sensitivity and specificity of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET-CT; CT) on mediastinal lymph node staging of patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC).We conducted a retrospective review of 206 consecutive patients with histologically proven NSCLC who underwent resection and/or mediastinoscopy in our center between September 2004 and January 2007. All of these patients had preoperative staging with integrated PET-CT as an adjunct to chest CT before resection and/or mediastinoscopy. Diabetic patients and patients who received neoadjuvant chemotherapy were excluded. The pathologic results of all of these cases were reviewed and correlated with those on CT and integrated PET-CT.The sensitivity and positive predictive values (PPV) of PET-CT in mediastinal nodal staging were significantly lower in elderly patients (age>or=65 years; sensitivity, 42%; PPV, 66%) than in younger patients (age<65 years; sensitivity, 52%; PPV, 74%). Specificity and negative predictive values were similar in both groups.PET-CT staging of the mediastinum is less sensitive in elderly patients with NSCLC who have a lower PPV. Positive mediastinal uptake on PET-CT should be verified by mediastinoscopy, irrespective of age. Elderly patients with positive mediastinal uptake should not be refuted a curative intent surgical resection on the basis of positive mediastinal uptake alone.[The advantage of Positron Emission Tomography combined with Computer Tomography (PET-CT) in the diagnosis of lung cancer (experience with 408 patients)].The authors analyzed the results of PET-CT scans made with oncological indications among 408 patients. One hundred and fifty-four PET-CTs were done to characterize pulmonary foci, after which in 59 cases lung surgery was performed. The method's sensitivity in respect to malignancy was 100%, specificity was 56%. Staging of affected lymph nodes resulted in 17 mediastinoscopies and 54 thoracotomies. In the former indications PET-CT-positive lymph nodes always need cytologic/histologic verification. M-staging done with PET-CT was performed in 141 cases, mediastinal restaging of patients having received neoadjuvant chemotherapy was done in 24 cases. The latter indications we consider superfluous because of the diagnostic inaccuracy of PET-CT. In 175 cases we analyzed the frequently determining factor of the PET-CT scan in the indication of lung surgery. The authors wish to share their experience for the better use of this method and to accelerate the inclusion of PET-CT into the diagnostic protocol.Standard PET/CT of the chest during shallow breathing is inadequate for comprehensive staging of lung cancer.The incidence of malignancy associated with subcentimeter pulmonary nodules (micronodules) in patients with malignant disease has been reported to be as high as 58%. Thus, detection of small lung nodules is important for appropriate staging of lung cancer. Because of respiratory motion, small parenchymal lung lesions can be missed on CT acquired during shallow breathing. Micronodules are usually too small to be characterized reliably with 18F-FDG PET. We aimed to determine the incidence of missed pulmonary micronodules on PET/CT studies acquired during shallow breathing.The study included 142 consecutive cancer patients (62 male and 80 female; mean age, 54 y) who underwent whole-body PET/CT during shallow breathing and breath-hold CT of the chest during maximal inspiration. CT findings were reviewed independently, and noncalcified nodules missed on the shallow-breathing scan were evaluated for size, location, and metabolic activity.Breath-hold chest CT detected an additional 125 parenchymal lung nodules (mean size, 3.4 +/- 1.6 mm; range, 1-9 mm) in 48 (34%) of the 142 patients. In these patients, 3 nodules, on average, were missed during shallow breathing. In 18 patients (13%), micronodules were identified exclusively on breath-hold images. None of the missed nodules demonstrated 18F-FDG uptake.Acquisition of standard PET/CT chest images during shallow breathing is inadequate for comprehensive cancer staging.Preoperative staging of non-small-cell lung cancer: comparison of whole-body diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging and 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography.To investigate the diagnostic value of whole-body magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) including diffusion-weighted imaging with background signal suppression (DWIBS) for preoperative assessment of non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) in comparison to (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (18)FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT).Thirty-three patients with suspected NSCLC were enrolled. Patients were examined before surgery with PET/CT and whole-body MRI including T1-weighted turbo spin echo (TSE), T2-weighted short tau inversion recovery (STIR) and DWIBS sequences (b = 0/800). Histological or cytological specimens were taken as standard of reference.Whole-body MRI with DWIBS as well as PET/CT provided diagnostic image quality in all cases. Sensitivity for primary tumour detection: MRI 93%, PET/CT 98%. T-staging accuracy: MRI 63%, PET/CT 56%. N-staging accuracy: MRI 66%, PET/CT 71%. UICC staging accuracy: MRI 66%, PET/CT 74%. Sensitivity for metastatic involvement of individual lymph node groups: MRI 44%, PET/CT 47%. Specificity for individual non-metastatic lymph node groups: MRI 93%, PET/CT 96%. Assessment accuracy for individual lymph node groups: MRI 85%, PET/CT 88%. Observer agreement rate for UICC staging: MRI 74%, PET/CT 90%.Whole-body MRI with DWIBS provides comparable results to PET/CT in staging of NSCLC, but shows no superiority. Most relevant challenges for both techniques are T-staging accuracy and sensitivity for metastatic lymph node involvement.Numerous radiological methods are available for the crucial staging of lung cancer. Whole-body DWIBS MRI provides comparable results to PET/CT in NSCLC staging. No evident superiority of whole-body DWIBS over PET/CT in NSCLC staging. Challenges for both techniques are T-staging and detection of small metastases.Positron emission tomography may underestimate the extent of thoracic disease in lung cancer patients.Although widely utilised in the staging of lung cancer various studies have questioned whether the accuracy of this staging modality is sufficient to replace conventional invasive staging techniques. We have therefore reviewed our experience in order to assess the accuracy of PET CT as an intrathoracic staging tool for non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Two hundred patients referred for surgery between June 2006 and January 2008 underwent PET CT followed by staging mediastinoscopy and, if appropriate, resection. Results of scans and histopathology were correlated and analysed.Overall, PET CT correctly staged 99 out of 200 patients (49.5%), under-staged 59 (29.5%), and over-staged 42 (21%). Superior mediastinal nodes were incorrectly staged by PET CT in 35 (19%) of 186 patients undergoing mediastinoscopy: in 15 (8%) mediastinoscopy revealed metastatic disease not detected on PET CT and 20 (11%) had negative histology despite a positive scan. Five (2.5%) resections were benign despite avid FDG uptake, and 6 (3%) were malignant despite a negative scan. PET CT had false positive result of 6.5%, 5.5%, 4.5% and 3.5%, respectively for hilar, station 2, 7 and 5 node groups. The false negative result was 12.5%, 10.5% and 8%, respectively for hilar, intrapulmonary and station 4 nodes. Twelve (6%) of patients were under-staged regarding chest wall and mediastinal invasion, and 10 (5%) patients had metastatic nodules in the lung (T4) not detected by PET CT. Stage I or II disease was identified by PET CT in 141 patients of whom 26 (18.4%) had IIIa or higher stage disease. The false positive and negative predictive values for PET CT with respect to N2 or greater status were 17.2% (11.8-24.2) and 48.6% (32.2-65.3), respectively.Our experience would suggest that PET CT alone is not sufficiently accurate to replace mediastinoscopy and other conventional biopsy techniques in the evaluation of NSCLC cases. It may better be viewed as a valuable additional tool with which to inform decision making and to screen for disseminated disease.Reliability of positron emission tomography-computed tomography in identification of mediastinal lymph node status in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.The involvement of mediastinal lymph nodes is a very important prognostic factor in patients with potentially resectable non-small cell lung cancer. Our aim in this study was to investigate the value of positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scanning in staging lung cancer, especially for mediastinal lymph node evaluation, and to determine whether this could decrease the need for mediastinoscopy.Seventy-eight patients with non-small cell lung cancer who were potential candidates for surgical resection and admitted to the thoracic surgery unit of our hospital from March 2006 to June 2008 joined this prospective study. Positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scanning was performed as part of the prospective studies used to diagnose or stage the tumors. All 78 patients underwent tissue sampling of mediastinal lymph nodes to compare these with imaging results. The diagnostic efficacy of the computed tomographic and positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scans compared with histopathologic findings were calculated with sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy.Final histology was available on 397 lymph node stations (N1, N2, and N3) sampled from 78 patients during mediastinoscopy or surgical intervention. Sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of mediastinal lymph node involvement in patients undergoing thoracic computed tomographic scanning were 45.4%, 80.5%, 27.7%, and 90%, respectively. The accuracy of computed tomographic scanning was 75.6%. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of mediastinal lymph node involvement in patients undergoing positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scanning were 81.8%, 89.5%, 56.2%, and 96.7%, respectively.There is a need for mediastinoscopy in positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scanning-positive mediastinal lymph nodes, but it might not be necessary for positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scanning-negative lymph nodes.[Application of ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT in pulmonary disease: a report of 419 cases].The application and the value of PET/CT in lung cancer are on the way to development. The aim of this study is to summarize the data from 419 patients with pulmonary tumor or tumor-like disease and to explore the appliance of PET/CT.From Dec 2007 to Aug 2011, 594 patients with pulmonary tumor or tumor-like disease underwent PET/CT examination during the different course of treatment, which were treated by single surgery team from Peking University Cancer Hospital. Of these patients, 419 cases diagnosed pathologically were included into study. The clinicapathological and follow-up data were collected to analyze the value of PET/CT in diagnosis, TNM staging, therapy response evaluation and posttherapy monitoring.Four hundred and nineteen cases comprised of 63 benign and 356 malignant, of which, 338 were primary lung cancer, and 18 were metastases. The SUVmax cutoff was defined as 2.5 to differentiate the benign and malignant disease. PET/CT obtained the role of diagnosis with sensitivity as 85.0%, specificity as 52.4%, accuracy rate as 79.2%, positive predictive value as 89.2% and negative predictive value as 42.9%, respectively. Of 338 primary cases, 275 underwent PET/CT at initial diagnosis, in which, 46 (16.7%) distant metastasis were found, including 8 additional metastasis not found by conventional utilities. Six of 43 recurrences were found by PET/CT following conventional examination. In T staging, SUVmax is positively correlated with diameter of tumors (P<0.05). In N staging, 610 stations of lymph nodes were resected from 168 cases, with 37 stations predicted as positive by PET/CT and 102 stations pathologically proven positive, therefore, calculating the sensitivity as 36.3%, specificity as 93.9%, accuracy rate as 84.3%, positive predictive value as 54.4% and negative predictive value as 88.0%, respectively. Ten patients underwent PET/CT scan for chemotherapy response evaluation, with SUVmax changing following T downstaging.PET/CT is one optional method for diagnosis of pulmonary tumors. In TNM staging, PET/CT showed the superiority than conventional utilities in M staging, but possesses the high specificity but inferior sensitivity in N staging. Therefore, PET/CT should be used as routine examination for postoperation follow-up. Furthermore, PET/CT performed the outstanding role in chemotherapy response evaluation.Maximum standard uptake value of mediastinal lymph nodes on integrated FDG-PET-CT predicts pathology in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.Positron emission tomography (PET) scans often help direct biopsies of mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), but the maximum standard uptake value (maxSUV) of individual nodes has not been evaluated.This is a prospective study of consecutive patients with NSCLC, all of whom underwent integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission-computed tomography (FDG-PET-CT) and had biopsy or resection of their mediastinal lymph nodes.There were 397 patients. One-hundred and forty-three patients had N2 disease and 1,252 N2 nodes were pathologically examined. The median maxSUV of the nodes that had metastatic disease were the following: for the 2R node, 10.4 (range, 0-18.6); for 4R, 8.6 (range, 0-18.3); for 5, 8.9 (range, 0-26.3); for 6, 7.6 (range, 0-19.6); for 7, 7.7 (range, 0-14); for 8 and 9, 5.4 (range, 0-8.9). The median maxSUV for all of the N2 nodes that were benign was 0 (range, 0-18.8) (p < 0.05 for all stations except for nodes 8 and 9). When a maxSUV of 5.3 is used the accuracy of integrated FDG-PET-CT for each N2 nodal station is maximized and is at least 92% for each.The maxSUV of individual mediastinal lymph nodes is a predictor of malignancy. There is overlap between false and true positives. Definitive biopsies are required to prove cancer irrespective of the maxSUV value. However, when a maxSUV of 5.3 is used instead of the traditional value of 2.5, the accuracy for FDG-PET-CT for each N2 nodal station increases to at least 92%.LUCIS: lung cancer imaging studies.Pulmonary nodules are of high clinical importance, as they may prove to be an early manifestation of lung cancer. Pulmonary nodules are small, focal opacities that may be solitary or multiple. A solitary pulmonary nodule (SPN) is a single, small (= 30 mm in diameter) radiographic opacity. Larger opacities are called masses and are often malignant. As imaging techniques improve and more nodules are detected, the optimal management of SPNs remains unclear. Current strategies include tissue sampling or CT follow-up. The aim of this PhD was to examine current non-invasive methods used to characterise pulmonary nodules and masses in patients with suspected lung cancer and to stage NSCLC. In doing so, this PhD helps to validate the existing methods used to diagnose and stage lung cancer correctly and, hopefully, aids in the development of new methods. In the first study, 213 participants with pulmonary nodules on CT were examined with an additional HRCT. In this study, it was concluded that HRCT of a solitary pulmonary nodule, assessed using attenuation and morphological criteria is a fast, widely available and effective method for diagnosing lung cancer correctly, and especially for ruling out cancer. In the second study, 168 patients with pulmonary lesions on CT were examined with an additional F-18-FDG PET/CT. It was concluded that when used early in the work-up of the lesions, CT raised the prevalence of lung cancer in the population to the point at which further diagnostic imaging examination could be considered redundant. Standard contrast-enhanced CT seems better suited to identify patients with lung cancer than to rule out cancer. Finally, the overall diagnostic accuracy as well as the classification probabilities and predictive values of the two modalities were not significantly different. The reproducibility of the above results was substantial. In the third study, 59 patients with pulmonary nodules or masses on chest radiography were examined with an additional DCE-CT. A qualitative as well as a quantitative assessment method was examined. It was concluded that although the results of the qualitative approach were acceptable in their own right, they did not, however, add anything new when compared to standard CT. The quantitative approach gave rise to several conclusions concerning DCE-CT analysis as well as the use of DCE-CT in the diagnosis of lung cancer: First, that DCE-CT is best analysed using logarithmic scale data transformation; second, that irrespective of the ROI method applied, it was not possible to discriminate malignant and benign; and, third, that the lack of reproducibility should be addressed. These results show us that DCE-CT is currently not a clinically feasible method for analysing pulmonary lesions. This does not necessarily mean that DCE-CT should be abandoned, but it does signify the need for further development of the current DCE-CT methods. Finally, in the fourth study, 114 patients with NSCLC were examined with both a CT and with an additional F-18-FDG PET/CT. It was concluded that there was no significant difference in the overall diagnostic accuracy of the two modalities when imaging the mediastinum for staging purposes. In conclusion, although standard contrast-enhanced CT has brought us far in the characterisation of pulmonary nodules and masses, the last decade has seen a constant move away from strictly anatomical approaches to imaging, towards more functional or analytical approaches. The desire is, of course, to be able to safely distinguish between malignant and benign nodules without the need for invasive procedures.Mediastinal nodal staging of nonsmall cell lung cancer using integrated 18F-FDG PET/CT in a tuberculosis-endemic country: diagnostic efficacy in 674 patients.Integrated (18)fluorine fluorodeoxyglucose ((18)F-FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) has shown somewhat variable sensitivity and specificity for mediastinal nodal staging in granulomatous disease endemic areas. The purpose of the study was to prospectively evaluate the efficacy of PET/CT for mediastinal nodal staging in nonsmall cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients in a tuberculosis-endemic country.Prospective assessment of the diagnostic efficacy of integrated PET/CT for detecting mediastinal nodal metastasis was performed in 674 patients (M:F ratio = 502:172; mean age, 61 years) with NSCLC. Patients underwent an integrated PET/CT examination and subsequent surgical nodal staging (by mediastinoscopy only in 121 patients and by thoracotomy in 553). Nodes showing greater (18)F-FDG uptake than mediastinum at PET without benign calcification or high attenuation >70 household unit (HU) at unenhanced CT were regarded as being positive for malignancy. The histologic nodal assessment results were used as reference standards.Of 2477 mediastinal nodal stations evaluated in 674 patients, 275 (11%) stations in 180 (27%) patients proved to be malignant. On a per-person basis, the overall sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of PET/CT for mediastinal nodal staging were 61% (110 of 180), 96% (473 of 494), and 86% (583 of 674), respectively. On a per-nodal station basis, they were 46% (126 of 275), 98% (2154 of 2202), and 92% (2280 of 2477).Integrated PET/CT provides high specificity and reasonably high accuracy, but somewhat low sensitivity for mediastinal nodal staging of NSCLCs. The high specificity is achieved at the expense of sensitivity by interpreting calcified nodes or nodes with high attenuation at CT, even with high FDG uptake at PET, as benign in a tuberculosis-endemic region.Diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging can be used in place of positron emission tomography for N staging of non-small cell lung cancer with fewer false-positive results.One of the deficiencies of positron emission tomography for N staging in lung cancer is a false-positive result caused by concurrent lymphadenitis. Recently, diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging has been reported to be able to image tumors of body organs. The aim of this study is to examine the usefulness of diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging for N staging of non-small cell lung cancer compared with positron emission tomography-computed tomography.Both positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging were prospectively used in 88 patients before surgical intervention for non-small cell lung cancer to examine 734 lymph node stations. The diagnostic results of positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging were compared. The diameters of the metastatic foci within lymph nodes were measured on hematoxylin and eosin-stained sections to compare the detectable size of metastatic foci between positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging.The accuracy of N staging in the 88 patients was 0.89 with diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging, which was significantly higher than the value of 0.78 obtained with positron emission tomography-computed tomography (P = .012), because of less overstaging in the former. Among the 734 lymph node stations examined pathologically, 36 had metastases, and the other 698 did not. Although there was no significant difference in the diagnosis of the 36 metastatic lymph node stations between the 2 methods, diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging was more accurate for diagnosing the 698 nonmetastatic stations than positron emission tomography-computed tomography because of fewer false-positive results (P = .002). The detectable size of metastatic foci within lymph nodes was 4 mm in both positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging.Diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging can be used in place of positron emission tomography-computed tomography for N staging of non-small cell lung cancer with fewer false-positive results compared with positron emission tomography-computed tomography.Advances in positron emission tomography technology have increased the need for surgical staging in non-small cell lung cancer.Pretreatment staging of patients with non-small cell lung cancer is critically important in determining an appropriate treatment plan. As positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) are proven complementary modalities in clinical staging, recent advances in PET technology have brought forth integrated PET/CT as the new standard. We tested the hypothesis that improvements in PET technology have not increased the sensitivity or specificity of PET in the staging of non-small cell lung cancer to an extent that surgical staging is no longer required.This is a retrospective, single-institution review of 336 patients from 1995 to 2005 with biopsy-proven non-small cell lung cancer who underwent [18F] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-PET before mediastinal lymph node sampling by cervical mediastinoscopy or thoracotomy. Clinical records, histopathologic reports, and PET findings were reviewed. Data were analyzed by the Pearson chi2 test.Within the study population, 210 patients had routine PET and 126 had integrated PET/CT. For detecting mediastinal metastases the sensitivities of PET versus integrated PET/CT were 61.1% versus 85.7% (P < .05), specificities were 94.3% versus 80.6% (P < .001), positive predictive values were 68.8% versus 55.8%, negative predictive values were 92.1% versus 95.2%, and overall accuracy was 88.6% versus 81.7%.Improvements in PET technology have increased integrated PET/CT sensitivity at the cost of significantly decreased specificity. Although it may appear that integrated PET/CT incurs fewer false negative results, the dramatic increase in false positive results reinforces the notion that integrated PET/CT should be used only as an adjunct to clinical staging and that surgical staging remains the gold standard in non-small cell lung cancer.Outcomes of mediastinoscopy and surgery with or without neoadjuvant therapy in patients with non-small cell lung cancer who are N2 negative on positron emission tomography and computed tomography.The objectives of this study were (1) to assess the results of mediastinoscopy and mediastinal lymphadenectomy and (2) to compare outcomes of surgical treatment with or without neoadjuvant therapy in patients with non-small cell lung cancer who are N2 negative on integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET/CT).This was a retrospective, single-institution review of patients with non-small cell lung cancer who were N2 negative on CT and PET/CT. All patients underwent mediastinoscopy; if N2 positive, patients underwent neoadjuvant therapy followed by pulmonary resection, and if N2 negative, patients underwent pulmonary resection with mediastinal lymphadenectomy.Between 2003 and 2007, there were 750 patients (547 men). Of these, 51 patients were N2 positive at mediastinoscopy and then underwent neoadjuvant therapy (mediastinoscopy N2 group), and 699 were N2 negative at mediastinoscopy and then underwent mediastinal lymphadenectomy. Mediastinal lymphadenectomy revealed that 635 had N0 or N1 disease (N2-negative group), and 64 had N2 disease (surgery N2 group). Overall 5-year survival was 73% for the N2-negative group, 44% for the surgery N2 group, and 47% for the mediastinoscopy N2 group. Disease-free 5-year survival was 59% for the N2-negative group, 27% for the surgery N2 group, and 29% for the mediastinoscopy N2 group.We found that there were no significant differences in overall and disease-free survivals between the surgery N2 group and the mediastinoscopy N2 group. The benefit of neoadjuvant therapy in patients with PET/CT-negative but mediastinoscopy-positive N2 disease should be confirmed by randomized studies.Evaluation of pulmonary nodules and lung cancer with one-inch crystal gamma coincidence positron emission tomography/CT versus dedicated positron emission tomography/CT.Dedicated positron emission tomography (PET)/CT scanners using BGO and related detectors (d-PET) have become standard imaging instruments in many malignancies. Hybrid gamma camera systems using NaI detectors in coincidence mode (g-PET) have been compared to d-PET but reported usefulness has been variable when gamma cameras with half-inch to three-fourth-inch thick crystals have been used without CT. Our aim was to compare g-PET with a 1-in.-thick crystal and inbuilt CT for lesion localization and attenuation correction (g-PET/CT) and d-PET/CT in patients presenting with potential and confirmed lung malignancies. One hour after (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG), patients underwent BGO d-PET/CT from jaw to proximal thigh. This was followed by one to two bed position g-PET/CT 194 +/- 27 min after FDG. Each study pair was independently analysed with concurrent CT. d-PET/CT was interpreted by a radiologist experienced in both PET and CT, and g-PET/CT by consensus reading of an experienced PET physician and an experienced CT radiologist. A TNM score was assigned and studies were then unblinded and compared. Fifty-seven patients underwent 58 scan pairs over 2 years. Eighty-nine per cent concordance was shown between g-PET/CT and d-PET/CT for the assessment of intrapulmonary lesions, with 100% concordance for intrapulmonary lesions >10 mm (36 of 36). Eighty-eight per cent (51 of 58) concordance was shown between g-PET/CT and d-PET/CT for TNM staging. Coincidence imaging using an optimized dual-head 1-in.-thick crystal gamma camera with inbuilt CT compares reasonably well with dedicated PET/CT for evaluation of indeterminate pulmonary lesions and staging of pulmonary malignancies and may be of some value when d-PET/CT is not readily available.Regional nodal staging with 18F-FDG PET-CT in non-small cell lung cancer: Additional diagnostic value of CT attenuation and dual-time-point imaging.[Fluorine-18]-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography ((18)F-FDG PET-CT) is widely performed in the regional nodal staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). However, the uptake of (18)F-FDG by tubercular granulomatous tissues may lead to false-positive diagnosis. This is of special concern in China, where tubercular granulomatous disease is epidemic. Herein, we evaluated the efficacy of an additional CT attenuation and a dual-time-point scan in determining the status of lymph nodes.Eighty NSCLC patients underwent curative surgical resection after (18)F-FDG PET-CT and separate breath-hold CT examinations. The initial images were analyzed by two methods. In method 1, nodal status was determined by (18)F-FDG uptake only. In Method 2, nodal status was determined by (18)F-FDG uptake associated with CT attenuation. For dual-time-point imaging, the retention index (RI) of benign and malignant nodal groups with positive uptake in the initial scan was examined.A total of 265 nodal groups were documented. On a per-nodal-group basis, the diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of Method 1 were 66.7%, 89.7%, and 85.3%, respectively, whereas those of Method 2 were 64.7%, 96.7%, and 90.6%, respectively. The improvement in diagnostic specificity and accuracy associated with the addition of CT attenuation in Method 2 as compared to Method 1 was statistically significant (p<0.01). Thirty-nine nodal groups with positive uptake in the initial scan underwent dual-time-point imaging and the difference in the RI between benign and malignant groups showed no statistical significance (p>0.05).(18)F-FDG PET-CT has high diagnostic value for preoperative lymph-node (N) staging of NSCLC patients. We show that (18)F-FDG uptake combined with CT attenuation improves the diagnostic specificity and accuracy of nodal diagnosis in NSCLC. For the lymph nodes with positive uptake in the initial scan, dual-time-point imaging has limited effect in differentiation.The correlation of SUVmax with pathological characteristics of primary tumor and the value of Tumor/ Lymph node SUVmax ratio for predicting metastasis to lymph nodes in resected NSCLC patients.We aimed to investigate the correlation of maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) with pathological characteristics of primary tumor and to determine a Tumor/ Lymph node (T/LN) SUVmax ratio predicting metastasis to lymph nodes in NSCLC patients.Eighty-one NSCLC patients who had PET/CT examination at initial staging and subsequently underwent surgical resection were retrospectively evaluated. There were 100 PET/CT positive mediastinal or hilar lymph node stations. Pathological characteristics of the tumor such as largest tumor diameter, tumor histology, differentiation, number of mitosis, degree of stromal inflammation, necrosis; etiology of PET/CT positive lymph node stations; SUVmax of primary tumor and positive lymph node stations were recorded. A T/LN SUVmax ratio was calculated for each lymph node station.SUVmax of the primary tumor was positively correlated with the largest tumor diameter (p=0.001, r=0.374), number of mitosis (p<0.001, r=0.405), and postoperative pathological stage (p=0.007, r=0.298). Patients with squamous cell carcinoma had a statistically significant higher mean SUVmax, number of mitosis and advanced N stages compared to adenocarcinoma. The etiology of 100 PET/CT positive lymph node stations were metastasis in 14, anthracosis in 40, reactive in 39, granulomatous in 4, and silicosis in 3 patients. A T/LN SUVmax ratio of 5 or lower was suggestive for a malignant lymph node with a sensitivity of 92.8% and specificity of 47%.SUVmax of a primary tumor is related to certain pathological characteristics, such as largest diameter, histology, and number of mitosis. A T/LN SUVmax ratio lower than 5 predicts the metastasis to lymph nodes with a high sensitivity.Diffusion-weighted MR imaging in comparison to integrated [¹⁸F]-FDG PET/CT for N-staging in patients with lung cancer.The purpose of this study was to prospectively determine the diagnostic accuracy of diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) using MRI in the staging of thoracic lymph nodes in patients with lung cancer, and to compare the performance to that of PET/CT.20 consecutive patients (pts) with histologically proven lung cancer were included in this study. In all pts FDG-PET/CT was routinely performed to stage lung carcinoma. Additionally, MRI (1.5T) was performed including native T1w, T1w post contrast medium, T2w, and DWI sequences. Regarding the N stage based on the results of the PET/CT there were 5 patients with N0, 3 patients with N1, 5 patients with N2 and 7 patients with N3. Image analysis was performed by two radiologists (R1 and R2), respectively. The reviewers had to chose between 1 (at least one lymph node within a station is malignant) or 0 (no lymph nodes suspicious for malignancy). First the T1 post contrast sequence was analyzed. In a second step the DWI sequence (b=800) was analyzed. Both steps were performed in a blinded fashion.MR imaging with or without DWI only agreed with the results of the PET/CT regarding the N stage in 80% of the patients-15% were understaged and 5% overstaged. There was excellent interobserver agreement; the N-staging result only differed in 1 patient for DWI, resulting in correlation coefficients of 0.98 for DWI and 1.0 for MRI. Compared to PET-CT MRI overstaged one and understaged 4 patients, while DWI overstaged one and understaged 3 patients. This resulted in correlation coefficients of 0.814 (R1 and R2) for MRI and 0.815 (R1) and 0.804 (R2) for DWI. Regarding the ADC values there were no significant differences between ipsilateral hilar (1.03 mm(2)/s ± 0.13), subcarinal (0.96 mm(2)/s±0.24), ipsilateral mediastinal (1.0mm(2)/s ± 0.18), contralateral mediastinal (0.93 mm(2)/s ± 0.23) and supraclavicular (0.9 mm(2)/s ± 0.23) lymph nodes.Diffusion-weighted imaging does not show a clear advantage over conventional MR protocols in the N-staging of lung cancer. MRI with or without DWI shows a moderately correlation with PET/CT with a tendency for understaging.Positron emission tomography in staging early lung cancer: a randomized trial.Among patients with early-stage non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), preoperative imaging tests are important in defining surgical candidates.To assess whether whole-body positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET-CT) plus cranial imaging correctly upstages cancer in more patients with NSCLC than does conventional staging plus cranial imaging.Randomized clinical trial with recruitment from June 2004 to August 2007. The centralized, computer-generated, variable block size randomization scheme was stratified by treatment center and cancer stage. Participants, health care providers, and outcome assessors were not blinded to imaging modality assignment.8 hospitals and 5 PET-CT centers in academic institutions.Eligible patients were older than 18 years; had histologic or cytologic proof of stage I, II, or IIIA NSCLC on the basis of chest radiography and thoracic CT; and had a tumor considered to be resectable.PET-CT or conventional staging (abdominal CT and bone scan). All patients also had cranial imaging using CT or magnetic resonance imaging.The primary outcome was correct upstaging, thereby avoiding stage-inappropriate surgery. Secondary outcomes were incorrect upstaging and incorrect understaging.170 patients were assigned to PET-CT and 167 to conventional staging. Eight patients (3 who had PET-CT and 5 who had conventional staging) did not have planned surgery. Disease was correctly upstaged in 23 of 167 PET-CT recipients and 11 of 162 conventional staging recipients (13.8% vs. 6.8%; difference, 7.0 percentage points [95% CI, 0.3 to 13.7 percentage points]), thereby sparing these patients from surgery. Disease was incorrectly upstaged in 8 PET-CT recipients and 1 conventional staging recipient (4.8% vs. 0.6%; difference, 4.2 percentage points [CI, 0.5 to 8.6 percentage points]), and it was incorrectly understaged in 25 and 48 patients, respectively (14.9% vs. 29.6%; difference, 14.7 percentage points [CI, 5.7 to 23.4 percentage points]). At 3 years, 52 patients who had PET-CT and 57 patients who had conventional staging had died.The relatively small sample and the fact that some patients did not have planned surgery limited the ability to determine precise differences in clinical outcomes that were attributable to testing strategies.Preoperative staging with PET-CT and cranial imaging identifies more patients with mediastinal and extrathoracic disease than conventional staging, thereby sparing more patients from stage-inappropriate surgery, but the strategy also incorrectly upstaged disease in more patients.Mediastinoscopy might not be necessary in patients with non-small cell lung cancer with mediastinal lymph nodes having a maximum standardized uptake value of less than 5.3.Accurate pretreatment staging in non-small cell lung cancer remains tantamount in formulating an appropriate treatment plan. The maximum standardized uptake value obtained with integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography has been proposed to be a predictor of malignancy in mediastinal lymph nodes. A recent study has also suggested that accuracy of integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography might be improved by increasing the maximum standardized uptake value used for calling a lymph node positive from 2.5 to 5.3. We tested the hypotheses that the maximum standardized uptake value is a predictor of individual lymph node metastasis in non-small cell lung cancer and that pathologic staging with mediastinoscopy might not be necessary in patients with a maximum standardized uptake value of less than 5.3 in their mediastinal lymph nodes.This is a retrospective review of 765 lymph nodes sampled from 110 patients in a single institution with biopsy-proved non-small cell lung cancer. All patients underwent integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography before biopsy or resection of their mediastinal lymph nodes. Surgical staging was the reference standard. All N2 lymph nodes were individually assessed according to station. Data were analyzed by using the Pearson chi(2) test.Twenty-one (19%) of 110 patients had N2 disease, and a total of 765 N2 lymph nodes were pathologically examined. The mean and median maximum standardized uptake values for N2 nodes with metastatic disease were 9.2 (95% confidence interval, 7.0-11.4) and 7.2 (range, 2.2-25.8), respectively. For benign N2 nodes, the mean and median maximum standardized uptake values were 1.5 (95% confidence interval, 1.4-1.6) and 1.0 (range, 1.0-9.6), respectively (P < .05). When integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scans were reinterpreted by using a maximum standardized uptake value of 5.3 as a cutoff for malignancy, sensitivity decreased from 93% to 81% (P = .15), specificity increased from 86% to 98% (P < .01), positive predictive value increased from 22% to 64% (P < .01), negative predictive value was unchanged at 99%, and overall accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography increased from 87% to 97% (P < .01).The maximum standardized uptake value is a predictor of individual lymph node metastasis in non-small cell lung cancer. Accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography is significantly improved by using a maximum standardized uptake value of 5.3 to assign malignancy, thereby dramatically decreasing the number of false-positive results. More importantly, these results suggest that some patients with non-small cell lung cancer with a maximum standardized uptake value less than 5.3 in their N2 lymph nodes might be able to forego mediastinoscopy and proceed directly to thoracotomy. This represents a significant change in the current management of standardized uptake value-positive mediastinal lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer.Is mediastinoscopy still the gold standard to evaluate mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with non-small cell lung carcinoma?In this study, we aimed to define the efficacy of F-18 FDG PET/CT for the detection of mediastinal lymph node metastases by comparing the mediastinal findings of F-18 FDG PET/CT with the histopathological results obtained either by mediastinoscopy or thoracotomy in patients with clinically operable non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).This is a prospective, single-institution study of 68 consecutive patients with suspected or pathologically proven, localized, clinically resectable NSCLC (8 females and 60 males; mean age: 60.36 ± 1.01 years, range: 43-78 years). The patients underwent integrated PET/CT scanning at the same PET center. Standard cervical mediastinoscopy and extended mediastinoscopy were performed to sample the lymph nodes. During thoracotomy, complete mediastinal lymph node dissection was routinely performed.Mediastinoscopy gave true positive results in 9 patients and true negative results in 57 patients. There were two false negative results. Mediastinoscopy had a sensitivity of 81.8% (95% CI: 63-82), a specificity of 100% (95% CI: 96-100), a PPV of 100% (95% CI: 77-100), a NPV of 96.6% (95% CI: 93-96), and an accuracy of 97% for the detection of mediastinal lymph node metastases. When PET/CT results were compared with postoperative pathological examination results, PET/CT correctly identified 48 out of 50 patients (96%) who did not have metastatic lymph node involvement. N2/N3 disease was correctly determined by PET/CT in 8 of 11 patients (72.7%) who had positive results on histological analysis. When only N2 and N3 nodal diseases were included in the calculation with the aim of making a comparison with mediastinoscopy (for mediastinal nodes), integrated PET/CT had a sensitivity of 72.7% (95% CI: 51-80), a specificity of 97.7% (95% CI: 92-99), a PPV of 88.9% (95% CI: 62-97), a NPV of 93.3% (95% CI: 88-95) and an accuracy of 92.6% (95% 83-95) for the detection of intrathoracic N2 and N3 nodal metastases.Our data shows that due to its high sensitivity and accuracy, mediastinoscopy is still the most reliable method to evaluate mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with NSCLC.Lymph node staging by means of positron emission tomography is less accurate in non-small cell lung cancer patients with enlarged lymph nodes: analysis of 1,145 lymph nodes.Despite documented superiority of integrated positron emission tomography-computerized tomography (PET-CT) over computerized tomography (CT) in lymph node staging in non-small cell lung cancer, little is known about the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of integrated PET-CT among enlarged lymph nodes. We sought to assess if PET-CT is uniformly accurate among enlarged and non-enlarged lymph nodes.A retrospective review of 206 consecutive patients with histologically proven non-small cell lung cancer who underwent resection and/or mediastinoscopy in our centre over 30 months period was carried out. All these patients had pre-operative staging with integrated PET-CT as an adjunct to chest CT prior to resection and/or mediastinoscopy. Diabetic patients (BM>or=8.0 mmol/l) and those who received neo-adjuvant chemotherapy were excluded. The pathological results of all these cases were reviewed and correlated with those on CT and integrated PET-CT.The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive and negative predictive values were higher in integrated PET-CT than CT alone in all lymph nodes, whether N1 or N2. When lymph nodes were stratified by size, the sensitivity of PET-CT was significantly higher among enlarged (>1cm) than non-enlarged (<or=1cm) lymph nodes (74% vs. 40%, P<0.0001), but with a significantly lower specificity (81% vs. 98%, P<0.0001) and a lower accuracy (78% vs. 90%, P 0.008).Integrated PET-CT remains superior to CT in nodal staging of non-small cell lung cancer. However, in the presence of enlarged lymph nodes, PET-CT becomes less specific, less accurate but more sensitive in detecting metastatic spread to the lymph nodes. Interpretation of PET-CT findings in NSCLC patients with enlarged lymph nodes (>1cm) should be with caution as the specificity of PET-CT is lower and its ability to detect truly negative nodes become reduced. NSCLC patients with enlarged nodes by CT criteria who are PET-CT negative may require cervical mediastinoscopy to rule out metastatic spread to these nodes. Prospective studies are warranted.Improving the inaccuracies of clinical staging of patients with NSCLC: a prospective trial.Clinical stage affects the care of patients with nonsmall cell lung cancer.This is a prospective trial on patients with suspected resectable nonsmall cell lung cancer. All patients underwent integrated positron emission tomographic scanning and computed tomographic scanning, and all suspicious metastatic sites were investigated. A, T, N, and M status was assigned. If N2, N3 and M1 were negative, patients underwent thoracotomy and complete thoracic lymphadenectomy.There were 383 patients. The accuracy of clinical staging using positron emission tomographic scanning and computed tomographic scanning was 68% and 66% for stage I, 84% and 82% for stage II, 74% and 69% for stage III, and 93% and 92% for stage IV, respectively. N2 disease was discovered in 115 patients (30%) and was most common in the subcarinal lymph node (30%). Unsuspected N2 disease occurred in 28 patients (14%) and was most common in the posterior mediastinal lymph nodes (subcarinal, 38%; posterior aortopulmonary, 15%). It was found in 9% of patients who were clinically staged I (58% in the posterior mediastinal lymph nodes) and in 26% of patients clinically staged II (86% in posterior mediastinal lymph nodes).Despite integrated positron emission tomographic scanning and computed tomographic scanning, clinical staging remains relatively inaccurate for patients with nonsmall cell lung cancer. Recent studies suggest adjuvant therapy for stage Ib and II nonsmall cell lung cancer; thus the impact on preoperative care is to find unsuspected N2 disease. Unsuspected N2 disease is most common in posterior mediastinal lymph nodes inaccessible by mediastinoscopy. Thus one should consider endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration, especially for patients clinically staged as I and II, even if the nodes are negative on positron emission tomographic scanning and computed tomographic scanning.Role of preoperative PET-CT in assessing mediastinal and hilar lymph node status in early stage lung cancer.Positron emission tomography combined with computed tomography (PET-CT) is important in the assessment and workup of lung cancer staging. However, inconsistencies between clinical image results obtained and pathologic findings of surgical specimens are still very common, particularly in patients with clinical early stage lung cancer. We sought to clarify the role of PET-CT in predicting mediastinal lymph node status preoperatively in clinical early stage lung cancer patients.The cases were collected retrospectively from January 2008 to February 2009. All patients were good surgical candidates, and clinically early-stage during the pre-op evaluation, which included CT, PET scan, and cardiopulmonary tests. All patients underwent surgery, with complete pathological evaluation of mediastinal lymph node (LNs). The pathological status and PET Standardized uptake value (SUV)(max) of mediastinal LNs were collected to calculate the ROC curve, and to determine the best cut-off value of PET SUV(max). Other cofactors, including sex, tumor size, tumor SUV(max), histology type, and lobar distribution, were analyzed utilizing correlation study, Chi-square test, and t-test for significance.A total of 83 patients were enrolled into the study. The majority of the cases were in pathological early stage (Stage I: 67.5%, Stage II: 12%). The cut-off point of mediastinal LN SUV(max) was 1.6 calculated by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve (sensitivity: 40%, specificity: 88.7%, negative predictive rate: 95.1%). The hilar LN SUV(max) was found to have a poor correlation to the final pathologic status of hilar nodes with insignificant p value (0.487). Tumor SUV(max) and increased hilar LN uptake (SUV(max) > 2.0) were found to be significantly correlated with the pathologic status of mediastinal LNs. The false positive rates by PET-CT scan in N1 and N2 nodes were 70% and 78%, respectively, primarily due to inflammatory process (as anthracosis the leading cause).Integrated PET-CT is a useful tool for predicting the negativity of mediastinal LN status pre-operatively in clinically early stage (Stages I and II) lung cancer but may be relatively inaccurate in predicting hilar LN status and largely confounded by false positives caused by inflammatory process.FDG PET/CT and mediastinal nodal metastasis detection in stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer: prognostic implications.We aimed to compare the prognoses of patients with pathologically true negative (P-TN) N2 and PET/CT false negative (FN) results in stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Our institutional review board approved this retrospective study with a waiver of informed consent. The study included 184 patients (124 men and 60 women; mean age, 59 years) with stage T1 NSCLC who underwent an integrated PET/CT and surgery. After estimating the efficacy of PET/CT for detecting N2 disease, we determined and compared disease-free survival (DFS) rates in three groups (P-TN [n = 161], PET/CT FN [n = 12], and PET/CT true positive [TP, n = 11]) using the Kaplan-Meier analysis and log-rank test.Pathologic N2 disease was observed in 23 (12%) patients. PET/CT had an N2 disease detection sensitivity of 48% (11 of 23 patients), a specificity of 95% (153 of 161), and an accuracy of 89% (164 of 184). The 3-year DFS rate in the PET/CT FN group (31%, 95% confidence interval [CI]; 13.6-48.0%) was similar to that of the TP group (16%, 95% CI; 1.7-29.5%) (p = 0.649), but both groups had significantly shorter DFS rates than the P-TN group (77%, 95% CI; 72.0-81.2%) (p < 0.001).The PET/CT shows a high specificity, but low sensitivity for detecting N2 disease in stage T1 NSCLC. Patients with PET/CT FN N2 disease have survival rates similar to PET/CT TP N2 disease patients, which are both substantially shorter than the survival rate of P-TN patients.Preoperative staging of lung cancer with combined PET-CT.Fast and accurate staging is essential for choosing treatment for non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC). The purpose of this randomized study was to evaluate the clinical effect of combined positron-emission tomography and computed tomography (PET-CT) on preoperative staging of NSCLC.We randomly assigned patients who were referred for preoperative staging of NSCLC to either conventional staging plus PET-CT or conventional staging alone. Patients were followed until death or for at least 12 months. The primary end point was the number of futile thoracotomies, defined as any one of the following: a thoracotomy with the finding of pathologically confirmed mediastinal lymph-node involvement (stage IIIA [N2]), stage IIIB or stage IV disease, or a benign lung lesion; an exploratory thoracotomy; or a thoracotomy in a patient who had recurrent disease or death from any cause within 1 year after randomization.From January 2002 through February 2007, we randomly assigned 98 patients to the PET-CT group and 91 to the conventional-staging group. Mediastinoscopy was performed in 94% of the patients. After PET-CT, 38 patients were classified as having inoperable NSCLC, and after conventional staging, 18 patients were classified thus. Sixty patients in the PET-CT group and 73 in the conventional-staging group underwent thoracotomy (P=0.004). Among these thoracotomies, 21 in the PET-CT group and 38 in the conventional-staging group were futile (P=0.05). The number of justified thoracotomies and survival were similar in the two groups.The use of PET-CT for preoperative staging of NSCLC reduced both the total number of thoracotomies and the number of futile thoracotomies but did not affect overall mortality. (ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT00867412.)Efficacy of convex probe endobronchial ultrasound (CP-EBUS) assisted transbronchial needle aspiration for mediastinal staging in non-small cell lung cancer cases with mediastinal lymphadenopathy.Endobronchial ultrasound-guided transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) is a sampling method for the patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) that have enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes that are detected with computed tomography (CT). We aimed to investigate the value of EBUS-TBNA in sampling enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes in the patient with NSCLC.From January 2007 to May 2009, patients were diagnosed NSCLC with CT scans showing enlarged lymph nodes (node >1 cm) or a positron emission tomography (PET/CT) finding of the mediastinum underwent EBUS-TBNA.EBUS-TBNA was successfully performed in all 52 patients (mean age, 52 years; 45 men) from 93 mediastinal lymph nodes. EBUS detected lymph node metastasis in 40 patients (77%). 12 patients (23%) with negative lymph node samples were underwent mediastinoscopy. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of EBUS-TBNA in the detection of mediastinal metastasis were 95 %, 100%, 100%, 83%, and 96%, respectively. EBUS-TBNA was uneventful, and there were no complications.EBUS-TBNA is an effective, safe and minimally invasive procedure following PET/CT or CT scanning in the mediastinal staging of potentially operable NSCLC.Prediction of lymph node metastases in NSCLC. Three dimensional anatomical parameters do not substitute FDG-PET-CT.To distinguish between benign and malignant mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with NSCLC by comparing 2D and semi-automated 3D measurements in FDG-PET-CT.FDG-PET-CT was performed in 46 patients prior to therapy. 299 mediastinal lymph-nodes were evaluated independently by two radiologists, both manually and by semi-automatic segmentation software. Longest-axial-diameter (LAD), shortest-axial-diameter (SAD), maximal-3D-diameter, elongation and volume were obtained. FDG-PET-CT and clinical/FDG-PET-CT follow up examinations and/or histology served as the reference standard. Statistical analysis encompassed intra-class-correlation-coefficients and receiver-operator-characteristics-curves (ROC).The standard of reference revealed involvement in 87 (29%) of 299 lymph nodes. Manually and semi-automatically measured 2D parameters (LAD and SAD) showed a good correlation with mean intraclass coefficients of .80 and .72, respectively. Semi-automated prediction revealed the highest areas-under-the-ROC-curve for volume (.75, 95%CI: .69-81) and SAD (.75, 95%CI: .70-.81). AUC for LAD and maximal-3D diameter were about .68. Substantially lower accuracies were found for elongation (.57, 95%CI: .50-.64).Optimized semi-automated three dimensional parameters by CT cannot approximate reported data on FDG-PET-CT for lymph node assessment in NSCLC. SAD remains the most accurate and at the same time simple to achieve anatomical criterion for definition of NSCLC target lesions.The accuracy of integrated PET-CT compared with dedicated PET alone for the staging of patients with nonsmall cell lung cancer.The treatment of patients with nonsmall cell lung cancer (NSCLC) is determined by the stage. We evaluated the accuracy of staging using integrated positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) and compared it with dedicated PET visually correlated with CT scan.A prospective blinded trial was performed on a consecutive series of patients with NSCLC. Patients underwent integrated PET-CT scanning with 2-[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG-18). A radiologist assigned the T, N and M status. No sooner than 2 weeks the same radiologist read the dedicated PET alone, without the integrated CT images and a T, N and M status was assigned again. The most recent CT scan was available and visually correlated with both studies. All patients underwent biopsies of suspicious N2 or N3 lymph node or distant metastases and if negative, pulmonary resection with lymphadenectomy was performed.There were 129 patients. Integrated PET-CT is a better predictor than PET for all stages of cancer and achieved statistical significance for stage I (52% versus 33%, p = 0.03) and for stage II (70% versus 36%, p = 0.04). It also is a better overall predictor for T status (70% versus 47%, p = 0.001) and the N status (78% versus 56%, p = 0.008). Nodal analysis shows that integrated PET-CT was more accurate for the total N2 nodes (96% versus 93%, p = 0.01) and for the total N1 nodes (90% versus 80%, p = 0.001). It was also more sensitive, specific, and had a higher positive predictive value for both N2 and N1 nodes (p < 0.05 for all). Integrated PET-CT is significantly more sensitive at the 4R, 5, 7, 10 L and 11 stations and more accurate at the 7 and 11 lymph nodes stations than dedicated PET.Integrated PET-CT using FDG-18 better predicts stage I and II disease as well as the T and N status of patients with NSCLC when compared with dedicated PET alone. It is more accurate at some nodal stations but still only achieves an accuracy of 96% and 90% for the N2 and N1 nodes, respectively.Detection of nodal metastatic disease in patients with non-small cell lung cancer: comparison of positron emission tomography (PET), contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT), and combined PET-CT.Of 31 patients with lung cancer, 19 underwent PET-CT and 12 had CT followed by PET. Thoracic lymph nodes were sampled by mediastinoscopy or thoracotomy. Sensitivities, specificities, positive (PPV), and negative predictive values (NPV) were calculated based on histopathology. Ninety nodes (41 malignant) were identified. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV were 94%, 73%, 66%, and 96% for PET-CT, respectively. In 12 patients who underwent PET and CT separately, these values were 90%, 31%, 64%, and 71% for PET and 81%, 50%, 69%, and 66% for CT, respectively.Accuracy of helical computed tomography and [18F] fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography for identifying lymph node mediastinal metastases in potentially resectable non-small-cell lung cancer.Computed tomography (CT) and [18F] Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) are considered suitable methods for the noninvasive staging of the mediastinum. Our study was intended to estimate the efficacy of contrast-enhanced helical CT (hCT) and FDG-PET, alone and combined, in the diagnosis of lymph node mediastinal metastases.This study was a prospective and blind comparison of the efficacy of hCT and FDG-PET with two alternative reference standards, mediastinoscopy, and mediastinoscopy plus thoracotomy plus a 6-month follow-up to diagnose lymph node mediastinal metastases in 132 consecutive patients with potentially resectable non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC). The metastatic disease was assessed histopathologically. Further clinical information was obtained postoperatively after a median follow-up of 42 months.The prevalence of cN2,3 is 0.28. For hCT the sensitivity and specificity are 0.86 (95% CI, 0.70 to 0.93) and 0.67 (95% CI, 0.56 to 0.75), for PET 0.94 (95% CI, 0.81 to 0.98) and 0.59 (95% CI, 0.49 to 0.68), and for hCT and PET combined in-parallel 0.97 (95% CI, 0.84 to 0.99) and 0.44 (95% CI, 0.34 to 0.53), which translate into a negative predicted probability of 0.98 (95% CI, 0.88 to 1.00). The crude diagnostic odds ratio of PET in the total sample studied is 13.1, in the subgroup hCT+ 11.04 (3.0 to 40 0.1), and in the hCT- 3.5 (0.5 to 21.5). Similar results were obtained for hCT stratified by PET.hCT and PET perform similarly in the mediastinal staging of NSCLC, both tests are conditionally dependent and provide complementary information, and their diagnostic value mainly resides on the negative results.N stage disease in patients with non-small cell lung cancer: efficacy of quantitative and qualitative assessment with STIR turbo spin-echo imaging, diffusion-weighted MR imaging, and fluorodeoxyglucose PET/CT.To prospectively compare the diagnostic capability of short inversion time inversion-recovery (STIR) turbo spin-echo (SE) imaging, diffusion-weighted (DW) magnetic resonance (MR) imaging, and fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) combined positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) in N stage assessment in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).This prospective study was approved by the institutional review board, and written informed consent was obtained from all patients. A total of 250 consecutive patients with NSCLC (136 men; mean age, 73 years; 114 women; mean age, 72 years) prospectively underwent pretherapeutic STIR turbo SE imaging, DW MR imaging, and FDG PET/CT, as well as surgical and pathologic examinations (N0 disease, n = 157; N1 disease, n = 72; N2 disease, n = 16; N3 disease, n = 5). Lymph node-to-saline ratio (LSR), lymph node-to-muscle ratio (LMR), apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC), maximal standardized uptake value (SUV(max)), and visual scoring were assessed for 135 metastatic lymph nodes and 135 randomly selected nonmetastatic lymph nodes. Receiver operating characteristic curve analysis was used to determine feasible threshold values. Diagnostic capabilities for N stage assessment were compared with the McNemar test on a per-patient basis.When feasible, threshold values were used for quantitative assessment; sensitivity and accuracy of LSR and LMR (sensitivity, 82.8%; accuracy, 86.8%) proved to be significantly higher than those of ADC (sensitivity: 74.2%, P = .01; accuracy: 84.4%, P = .04) and SUV(max) (sensitivity: 74.2%, P = .01). For qualitative assessment, sensitivity of STIR turbo SE imaging (77.4%) was significantly higher than that of DW MR imaging (71.0%, P = .03) and FDG PET/CT (69.9%, P = .02).Quantitative and qualitative assessments of N stage disease in patients with NSCLC obtained with STIR turbo SE MR imaging are more sensitive and/or more accurate than those obtained with DW MR imaging and FDG PET/CT.http://radiology.rsna.org/lookup/suppl/doi:10.1148/radiol.11110281/-/DC1.[Value of (18)F-FDG PET-CT in the preoperative N staging of non-small cell lung cancer].To evaluate the diagnostic value of PET-CT with (18)F-FDG in preoperative N staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), especially the additional value of CT attenuation and the dual-time-point imaging in determining the lymph nodes status.Forty-three NSCLC patients underwent curative surgical resection after integrated (18)F-FDG PET-CT examination. The initial scan images were analyzed by two methods. In the first method, the nodal status was determined by (18)F-FDG uptake only (method PET). In the second method, the nodal status was determined by uptake associated with CT attenuation (method PET and CT attenuation). Nodal uptake was interpreted visually and semi quantitatively. For dual-time-point imaging, a retention index (RI) > 10% was regarded as increasing trend. Histopathologic results served as the reference standard.On the per-nodal-station (group) basis, the diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, PPV, and NPV were 88.0%, 88.4%, 88.3%, 59.5% and 97.4%, respectively, by the method 1; 84.0%, 94.6%, 92.9%, 75.0% and 96.8%, respectively, by the method 2. The specificity and accuracy between these two methods had statistically significant difference (P < 0.05). Twenty-eight nodal groups underwent dual-time-point imaging and the differences of DeltaSUV(max) and RI between benign and malignant groups had no statistically significant difference (P > 0.05). Eleven groups were malignant in 23 lymph nodal groups which had an increasing trend. Among the 5 nodal groups which did not show increase in delayed scan, one group was malignant.(18)F-FDG PET-CT has high diagnostic value in the preoperative N staging of NSCLC, and combining uptake with CT attenuation of lymph nodes can improve the specificity and accuracy. For the lymph nodes with high uptake in the initial scan, increasing uptake in delayed scan has little effect in differential diagnosis, but no increasing in delayed phase is more prone to benign diagnosis.[Significance of dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET imaging in evaluation of hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis in non-small-cell lung cancer].To explore the diagnostic value of dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging in detecting hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis in non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Forty-six patients with NSCLC underwent standard whole body single-time 18F-FDG PET-CT scans and a delayed imaging for the thorax alone before surgery, meanwhile, the standard uptake value (SUV) and retention index (RI) were calculated.A total number of 584 lymph nodes were excised in the 46 patients. Of these, 134 metastatic lymph nodes were pathologically confirmed in 31 patients. There were 189 lymph nodes detected and suspected to be metastatic by standard single-time 18 F-FDG PET-CT imaging, and 161 by dual-time-point imaging. Therefore, the sensitivity, specificity, diagnostic accuracy, positive predictive value and negative predictive value in the detection of hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis were 87.3%, 84.0%, 84.8%, 61.9% and 95.7% by standard single-time 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging, versus 94.8%, 92.2%, 92.8%, 78.9% and 98.1%, respectively, by dual-time-point imaging. There was a statistically significant difference in the detection of lymph node metastasis between the standard single-time imaging and dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging.Dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging is more sensitive, specific and accurate than standard single-time 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging in the detection of hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis, and may provide more information for diagnosis, staging and treatment of non-small cell lung cancer.Integrated FDG-PET/CT does not make invasive staging of the intrathoracic lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer redundant: a prospective study.Staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) is important for determining choice of treatment and prognosis. The accuracy of FDG-PET scans for staging of lymph nodes is too low to replace invasive nodal staging. It is unknown whether the accuracy of integrated FDG-PET/CT scanning makes invasive staging redundant.In a prospective study, the mediastinal and/or hilar lymph nodes in patients with proven NSCLC were investigated with integrated FDG-PET/CT scanning. Pathological confirmation of all suspect lymph nodes was obtained to calculate the accuracy of the fusion images. In addition, the use of the standardised uptake value (SUV) in the staging of intrathoracic lymph nodes was analysed.105 intrathoracic lymph node stations from 52 patients with NSCLC were characterised. The prevalence of malignancy in the lymph nodes was 36%. The sensitivity of the integrated FDG-PET/CT scan to detect malignant lymph nodes was 84% and its specificity was 85% (positive likelihood ratio 5.64, negative likelihood ratio 0.19). SUV(max), SUV(mean) and the SUV(max)/SUV(liver) ratio were all significantly higher in malignant than in benign lymph nodes. The area under the receiver operating curve did not differ between these three quantitative variables, but the highest accuracy was found with the SUV(max)/SUV(liver) ratio. At a cut-off value of 1.5 for the SUV(max)/SUV(liver )ratio, the sensitivity and specificity to detect malignant lymph node invasion were 82% and 93%, respectively.The accuracy of integrated FDG-PET/CT scanning is too low to replace invasive intrathoracic lymph node staging in patients with NSCLC. The visual interpretation of the fusion images of the integrated FDG-PET/CT scan can be replaced by the quantitative variable SUV(max)/SUV(liver) without loss of accuracy for intrathoracic lymph node staging.Diffusion-weighted imaging is superior to positron emission tomography in the detection and nodal assessment of lung cancers.Diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging (DWI) makes it possible to detect malignant tumors based on the difference in the diffusion of water molecules among tissues. The aims of this study are to examine the usefulness of DWI compared with positron emission tomography-computed tomography (PET-CT) in the assessment of lung cancer, and the relationships between the apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) value and several pathologic factors.Sixty-three patients with primary non-small cell lung cancer were enrolled in this study. The DWI and PET-CT were performed before surgery. There were 42 adenocarcinomas, 19 squamous cell carcinomas, and 2 other cell types.Sixty-one lung cancers (97%) were detected visually with DWI. This was significantly higher than 54 lung cancers (86%) with PET-CT. The accuracy for N staging by DWI was 0.81 (51 of 63), which was not significantly higher than 0.71 (45 of 63) by PET-CT. The sensitivity (0.75) for individual metastatic lymph node stations by DWI was significantly higher than that (0.48) by PET-CT. The specificity for individual nonmetastatic lymph node stations was 0.99 by DWI and 0.97 by PET-CT, respectively. The accuracy (0.95) for the diagnosis of lymph node stations by DWI was significantly higher than that (0.90) by PET-CT. There was a weak reverse relationship (correlation coefficient: 0.286) between the ADC value and the maximum standardized uptake value, but no relationship between ADC value and tumor size. The ADC values increased while the cell differentiation increased.Diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging is superior to PET-CT in the detection of primary lesions and nodal assessment of non-small cell lung cancers.Non-small cell lung cancer: prospective comparison of integrated FDG PET/CT and CT alone for preoperative staging.To evaluate prospectively the accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) with use of fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG), compared with that of stand-alone CT, for the preoperative staging of non-small cell lung cancer, with surgical and histologic findings used as the reference standard.Institutional review board approval and patient informed consent were obtained. From November 2003 to February 2004, 106 patients (78 men, 28 women; mean age, 56 years) with non-small cell lung cancer underwent curative surgical resection (tumor resection and lymph node dissection) after stand-alone CT followed by integrated FDG PET/CT. Tumor stages were determined by using the TNM and American Joint Committee on Cancer staging systems. Histopathologic results served as the reference standard. Statistically significant differences in tumor staging between integrated PET/CT and stand-alone CT were determined with P < .05 obtained by using the McNemar test or with a generalized estimating equation.The primary tumor was correctly staged in 84 patients (79%) at stand-alone CT and in 91 patients (86%) at integrated FDG PET/CT (P = .25). For the depiction of malignant nodes, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of CT were 70% (23 of 33 nodal groups), 69% (248 of 360), and 69% (271 of 393), respectively, whereas those of PET/CT were 85% (28 of 33), 84% (302 of 360), and 84% (330 of 393) (P = .25, P < .001, and P < .001, respectively). There were 112 false-positive interpretations at CT for 54 hilar, 16 subcarinal, 29 paratracheal, 10 subaortic, and two pulmonary ligament nodal groups and one upper paratracheal group, compared with only 58 false-positive interpretations at PET/CT for 32 hilar, seven subcarinal, 13 lower paratracheal, and six subaortic nodal groups. There were 10 false-negative interpretations at CT for four hilar, two lower paratracheal, and two subcarinal nodal groups, one prevascular and retrotracheal group, and one inferior pulmonary group, but only five false-negative interpretations at PET/CT (one each for paratracheal, subaortic, subcarinal, inferior pulmonary, and hilar nodal groups).Integrated FDG PET/CT is significantly better than stand-alone CT for lung cancer staging and provides enhanced accuracy and specificity in nodal staging.STIR turbo SE MR imaging vs. coregistered FDG-PET/CT: quantitative and qualitative assessment of N-stage in non-small-cell lung cancer patients.To conduct a prospective comparison of the accuracy of short inversion time (TI) inversion-recovery (STIR) turbo spin-echo (SE) imaging and coregistered 2-[fluorine-18] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography (PET) with computed tomography (CT) (coregistered FDG-PET/CT) to assess the N-stage in non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients.A total of 115 consecutive NSCLC patients prospectively underwent CT, STIR turbo SE imaging, and FDG-PET, as well as surgical and pathological examinations. All STIR turbo SE images were obtained with a 0.9% saline phantom, which was placed alongside the chest wall of each patient, and coregistered FDG-PET/CTs were reconstructed using commercially available software. For quantitative assessments, the ratio of signal intensity (SI) of each lymph node to that of 0.9% saline phantom (lymph node-saline ratio [LSR]) and maximal standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) of each lymph node were calculated. Feasible threshold values were determined by using the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve-based positive test, and diagnostic capabilities of N-stage were compared by McNemar's test on a per patient basis.When feasible, threshold values were adopted, quantitative sensitivity (90.1%) and accuracy (92.2%) of STIR turbo SE imaging were significantly higher than those of quantitative and qualitative sensitivities (76.7% and 74.4%) and accuracies (83.5% and 82.6%) of coregistered FDG-PET/CT on a per patient basis (P < 0.05).STIR turbo SE imaging is at least as valid as coregistered FDG-PET/CT for quantitative and qualitative assessment of the N-stage for NSCLC patients.Prediction of pathologic node-negative clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma for optimal candidates undergoing sublobar resection.Patients with pathologic node-negative early lung cancer may be optimal candidates for sublobar resection. We aimed to identify predictors of pathologic lymph node involvement in clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma.The data from a multicenter database of 502 patients with completely resected clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma were retrospectively analyzed to determine the relationship between the lymph node metastasis status and tumor size on high-resolution computed tomography (HRCT) or maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) on [18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT). Revised SUVmax was used to correct interinstitutional discrepancies.In multivariate analyses, either a solid tumor size on HRCT (P = .001) or an SUVmax on FDG-PET/CT (P = .049) was an independent predictor of lymph node metastasis. The predictive criteria of pathologic node-negative early lung cancer were a solid tumor size of less than 0.8 cm or an SUVmax of less than 1.5. Patients who met the predictive criteria of pathologic node-negative disease had less pathologic invasiveness, such as lymphatic, vascular, or pleural invasion (P < .001), and better disease-free survival (P < .0001) than those who did not, and 86 (40.4%) of the 213 patients with T1b (2-3 cm) tumors met the predictive criteria.Either a solid tumor size or an SUVmax was a significant independent predictor of nodal involvement in clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma. The pathologic node-negative status criteria of a solid tumor size of less than 0.8 cm on HRCT or an SUVmax of less than 1.5 on FDG-PET/CT may be helpful for avoiding systematic lymphadenectomy for clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma, even in cases of T1b (2-3 cm) tumor.Staging of non-small-cell lung cancer with integrated positron-emission tomography and computed tomography.We compared the diagnostic accuracy of integrated positron-emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) with that of CT alone, that of PET alone, and that of conventional visual correlation of PET and CT in determining the stage of disease in non-small-cell lung cancer.In a prospective study, integrated PET-CT was performed in 50 patients with proven or suspected non-small-cell lung cancer. CT and PET alone, visually correlated PET and CT, and integrated PET-CT were evaluated separately, and a tumor-node-metastasis (TNM) stage was assigned on the basis of image analysis. Nodal stations were identified according to the mapping system of the American Thoracic Society. The standard of reference was histopathological assessment of tumor stage and node stage. Extrathoracic metastases were confirmed histopathologically or by at least one other imaging method. A paired sign test was used to compare integrated PET-CT with the other imaging methods.Integrated PET-CT provided additional information in 20 of 49 patients (41 percent), beyond that provided by conventional visual correlation of PET and CT. Integrated PET-CT had better diagnostic accuracy than the other imaging methods. Tumor staging was significantly more accurate with integrated PET-CT than with CT alone (P=0.001), PET alone (P<0.001), or visual correlation of PET and CT (P=0.013); node staging was also significantly more accurate with integrated PET-CT than with PET alone (P=0.013). In metastasis staging, integrated PET-CT increased the diagnostic certainty in two of eight patients.Integrated PET-CT improves the diagnostic accuracy of the staging of non-small-cell lung cancer.False-negative rate after positron emission tomography/computer tomography scan for mediastinal staging in cI stage non-small-cell lung cancer.To assess the false-negative (FN) rate of positron emission tomography (PET)-chest computed tomography (CT) scan in clinical non-central cIA and cIB non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) for mediastinal staging.Between January 2007 and December 2010, 402 patients with potentially operable NSCLC were assessed by thoracic CT scan and 18-fluoro-2-deoxy-d-glucose PET-CT for mediastinal staging and to detect extrathoracic metastases, of which 153 surgically treated patients (79 cIA and 74 cIB cases) were prospectively included in the study. Central tumours were excluded on the basis of CT scan criteria, defined as contact with the intrapulmonary main bronchi, pulmonary artery, pulmonary veins or the origin of the first segmental branches. CT scan was considered negative if lymph nodes were <1 cm at the smaller diameter. 18FDG PET-CT was considered negative when the high maximum standard uptake value (SUVmax) was <2.5. Non-invasive surgical staging was carried out in this group, and curative resection plus systematic mediastinal dissection was performed except in the event of unexpected oncological contraindication.Composite non-invasive staging (CT scan, PET-CT) showed a negative predictive value (NPV) of 92% (CI 83.6-96.8) in the cIA group and 85% (CI 74-92) in the cIB group. There were 6 of 79 (7.6%) false-negatives (FNs) in cIA and 11 of 74 (14.8%) in cIB. Multilevel pN2 were detected in four cases, all of them in the cIB group. The most frequently involved N2 was subcarinal (two cases) in cIA and right lower paratracheal (R4) and seven (five cases) in cIB. Occult (pN2) lymph nodes were more frequent in tumour sizes≥5 cm (pT2b, nine cases, four FNs, P=0.03), pN1, adenocarcinoma [excluding minimally invasive adenocarcinoma (MIA) and lepidic predominant growth (LPA)] (P=0.029) and female patients, but no other risk factors for mediastinal metastases were identified (age, clinical stage, tumour location, central or peripheral, P>0.05). Multilevel pN2 was significantly more frequent in the cIB group (P<0.03). In pT≤1 cm (T1a), NPV was significantly better (NPV=100%, P<0.05) than the other subgroups studied (IA>1 cm and IB).Composite results for non-invasive mediastinal staging (CT scan, PET-CT) showed 11% of FNs in cI stage (7.6% in non-central cIA and 14.8% in cIB). In tumours≤1 cm, NPV makes surgical staging unnecessary. In women with adenocarcinoma and non-central cIB, however, the high FN rate makes invasive staging necessary, particularly in pT2b to decrease the incidence of unexpected pN2 in thoracotomy.Positron emission tomography with CT in the evaluation of non-small cell lung cancer in populations with a high prevalence of tuberculosis.To determine the utility of positron emission tomography with CT (PET-CT) in the evaluation of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) in an Asian context where tuberculosis rates are moderately high.Case records of consecutive patients with NSCLC undergoing PET-CT at the Singapore General Hospital over a 1-year period were retrospectively reviewed. The authors evaluated the sensitivity and specificity of PET-CT at their institution using surgical pathology or the tincture of time as the gold standard.A total of 54 patients underwent PET-CT during this period. Seven patients were evaluated for solitary pulmonary nodule, for which PET-CT gave a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 75%. There was one patient with false positive PET-CT due to active tuberculosis. In total, 41 patients underwent PET-CT for staging of NSCLC. There was one false positive (patient was found to have active tuberculous lymphadenitis) and one false negative for NSCLC. This gave a sensitivity of 92.3% and a specificity of 95%. Histology from the adrenal glands was available in two patients with PET-CT that was positive for adrenal metastases. One proved to be benign whereas the other was consistent with metastasis. Two patients had PET-CT positive for liver metastases, which was verified by histology. Two patients with positive PET-CT for lesions in the colon turned out to be benign histologically.Positron emission tomography with CT for the evaluation and follow-up of solitary pulmonary nodule and NSCLC can provide additional useful information to conventional radiology for treatment planning and a non-invasive determination of prognosis. However, physicians need to be aware of the limitations of this imaging modality, particularly when tuberculosis has a high prevalence in the population.The maximum standardized 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose uptake on positron emission tomography predicts lymph node metastasis and invasiveness in clinical stage IA non-small cell lung cancer.In patients with clinical stage IA non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), we investigated whether the maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) by the tumor correlated with lymph node metastasis, intratumoral lymphatic and vascular invasion of tumor cells, and pleural invasion. From April 2005 to November 2008, 58 patients underwent a lobectomy with systematic hilar and mediastinal lymph node dissection for clinical stage IA NSCLC. All patients had integrated FDG-positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) performed in our center as part of the preoperative workup within one month of resection. The relationships between the SUVmax and pathologic results of lymph node metastasis, intratumoral lymphatic and vascular invasion of tumor cells, and pleural invasion were examined. Compared with tumors with an SUVmax < or = 2.0, tumors with an SUVmax>2.0 had more frequent lymph node metastasis, intratumoral lymphatic and vascular invasion of tumor cells and pleural invasion (all P<0.05). Our results suggest that in patients with clinical stage IA NSCLC, SUVmax is an important predictor of tumor invasiveness.Value of PET/CT versus enhanced CT for locoregional lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer.To compare the diagnostic efficacies of integrated (18)F FDG PET/CT images and contrast-enhanced helical CT images in locoregional lymph node metastasis in the patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).From June 2005 to June 2007, 122 potentially operable patients with proven or suspected non-small cell lung cancer underwent integrated PET/CT and contrast-enhanced CT scans followed by surgical nodal staging. The results of reviewing PET/CT and enhanced CT images for the locoregional lymph node metastasis were compared in relation to pathologic findings.Preoperative nodal staging was compared with postoperative histopathological staging, 80% (98 of 122) of patients correctly staged, 13% (16 of 122) of patients were overstaged, and 7% (8 of 122) were understaged by PET/CT, while those values for CT were 56% (68 of 122), 26% (32 of 122), and 18% (22 of 122), respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of PET/CT for lymph nodes were 86%, 85%, 85%, 64%, 95%, respectively; compared with 69%, 71%, 70%, 43%, 88% for CT (P=0.000, 0.000, 0.000, 0.001, 0.001, respectively). 81% false-negative interpretations and 72% false-positive interpretations on CT were corrected by PET/CT. 57% false-negative interpretations and 45% false-positive interpretations on PET/CT were corrected by CT. 6 % (9 of 153) positive lymph nodes and 8% (40 of 486) negative nodes at pathology were incorrectly diagnosed both by PET/CT and CT.Integrated PET/CT improves the sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value than enhanced CT in the assessment of locoregional lymph nodes, and provides more efficient and accurate data of nodal staging, with a better effect on diagnosis and therapy in non-small cell lung cancer.Value of dual-time-point FDG PET/CT for mediastinal nodal staging in non-small-cell lung cancer patients with lung comorbidity.To evaluate the efficacy of dual-time-point F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG PET)/ computed tomography (CT) for mediastinal nodal staging in non-small-cell lung cancer patients with lung comorbidity.Fifty-three pathologically proven non-small-cell lung cancer patients with pulmonary comorbidity and 49 patients as controlled group without comorbidity were enrolled. PET/CT was performed at 1-hour (whole body) post-FDG injection and repeated 2 hours (thoracic) after injection. All patients received radical surgery with system mediastinal lymph node (LN) dissection. The results of LN detection by single-time-point and dual-time-point scan were compared with the histopathologic findings.On a per-patient basis, in patients with pulmonary comorbidity, the sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and positive predictive values (PPV), and negative predictive values of single-time-point scan were 87.5%, 59.5%, 67.9%, 48.3%, and 91.7%, respectively. Those values of dual-time-point scan were 93.8%, 67.6%, 75.5%, 55.6%, and 96.2%, respectively. In patients without comorbidity, dual-time-point scan was similar in those values to single-time-point. On a per-nodal station basis, the specificity, accuracy, and PPV of dual-time-point scan were better than those of single-time-point with statistically significant differences (P = 0.017, 0.002, and 0.027, respectively) in patients with pulmonary comorbidity, but the difference was not statistically significant in patients with no pulmonary comorbidity.Dual-time-point FDG PET/CT is more effective for mediastinal nodal staging than single-time-point in patients with pulmonary comorbidity. Dual-time-point scan was useful for diagnosis of mediastinal LN metastases in reducing the false-positive results in all patients, but improved specificity, accuracy, and PPV only in patients with pulmonary comorbidity.Non-small cell lung cancer staging: efficacy comparison of integrated PET/CT versus 3.0-T whole-body MR imaging.To compare prospectively the diagnostic efficacies of integrated positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) and 3.0-T whole-body magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for determining TNM stages in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Institutional review board approval and informed consent were obtained. The study included 165 patients (125 men, 40 women; mean age, 61 years) with NSCLC proved at pathologic examination who underwent both unenhanced PET/CT and whole-body MR imaging. Pathologic findings for T (n = 123) and N (n = 150) staging and pathologic or follow-up imaging findings (n = 154) for M staging were reference standards. The efficacies of PET/CT and whole-body MR imaging for lung cancer staging were compared by using the McNemar test.Primary tumors (n = 123 patients) were correctly staged in 101 (82%) patients at PET/CT and in 106 (86%) patients at whole-body MR imaging (P = .263). N stages (n = 150 patients) were correctly determined in 105 (70%) patients at PET/CT and in 102 (68%) patients at whole-body MR imaging (P = .880). Thirty-one (20%) of 154 patients had metastatic lesions. Accuracy for detecting metastases was 86% (133 of 154 patients) at PET/CT, and that at whole-body MR imaging was 86% (132 of 154 patients) (P > .99). Although the differences were not statistically significant, whole-body MR imaging was more useful for detecting brain and hepatic metastases, whereas PET/CT was more useful for detecting lymph node and soft-tissue metastases.Both PET/CT and 3.0-T whole-body MR imaging appear to provide acceptable accuracy and comparable efficacy for NSCLC staging, but for M-stage determination, each modality has its own advantages.Advantages of diffusion-weighted imaging over positron emission tomography-computed tomography in assessment of hilar and mediastinal lymph node in lung cancer.The significance of diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) is uncertain for the diagnosis of nodal involvement. The purpose of this study was to examine diagnostic capability of DWI compared with PET-CT for nodal involvement of lung cancer.A total of 160 lung cancers (114 adenocarcinomas, 36 squamous cell carcinomas, and 10 other cell types) were analyzed in this study. DWI and PET-CT were performed preoperatively.The optimal cutoff values to diagnose metastatic lymph nodes were 1.70 × 10(-3) mm(2)/s for ADC value and 4.45 for SUVmax. DWI correctly diagnosed N staging in 144 carcinomas (90 %) but incorrectly diagnosed N staging in 16 (10 %) [3 (1.9 %) had overstaging, 13 (8.1 %) had understaging]. PET-CT correctly diagnosed N staging in 133 carcinomas (83.1 %) but incorrectly diagnosed N staging in 27 (16.8 %) [4 (2.5 %) had overstaging, 23 (14.4 %) had understaging]. Sensitivity, accuracy, and negative predictive value for N staging by DWI were significantly higher than those by PET-CT. Of the 705 lymph node stations examined, 61 had metastases, and 644 did not. The maximum diameter of metastatic lesions in lymph nodes were 3.0 ± 0.9 mm in 21 lymph node stations not detected by either DWI or PET-CT: 7.2 ± 4.1 mm in 39 detected by DWI, and 11.9 ± 4.1 mm in 24 detected by PET-CT. There were significant differences among them. The sensitivity (63.9 %) for metastatic lymph node stations by DWI was significantly higher than that (39.3 %) by PET-CT. The accuracy (96.2 %) for all lymph node stations by DWI was significantly higher than that (94.3 %) by PET-CT.DWI has advantages over PET-CT in diagnosing malignant from benign lymph nodes of lung cancers.Is there any maximum standardized uptake value variation among positron emission tomography scanners for mediastinal staging in non-small cell lung cancer?The maximum standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) varies among positron emission tomography-integrated computed tomography (PET/CT) centers in the staging of non-small cell lung cancer. We evaluated the ratio of the optimum SUV(max) cut-off for the lymph nodes to the median SUV(max) of the primary tumor (ratioSUV(max)) to determine SUV(max) variations between PET/CT scanners. The previously described PET predictive ratio (PPR) was also evaluated. PET/CT and mediastinoscopy and/or thoracotomy were performed on 337 consecutive patients between September 2005 and March 2009. Thirty-six patients were excluded from the study. The pathological results were correlated with the PET/CT findings. Histopathological examination was performed on 1136 N2 lymph nodes using 10 different PET/CT centers. The majority of patients (group A: 240) used the same PET/CT scanner at four different centers. Others patients were categorized as group B. The ratioSUV(max) for groups A and B was 0.18 and 0.22, respectively. The same ratio for centers 1, 2, 3 and 4 was 0.2, 0.21, 0.21, and 0.23, respectively. The optimal cut-off value of the PPR to predict mediastinal lymph node pathology for malignancy was 0.49 (likelihood ratio +2.02; sensitivity 70%, specificity 65%). We conclude that the ratioSUV(max) was similar for different scanners. Thus, SUV(max) is a valuable cut-off for comparing-centers.Node/aorta and node/liver SUV ratios from (18)F-FDG PET/CT may improve the detection of occult mediastinal lymph node metastases in patients with non-small cell lung carcinoma.Research suggests that the semiquantitative determination of nodal (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) uptake on positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) may be useful for the assessment of mediastinal metastases in patients with non-small-cell lung carcinoma (NSCLC). The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic ability of using different standardized uptake value (SUV) parameters in the detection of ipsilateral mediastinal (N2) disease.A total of 102 patients newly diagnosed with non-small-cell lung carcinoma who underwent (18)F-FDG PET/CT before surgery and had not received prior therapy were retrospectively included. All patients underwent surgical resection of the primary tumor and mediastinal lymph node dissection. On a station-based analysis, different SUV parameters (eg, mediastinal lymph node SUV, node/aorta SUV ratio, and node/liver SUV ratio) were evaluated using the histopathologic results as the reference standard. The optimal cutoff value for each SUV parameter was determined with receiver-operating characteristic curve analysis.The areas under the receiver-operating characteristic curves were 0.674, 0.693, and 0.715 for node SUV, node/aorta SUV ratio, and node/liver SUV ratio, respectively (P < .05). With cutoff values of 3.15, 1.37, and 1.02 for node SUV, node/aorta SUV ratio, and node/liver SUV ratio, respectively, the sensitivity of (18)F-FDG PET/CT for N2 staging was 57.1%, 85.7%, and 71.4%, and specificity was 74.2%, 50.5%, and 61.9%.Compared to node SUV alone, the use of node/aorta and node/liver SUV ratios resulted in improved detection of N2 metastases. The two SUV parameters may potentially improve the diagnostic accuracy of (18)F-FDG PET/CT for the diagnosis of N2 disease in patients with non-small-cell lung carcinoma.Positron emission tomography-computed tomography compared with invasive mediastinal staging in non-small cell lung cancer: results of mediastinal staging in the early lung positron emission tomography trial.Patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) require careful preoperative staging to define resectability for potential cure. Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography combined with computed tomography (FDG PET-CT) is widely used to stage NSCLC. If the mediastinum is positive on PET-CT examination, some practitioners conclude that the patient is inoperable and refer the patient for nonsurgical treatment.In this analysis of a previously reported trial comparing PET-CT with conventional imaging in the diagnostic work-up of patients with clinical stage I, II, or IIIA NSCLC, we determined the accuracy of PET-CT in mediastinal staging compared with invasive mediastinal staging either by mediastinoscopy alone or by mediastinoscopy combined with thoracotomy.All 149 patients had mediastinal nodal staging at mediastinoscopy alone (14), thoracotomy alone (64), or both (71). The sensitivity of PET-CT was 70% (95% confidence interval [CI], 48-85%), and specificity was 94% (95% CI, 88-97%). Of 22 patients with a PET-CT interpreted as positive for mediastinal nodes, 8 did not have tumor. The positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 64% (95% CI, 43-80%) and 95% (95% CI, 90-98%), respectively. Based on PET-CT alone, eight patients would have been denied potentially curative surgery if the mediastinal abnormalities detected by PET-CT had not been evaluated with an invasive mediastinal procedure.PET-CT assessment of the mediastinum is associated with a clinically relevant false-positive rate. Our study confirms the need for pathologic confirmation of mediastinal lymph node abnormalities detected by PET-CT.Stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer: preoperative mediastinal nodal staging with integrated FDG PET/CT--a prospective study.To prospectively evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of integrated fluorine 18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) (PET/CT) for the preoperative diagnosis of mediastinal nodal metastasis in stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), with surgical and histologic results as reference standards.Institutional review board approval and informed consent were obtained. From June 2003 to February 2005, 150 patients (89 men and 61 women; mean age, 59 years) with stage T1 NSCLC at stand-alone CT underwent integrated PET/CT and surgical staging. Two observers (one radiologist and one nuclear medicine physician) evaluated prospectively and in consensus the mediastinal nodes by analyzing both PET (functional) and CT (anatomic) images. Nodal stages were determined by using the American Joint Committee on Cancer staging system and surgical and histologic findings as the reference standard. Statistical evaluation of malignant lymph nodes was performed on per-nodal-station and per-person bases.A total of 568 mediastinal nodal stations were evaluated. Nodes were positive for malignancy in 34 (23%) of 150 patients and 55 (10%) of 568 nodal stations. For depiction of malignant nodes, the respective sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of integrated PET/CT were 42% (23 of 55), 100% (513 of 513), 100% (23 of 23), 94% (513 of 545), and 94% (536 of 568) on per-nodal-station basis and 47% (16 of 34), 100% (116 of 116), 100% (16 of 16), 87% (116 of 134), and 88% (132 of 150) on a per-patient basis.Integrated FDG PET/CT provides high specificity and positive predictive value of mediastinal nodal staging in stage T1 NSCLC, although the sensitivity is low.Ratio of the maximum standardized uptake value on FDG-PET of the mediastinal (N2) lymph nodes to the primary tumor may be a universal predictor of nodal malignancy in patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer.The maximum standardized uptake value (maxSUV) on F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) scan of mediastinal (N2) lymph nodes may predict pathology in patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer. However, the maxSUV varies among PET scanners. Thus, we evaluated the ratio of the maxSUV of the lymph node to the primary tumor at different centers to determine whether it was a universal predictor of lymph node malignancy.This is a retrospective review of a prospective database. Patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer, a dedicated FDG-PET with the maxSUV of the primary lung tumor and FDG-avid mediastinal (N2) nodes reported (before therapy), and who underwent lymph node removal were eligible.There were 239 patients with 335 FDG-PET-positive N2 nodes at 14 different PET centers. The median ratio of the maxSUV of the lymph node to the maxSUV of the primary tumor of the pathologically proven malignant nodes was 0.58 (range, 0.32 to 1.61). Benign nodes had a median ratio of 0.40 (range, 0.21 to 1.10, p = 0.02). The median value was similar for all centers except one. Receiver operating characteristics analysis determined the optimal value of the ratio that maximized sensitivity to be 0.56 or greater (+LR 6.6, sensitivity 94%, specificity 72%).The ratio of the maxSUV of the mediastinal (N2) lymph node to the maxSUV of the primary tumor in patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer predicts mediastinal nodal pathology across different PET centers. When the ratio is 0.56 or greater, there is a 94% chance that the node is malignant. The ratio may take into account the different techniques used at different centers.18F-FDG PET/CT in mediastinal lymph node staging of non-small-cell lung cancer in a tuberculosis-endemic country: consideration of lymph node calcification and distribution pattern to improve specificity.The aim of the study was to assess the accuracy of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET/CT in mediastinal lymph node staging of patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) in a region with a high prevalence of granulomatous disease.Between March 2004 and February 2006, all patients with NSCLC underwent FDG PET/CT and contrast-enhanced thoracic CT, and subsequent surgical resection. PET/CT and contrast-enhanced CT images of 182 patients (126 men and 56 women; mean age 60.7 years) with NSCLC were acquired. Mediastinal node staging was determined using the American Joint Committee on Cancer (AJCC) staging system. Surgical and histological findings served as the reference standard.A total of 182 patients with 778 mediastinal node stations were evaluated. Sensitivity and specificity of contrast-enhanced CT were 36% and 80% on a per-patient basis and 23% and 92% on a per-node station basis. Sensitivity and specificity of PET/CT were 81% and 73% on a per-patient basis and 75% and 85% on a per-node station basis. After lymph nodes with calcification and bilateral hilar distribution were considered benign, sensitivity and specificity of PET/CT were 75% and 89% on a per-patient basis and 66% and 96% on a per-node station basis.This prospective study suggests that FDG PET/CT can more accurately stage mediastinal lymph nodes than CT. Considering lymph node calcification and distribution pattern could improve specificity at the cost of a decrease in sensitivity.Integrated fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG) PET/CT compared to standard contrast-enhanced CT for characterization and staging of pulmonary tumors eligible for surgical resection.Accurate staging is necessary to determine the appropriate therapy in patients with lung cancer. Few studies have compared integrated fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) and contrast-enhanced CT in the characterization and staging of pulmonary tumors considered eligible for surgical resection.To compare 18F-FDG PET/CT with standard contrast-enhanced CT for the diagnosis and staging of lung neoplasms eligible for surgical resection.Seventy-six consecutive patients (56 male, 20 female; mean age+/-SD, 63.4+/-20 years) with 84 pulmonary tumors suspected for malignancy and considered eligible for surgical resection were prospectively enrolled. Seventy-three malignant (65 non-small-cell lung carcinomas, one small-cell lung cancer, two carcinoids, and five metastases) and 11 benign lung tumors (three hamartomas, two sarcoidosis, one amyloidosis, one Wegener granulomatosis, one tuberculosis, and three areas of scarring) were finally diagnosed by histology. Tumor staging was based on the revised American Joint Committee on Cancer.In lesion characterization, the sensitivity and specificity of 18F-FDG PET/CT versus contrast-enhanced CT were 90% vs. 83% and 18% vs. 63% (P<0.05, McNemar test), respectively. In nodal staging, the sensitivity and specificity of 18F-FDG PET/CT versus contrast-enhanced CT were 78% vs. 46% and 80% vs. 93% (P<0.05), respectively.In patients with lung neoplasms considered eligible for surgical resection, (18)F-FDG PET/CT versus contrast-enhanced CT revealed higher sensitivity in nodal staging, but lower specificity both in lesion characterization and nodal staging.Effect of PET/CT on management of patients with non-small cell lung cancer: results of a prospective study with 5-year survival data.We investigated the incremental management impact and prognostic value of staging with (18)F-FDG PET/CT in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) being considered for potentially curative therapies.Information on 168 consecutive patients with NSCLC being considered for surgery or definitive radiotherapy with curative intent before PET/CT was entered into a prospective database. The pre-PET/CT management plan, based on conventional imaging (conventional CT, appropriately supplemented by bone scintigraphy or other modalities), was defined prospectively by referring clinicians before PET/CT results became available. After PET/CT, actual clinical management was recorded, and patients were followed up until 5 y or death. The appropriateness of PET/CT management plans was assessed by biopsy when available, clinical follow-up, and survival analysis.Stage was discordant on PET/CT and conventional imaging in 50.6% of patients (41.1% upstaged, 9.5% downstaged), with high management impact (change in treatment modality or curative intent) in 42.3% of patients. Both conventional imaging stage and PET/CT stage were strongly predictive of overall survival (OS) but there were greater differences between hazard rates and separations in the OS curves for stage groupings determined using PET/CT. OS was also strongly predicted by PET/CT-directed choice of therapy (P < 0.0001).PET/CT frequently affects patient management and strongly predicts OS in NSCLC, supporting the appropriateness of such changes.The validity of preoperative lymph node staging guidelines of European Society of Thoracic Surgeons in non-small-cell lung cancer patients.The European Society of Thoracic Surgeons (ESTS) has proposed preoperative lymph-node staging guidelines (LNSGs) for non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) based on the introduction of new staging modalities into clinical practice. The validity of these guidelines was assessed.Among the patients (n=185) with histologically confirmed NSCLC diagnosed between 2007 and 2009, who were suitable for thoracotomy, the 168 who underwent computed tomography (CT) of the chest and CT-integrated positron emission tomography (PET-CT) were included in the study. The preoperative mediastinal stage was confirmed by mediastinoscopy in all patients. A thoracotomy was done for mediastinoscopy-negative patients. The mediastinal staging results were adapted to the ESTS-LNSG (direct thoracotomy for T1-2 N0 tumour according to CT and PET-CT and invasive staging for others) and the validity of the guidelines was tested.In this series, the overall mediastinal lymph-node metastasis (MLNM) prevalence was 29.2%. If the guidelines had been applied, thoracotomy without invasive mediastinal staging would have been done in only 11 (6.5%) patients, and no MLNM would have been detected. Mediastinoscopy would have been performed in 157 patients and MLNM would have been found in 41 (26%). In the 116 mediastinoscopy-negative patients, MLNM would have been detected after thoracotomy in an additional eight patients. Thus, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the guidelines were calculated as 84%, 100%, 100% and 94%, respectively.The preoperative LNSGs for NSCLC proposed by the ESTS are effective.Application of endobronchial ultrasound-guided transbronchial needle aspiration following integrated PET/CT in mediastinal staging of potentially operable non-small cell lung cancer.The role of endobronchial ultrasound-guided transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) following integrated PET/CT scanning in mediastinal staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) has not been assessed.We prospectively evaluated the diagnostic values of PET/CT scanning and EBUS-TBNA for mediastinal staging in 117 patients with potentially operable NSCLC with accessible mediastinal lymph nodes (diameter range, 5 to 20 mm) by EBUS-TBNA. Subgroup analysis according to histologic type was performed.Of 30 cases of mediastinal metastasis, 27 were confirmed by EBUS-TBNA and 3 were confirmed by surgery. EBUS-TBNA results confirmed all cases with true-positive PET/CT scan findings and six of nine cases with false-negative PET/CT scan findings. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value (NPV), and accuracy of EBUS-TBNA in the detection of mediastinal metastasis were 90.0%, 100%, 100%, 96.7%, and 97.4%, respectively. For PET/CT scans, the values were 70.0%, 59.8%, 37.5%, 85.2%, and 62.4%, respectively (p = 0.052; p < 0.001; p < 0.001; p = 0.011; p < 0.001, respectively). In adenocarcinoma (n = 55), EBUS-TBNA detected four of six cases with false-negative PET/CT scan findings, and the NPV was higher for EBUS-TBNA than for PET/CT scans (94.6% vs 77.8%, respectively; p = 0.044). In squamous cell carcinoma (n = 53), the NPV of EBUS-TBNA and PET/CT scans were similarly high (97.9% vs 96.3%, respectively; p = 0.689).EBUS-TBNA was an effective invasive method following PET/CT scanning in the mediastinal staging of potentially operable NSCLC. In mediastinal PET/CT scan-positive cases, EBUS-TBNA was an excellent tool for detecting mediastinal metastasis. Even in mediastinal PET/CT scan-negative cases, EBUS-TBNA can be useful for confirming mediastinal metastases, especially in adenocarcinoma.Mediastinal lymph nodes staging by 18F-FDG PET/CT for early stage non-small cell lung cancer: a multicenter study.Accurate staging of mediastinal lymph nodes metastases is critical for determining the application of stereotactic body radiation therapy (SBRT) for patients with early stage non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). In this multicenter study the accuracy of (18)F-FDG PET/CT to detect lymph node metastases was evaluated for early stage NSCLC.The data from the patients with stage1 NSCLC who received preoperative (18)F-FDG PET/CT staging and radical surgery was retrospectively reviewed of five centers from February 2004 to August 2010. The lymph node metastases were confirmed histopathologically after radical surgery. And the sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) were calculated for PET/CT staging.Two hundred patients were enrolled. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, PPV and NPV for lymph node metastases on PET/CT were 44%, 83%, 78%, 29% and 91%, respectively. There were eight and 19 cases positive for lymph node metastases with central (n=62) and peripheral (n=138) NSCLC (P>0.05), respectively.(18)F-FDG PET/CT was specific in N(0) staging for T(1-2) NSCLC. The NPV was about 91% in clinical N(0) patients, suggested that (18)F-FDG PET/CT may help to accurately stage N(0) patients and thus identify patients for SBRT.Accuracy of 18F-FDG PET/CT for lymph node staging in non-small-cell lung cancers.This retrospective study evaluated the diagnostic accuracy of 2-(F18)-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography ((18)F-FDG-PET)/computed tomography (PET/CT) in the preoperative diagnosis of metastatic mediastinal and hilar lymph node in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC).A total of 39 patients received preoperative (18)F-FDG PET/CT and the postoperative biopsy. We compared preoperative PET/CT scan results with corresponding intraoperative histopathalogic findings in 39 NSCLC patients. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive and negative predictive value of (18)F-FDG PET/CT were assessed.Histopathologic examination confirmed metastasis in 57 out of the 208 excised lymph nodes; 23 of the 57 nodes were mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of PET/CT in the preoperative diagnosis of mediastinal lymph node metastasis in NSCLC patients were 65%, 96.8%, 92%, 78.5% and 90%, respectively.PET/CT scan showed good accuracy in the preoperative diagnosis of mediastinal and hilar lymph node metastasis in the patients with NSCLC. We recommend that PET/CT scanning be used as a first-line evaluation tool for tumor diagnosis, therapy evaluation and follow-up.Combined endobronchial and endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for mediastinal nodal staging of lung cancer.Recently, transesophageal endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has been evaluated for mediastinal nodal staging (N staging) of lung cancer, as this technique is less invasive than mediastinoscopy and possibly more accurate than 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography with computed tomography (PET-CT). However, EUS-FNA does not provide access to pretracheal and hilar lymph nodes. More recently, endobronchial ultrasound-guided transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) has been introduced as a novel technique for accessing pretracheal and hilar lymph nodes. Although the combined endoscopic approach of EUS-FNA and EBUS-TBNA is presumably more accurate than PET-CT, only a few reports have quantitatively evaluated its diagnostic ability. Therefore, we prospectively assessed the diagnostic yield of this combined endoscopic approach for mediastinal N staging of lung cancer.A consecutive series of 120 patients with suspected resectable lung cancer on CT findings underwent PET-CT and combined EUS-FNA/EBUS-TBNA. The accuracy and other diagnostic indices of the combined approach in mediastinal N staging were compared with those of PET-CT.Among the enrolled patients, a final pathological N stage was established in 110 patients. The accuracy of the combined approach using EUS-FNA and EBUS-TBNA was significantly higher than that of PET-CT (90.0 % vs. 73.6 %; P < 0.0001). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were respectively 71.8 %, 100 %, 100 %, and 86.6 % for the combined approach vs. 47.4 %, 87.5 %, 66.7 %, and 75.9 % for PET-CT.The combined endoscopic approach using EUS-FNA and EBUS-TBNA provided excellent diagnostic performance. Therefore, this approach is strongly recommended before surgery or mediastinoscopy to avoid futile thoracotomy and surgical intervention.Pulmonary lesion assessment: comparison of whole-body hybrid MR/PET and PET/CT imaging--pilot study.To compare the performance of magnetic resonance (MR)/positron emission tomography (PET) imaging in the staging of lung cancer with that of PET/computed tomography (CT) as the reference standard and to compare the quantification accuracy of a new whole-body MR/PET system with corresponding PET/CT data sets.Institutional review board approval and informed consent were obtained. Ten patients in whom bronchial carcinoma was proven or clinically suspected underwent clinically indicated fluorine 18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET/CT and, immediately thereafter, whole-body MR/PET imaging with a new hybrid whole-body system (3.0-T MR imager with integrated PET system). Attenuation correction of MR/PET images was segmentation based with fat-water separation. Tumor-to-liver ratios were calculated and compared between PET/CT and MR/PET imaging. Tumor staging on the basis of the PET/CT and MR/PET studies was performed by two readers. Spearman rank correlation was used for comparison of data.MR/PET imaging provided diagnostic image quality in all patients, with good tumor delineation. Most lesions (nine of 10) showed pronounced FDG uptake. One lesion was morphologically suspicious for malignancy at CT and MR imaging but showed no FDG uptake. MR/PET imaging had higher mean tumor-to-liver ratios than did PET/CT (4.4 ± 2.0 [standard deviation] for PET/CT vs 8.0 ± 3.9 for MR/PET imaging). Significant correlation regarding the tumor-to-liver ratio was found between both imaging units (ρ = 0.93; P < .001). Identical TNM scores based on MR/PET and PET/CT data were found in seven of 10 patients. Differences in T and/or N staging occurred mainly owing to modality-inherent differences in lesion size measurement.MR/PET imaging of the lung is feasible and provides diagnostic image quality in the assessment of pulmonary masses. Similar lesion characterization and tumor stage were found in comparing PET/CT and MR/PET images in most patients.Accuracy and predictive features of FDG-PET/CT and CT for diagnosis of lymph node metastasis of T1 non-small-cell lung cancer manifesting as a subsolid nodule.To retrospectively evaluate the diagnostic accuracy and predictive features of F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/ computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) and CT in lymph node (LN) staging of T1 non-small-cell lung cancers (NSCLCs) manifesting as subsolid nodules.From January 2005 to May 2011, 160 patients with pathologically proven T1 subsolid NSCLCs with LN staging were included in this study. Diagnostic accuracies of FDG-PET/CT and CT for LN staging were evaluated. Maximum standardised uptake value (SUVmax) and CT features of primary tumours were evaluated to investigate predictive factors for LN metastasis.LN metastases were found in nine of the 160 patients (5.6%). No LN metastasis was present in patients with a solid proportion ≤50%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of FDG-PET/CT for LN staging on a per-patient basis were 11.1%, 86.1% and 81.9%; those of CT were 11.1%, 96.7% and 91.9%. Among patients with a solid proportion >50%, there were significant differences in SUVmax, solid portion size, solid proportion and lesion location between patients with and without LN metastasis. Multivariate analysis revealed that higher SUVmax, a larger solid proportion and central location were independent predictors of LN metastasis.FDG-PET/CT adds little value to CT in the lymph node staging of T1 subsolid NSCLCs.Lymph node (LN) metastases are important in non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC). • Positron emission tomography (PET) helps to stage solid NSCLCs. • FDG-PET/CT adds little to the LN staging of T1 subsolid NSCLCs. • No LN metastasis in patients with a solid proportion ≤50%. • LN metastasis is more common in solid and/or centrally sited tumours.Is palpation of the nonresected pulmonary lobe(s) required for patients with non-small cell lung cancer? A prospective study.Video-assisted lobectomy is an increasingly used technique to treat patients with non-small cell lung cancer but it does not usually afford lung palpation.A prospective study was conducted on patients with tumors amenable to video-assisted lobectomy (noncentral lesion and <5 cm) who underwent open lobectomy via thoracotomy. All patients underwent 64-slice helical computed tomographic scan with intravenous contrast at 5-mm intervals and had integrated 2-deoxy-2-18F-fluoro-D-glucose positron emission tomography computed tomography 30 days or less before thoracotomy. Unsuspected malignant pulmonary nodules that were palpated and removed (from a different lobe than the one resected) and that were not imaged preoperatively were defined as cancer that would have been missed by video-assisted lobectomy.From January 2006 to February 2007, 166 patients had non-small cell lesions that were resected via thoracotomy, despite being amenable to video-assisted surgery, by one surgeon. Thirty-seven (22%) patients had pulmonary nodules that probably would have been missed by video-assisted lobectomy; 14 (8.4%) of these nodules were malignant. These were unsuspected M1 pulmonary lesions in 9 patients and unsuspected different types of primary non-small cell lung cancers in 5 patients. All missed lesions were less than 6 mm and in different lobes from the one resected. Nine (64%) of these 14 patients' primary known lesions were pathologic T1 lesions. Nine patients received adjuvant chemotherapy because of these unsuspected M1 nodules.Open lobectomy that affords palpation of the rest of the lung may discover nonimaged malignant pulmonary nodules in different lobes in 8% to 9% of patients with non-small cell lung cancer despite preoperative fine-cut chest computed tomographic scan with contrast and integrated integrated 2-deoxy-2-18F-fluoro-D-glucose positron emission tomography computed tomographic scanning. The clinical impact of these findings is unknown.Significance of PET/CT in determining actual TNM staging for patients with various lung cancers.We investigated the difference in TNM stage of lung cancer provided by PET/CT (combining positron emission tomography and computed tomography) as compared with TNM stage obtained with conventional imaging studies (CI) with contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) with iron contrast media. Sixty-seven cases of lung cancer were included in this study. Overall, the rate of correction of TNM staging was 70.1% after PET/CT. The correction rate for each factor was 32.8% in T, 37.3% in N, and 37.3% in M. High rates of correction were observed in small cell lung cancer (SCLC), with 75% (6/8 cases) obtained by PET/CT. When SCLCs were divided into limited disease (n = 6) involving 1 hemithorax, including mediastinal and contralateral hilar lymph nodes, and others (extensive disease, n = 2), the correction rate was as high as 80% for limited disease. In conclusion, PET/CT can provide actual TNM staging and recognition for oncologists in staging, which would not mislead to selection of inadequate subsequent treatment.The effectiveness of 18F-FDG PET/CT combined with STIR MRI for diagnosing nodal involvement in the thorax.The purpose of this study was to compare the efficacy of short-tau inversion-recovery (STIR) MRI and 18F-FDG PET/CT for the detection of metastasis in mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes in patients with lung cancer.Ninety-three patients with known or suspected lung cancer with mediastinal and hilar lymph node swelling underwent STIR MRI and 18F-FDG PET/CT examinations. STIR MRI scans were obtained with a 2% copper sulfate phantom placed along the back of each patient, with the lymph node-to-phantom ratio calculated for quantitative analysis. For qualitative analysis, the results of all STIR MRI scans were evaluated using a 5-point visual scoring system. To evaluate the diagnostic capabilities of STIR MRI and 18F-FDG PET/CT, we used receiver-operating-characteristic curve analysis to determine the optimal thresholds for the lymph node-to-phantom ratio, visual score, and maximal standardized uptake value. Further, the capability of each to determine N-stage was compared in each patient using the McNemar test.A total of 137 lymph nodes (82 malignant lesions, 55 benign lesions) were analyzed. When optimal threshold values were adopted, the quantitative and qualitative sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of STIR MRI were not significantly different from those of 18F-FDG PET/CT. However, 18F-FDG PET/CT in combination with qualitative STIR MRI analysis had a significantly higher capability to detect nodal involvement on an individual-patient basis (96.9% specificity, 90.3% accuracy) than did 18F-FDG PET/CT alone (65.6% specificity, 81.7% accuracy).We found that the diagnostic capability of STIR MRI was not significantly different from that of 18F-FDG PET/CT. However, when those methods were combined, the diagnostic capability for N-staging was significantly improved.Positron-emission tomography for lung cancer in a tuberculosis-endemic region.A potential limitation of integrated positron-emission tomography and computed tomography in non-small-cell lung cancer may be false-positive results due to granulomatous disease. This retrospective study examined the accuracy of this imaging modality for mediastinal nodal staging of non-small-cell lung cancer in Hong Kong where tuberculosis remains endemic. There were 249 lymph node stations evaluated in 107 patients, of whom 38 (36%) had active tuberculosis or evidence of previous tuberculosis. Imaging results were compared with histological findings. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of integrated imaging for mediastinal nodal staging were 52%, 86%, and 80%, respectively; the overall positive-predictive value for mediastinal nodal metastasis was 46%, and the overall negative-predictive value was 89%. The positive-predictive value for mediastinal nodal metastasis was 39% in patients with tuberculosis and 50% in controls; the negative-predictive value was high in both groups (92% and 87%). The likelihood ratio for true positives was 6.47 in patients with tuberculosis vs. 10.97 in controls. This suggests that the reliability of positron-emission/computed tomography may be substantially poorer in patients with tuberculosis. Histological confirmation should be considered mandatory in patients with suspected metastasis on integrated imaging.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography and whole-body magnetic resonance imaging in staging of advanced nonsmall cell lung cancer--initial results.To evaluate and compare positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) with whole-body magnetic resonance imaging (wbMRI) in the correct staging of patients with advanced nonsmall cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Fifty-two patients with an NSCLC stage IIIa or IIIb (36 males and 16 females) were included in this study. Patients were referred to our department for restaging. Within 1 week PET/CT and wbMRI were performed in all patients. Images were examined independently by 2 experienced physicians from the Department of Nuclear Medicine and Radiology. Afterward, consensus reading was performed. In 22 patients, surgery served as gold standard, whereas in 30 patients, follow-up controls (after 2 months) were performed.The use of wbMRI correctly T-staged all patients. Especially volume interpolated breathhold examination sequence correctly T-staged all tumors. PET/CT did not correctly stage chest wall infiltration in 4 cases [sensitivity 92.3% (P < 0.05 to wbMRI)/specificity 100%], verified by surgery. PET/CT correctly N-staged 51 patients (sensitivity 96.1%/specificity 100%). WbMRI showed a significant tendency to understage N-status [sensitivity 88.5% (P < 0.05)/specificity 96.1%]. Different N-status by PET/CT changed operability in 4 patients. In 2 patients, distant metastases were detected by both techniques.In the correct staging of advanced NSCLC, PET/CT has advantages in N-staging. This is of high relevance for therapy planning. WbMRI especially using volume interpolated breathhold examination sequences, has certain advantages in T-staging.[Comparison between PET(-FDG) and computed tomography in the staging of lung cancer. Consequences for operability in 94 patients].Lung cancer, a major application of FDG/PET-CT, has recently been introduced in daily practice in France. The authors retrospectively studied its impact on the management of this disease.The results of PET-CT and conventional assessment (brain imaging, chest and abdominal CT and possibly bone scintigraphy) were compared in 94 patients, referred for the staging of non-small cell lung cancer, or the assessment of a solitary lung lesion. The impact of thoracic lymph node involvement on the operability of patients was studied in 44 patients.PET-CT revealed metastases in 20% of the patients without metastases found by conventional imaging and modified the stage of the disease in 28% of the cases. It changed the indication of surgical treatment in 19% of the cases and led to induction chemotherapy in two patients. In addition, two synchronous cancers were discovered. Regarding lymph node involvement, PET-CT remains of diagnostic value regardless of the scanner results.The impact of PET-CT in assessing non-small cell lung cancer was confirmed in the authors' practice. Its interest and the consequences in some patients misclassified with conventional assessment have been demonstrated.Contrast enhanced CT versus integrated PET-CT in pre-operative nodal staging of non-small cell lung cancer.The purpose of this study was to retrospectively evaluate the effectiveness of integrated positron emission tomography-computed tomography (PET-CT) in comparison with contrast enhanced CT (CE-CT) in pre-operative staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) by using surgical and pathological findings as the reference standard.From August 2008 to August 2009, 57 consecutive patients (50 males and 7 females; mean age, 59 years; range, 38-79 years) with NSCLC underwent conventional pre-operative lung cancer staging using clinical data and CE-CT of the chest, and integrated whole-body fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose PET-CT studies. Histopathological results served as the reference standard.Forty-eight of the 57 patients (84%) had no lymph node involvement (N0), five (9%) were found to have N1 disease, and four (7%) had N2 disease. There was a significant difference between CE-CT and PET-CT for nodal staging of N0 disease (P < 0.05). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of hilar and mediastinal lymph node staging were 56%, 73%, 28%, 90%, and 70%, with CE-CT, respectively; and 78%, 92%, 64%, 96%, and 89% with PET-CT, respectively.Integrated PET-CT is more accurate than CE-CT for lymph node staging in NSCLC.Evaluation of integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography accuracy in detecting lymph node metastasis in patients with adenocarcinoma vs squamous cell carcinoma.The aim of our study was to analyze the specificity and sensitivity of integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET/CT) in detecting nodal metastasis according to histology (adenocarcinoma vs squamous cell carcinoma), and to identify the factors related to false-negative findings.A retrospective, single-institution review of 353 consecutive patients with suspected or pathologically proven, potentially resectable non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) who had integrated PET/CT scanning at the same centre. Lymph node staging was pathologically confirmed on tissue specimens obtained at mediastinoscopy and/or thoracotomy. Statistical evaluation of PET/CT results was performed on a per-patient and per-nodal-station basis.A total of 2286 nodal stations (1643 mediastinal, 333 hilar and 310 intrapulmonary) were evaluated. Adenocarcinoma was the final diagnosis in 244 patients and squamous carcinoma in 109 patients. Nodes were positive for malignancy in 80 (32.8%) of 244 patients with adenocarcinoma (N1 = 31; N2 = 48 and N3 = 1) and in 32 (29.3%) of 109 with squamous carcinoma (N1 = 21 and N2 = 11). PET/CT in the adenocarcinoma group had a sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of 53.8, 91.5 and 79.1%, and in the squamous cell group, of 87.5, 81.8 and 83.5%, respectively in a per-patient analysis. In the analysis for N2 disease on a per-patient basis, the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy were 38.8, 97.4, and 85.7% for the adenocarcinoma group and 81.8, 91.8 and 90.8% in the squamous cell group. In the adenocarcinoma group, the mean diameter of false-negative lymph nodes was 7 mm (standard deviation [SD] ± 2.5 mm) compared with the diameter of true-positive lymph nodes of 12.5 (SD ± 4 mm; P < 0.00001). In the squamous cell group, the mean diameter of false-negative lymph nodes was 7.4 mm (SD ± 2.8 mm) compared with the diameter of true-positive lymph nodes of 14.7 (SD ± 6 mm; P < 0.005). In the adenocarcinoma group, false-negative lymph nodes were statistically correlated with the presence of vascular invasion and in the squamous cell group only with the maximum standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) < 5.4.The sensitivity of PET/CT in detecting nodal metastasis in patients with adenocarcinoma is too low to avoid any further invasive staging procedure. Ultrasound-guided needle biopsy or mediastinoscopy is still necessary in staging patients undergoing lung resection for adenocarcinoma.Routine mediastinoscopy and esophageal ultrasound fine-needle aspiration in patients with non-small cell lung cancer who are clinically N2 negative: a prospective study.Despite normal mediastinal (N2) lymph nodes shown on positron emission tomography (PET) and CT, some physicians routinely perform mediastinoscopy and/or endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).A prospective trial on patients with NSCLC who were clinically staged N2 negative by both integrated PET/CT and CT scan. All underwent mediastinoscopy and EUS-FNA and if N2 negative underwent thoracotomy with thoracic lymphadenectomy.There were 153 patients (107 men). Of these, 136 patients were clinically staged N0 and 17 patients were clinically staged N1. Of the 136 patients who were staged as N0, 5 patients (3.7%) had positive EUS-FNA results (three in the subcarinal node), and 4 patients (2.9%) had positive mediastinoscopy results (all in the #4R node; one was N3). Six of the remaining 127 patients (4.7%) had N2 disease after resection. Seventeen patients were clinically staged as N1 by integrated PET/CT. Four patients (23.5%) had positive EUS-FNA results (two in the subcarinal node), 3 patients (17.6%) had positive mediastinoscopy results (all in #4R node; two were N2 and one was N3), and none of the remaining 10 patients had N2 disease after resection. Patients with unsuspected N2 disease were twice as likely (relative risk, 2.1; 95% confidence interval, 1.24 to 2.51; p = 0.02) to have a maximum standardized uptake value (maxSUV) > 10 and poorly differentiated cancer (relative risk, 2.1; 95% confidence interval, 1.14 to 2.38; p = 0.03).We do not recommend routine mediastinoscopy or EUS-FNA in patients who are clinically staged as N0 after both integrated PET/CT and CT. However, these procedures should both be considered in patients clinically staged as N1 after PET/CT, and/or in those with adenocarcinoma, upper-lobe tumors, or tumors with a maxSUV > or = 10.The prognostic significance of maximum standardized uptake value of primary tumor in surgically treated non-small-cell lung cancer patients: analysis of 413 cases.Integrated PET/CT is widely used in the preoperative staging and prognostic assessment of non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients. The aims of this study were to evaluate the prognostic significance of SUVmax of primary tumor in patients undergoing surgical treatment and, in order to minimize technical interferences, to verify whether SUVmax standardized by SUVmax liver or SUVmax blood pool provided additional prognostic information.A retrospective study of 413 consecutive NSCLC patients undergoing potentially curative surgical resection after PET/CT obtained in the same PET center over a 6-year period. The SUVmax was calculated drawing region of interest around the primitive tumor, the liver, and the aortic arch in PET images. The same procedure was performed for 2 adjacent planes and the average of these measures was considered.Nine patients were considered 30-day postoperative deaths and were excluded from the analysis. At the end of the study, 312 (77.2%) of the 404 patients were alive (median follow-up, 26 months) and 92 had died (median survival, 17 months). At multivariate analysis tumor-node-metastasis stage, primary tumor grading and primary tumor SUVmax (T-SUVmax) were found to be independent prognostic factors, while T-SUVmax/SUVmax blood pool ratio, and T-SUVmax/SUVmax liver ratio were not.T-SUVmax is an independent predictor for survival in NSCLC patients undergoing surgery and might be helpful in guiding adjuvant treatment strategies. SUVmax of primary tumor normalized by SUV blood pool or SUV liver does not provide additional prognostic information.Dual-time point scanning of integrated FDG PET/CT for the evaluation of mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer diagnosed as operable by contrast-enhanced CT.To evaluate whether dual-time point scanning with integrated fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose ((18)F-FDG) positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET/CT) is useful for evaluation of mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer diagnosed as operable by contrast-enhanced CT.PET/CT data and pathological findings of 560 nodal stations in 129 patients with pathologically proven non-small cell lung cancer diagnosed as operable by contrast-enhanced CT were reviewed retrospectively. Standardized uptake values (SUVs) on early scans (SUVe) 1h, and on delayed scans (SUVd) 2h after FDG injection of each nodal station were measured. Retention index (RI) (%) was calculated by subtracting SUVe from SUVd and dividing by SUVe. Logistic regression analysis was performed with seven kinds of models, consisting of (1) SUVe, (2) SUVd, (3) RI, (4) SUVe and SUVd, (5) SUVe and RI, (6) SUVd and RI, and (7) SUVe, SUVd and RI. The seven derived models were compared by receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis. k-Fold cross-validation was performed with k values of 5 and 10. p<0.05 was considered statistically significant.Model (1) including the term of SUVe showed the largest area under the ROC curve among the seven models. The cut-off probability of metastasis of 3.5% with SUVe of 2.5 revealed a sensitivity of 78% and a specificity of 81% on ROC analysis, and approximately 60% and 80% on k-fold cross-validation.Single scanning of PET/CT is sufficiently useful for evaluating mediastinal and hilar nodes for metastasis.The clinical stage of non-small cell lung cancer as assessed by means of fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scanning is less accurate in cigarette smokers.The treatment of non-small cell lung cancer depends on the stage, and this is clinically best determined by using fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography. We evaluated the effect smoking has on the accuracy of this test.We performed a prospective cohort study evaluating the accuracy of clinical stage compared with pathologic stage between cigarette smokers and nonsmokers with non-small cell lung cancer. All patients were assigned a clinical TNM stage after fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scanning and then underwent meticulously pathologic TNM staging. If N2, N3, or M1 negative, patients underwent thoracotomy with complete thoracic lymphadenectomy. The clinical and pathologic stages were compared.There were 246 patients: 52 never smoked (NS group), 112 quit at least 1 month before fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography (Q group), and 82 were still smokers (S group). The 3 groups were similar for stage and histology. The overall accuracy was 83%, 80%, and 64% for the NS, Q, and S groups, respectively (P = .03). The accuracy for the T status was 88%, 84%, and 86%; accuracy for the N2 lymph nodes was 96%, 75%, and 72%; and accuracy for the N1 lymph nodes was 92%, 78%, and 80%, respectively, favoring the NS group. The greater the pack-year history, the greater the N2 inaccuracy (P = .04). Multivariate analysis showed that status of smoking (P = .026) and maxSUV value (P = .014) were independent predictors of fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography accuracy.Patients with non-small cell lung cancer who continue to smoke at the time of their fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scan have less accurate clinical staging compared with those who stopped 1 month before or who never smoked. As the pack-years increase, the accuracy for the N2 nodes decrease. Nonsmokers have the most accurate clinical staging.Non-small cell lung cancer: dual-modality PET/CT in preoperative staging.To determine the accuracy of dual-modality positron emission tomographic (PET)-computed tomographic (CT) imaging, as compared with PET alone and CT alone, in the staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Twenty-seven patients with NSCLC underwent staging with combined fluorine 18 fluorodeoxyglucose PET and CT. CT, PET, and coregistered PET/CT images were evaluated separately by two different physicians for each imaging modality, and disease stage was determined by using TNM and American Joint Committee on Cancer staging systems. Histopathologic results served as the reference standard. The statistical significance of differences among CT, PET, and PET/CT was determined by using the McNemar test.Overall tumor stage was correctly classified as 0-IV with CT in 19 patients, with PET in 20 patients, and with PET/CT in 26 patients. PET/CT findings when compared with PET findings led to a treatment change for four patients (15%) and when compared with CT findings led to a treatment change for five patients (19%). Differences in the accuracy of overall tumor staging between PET/CT and CT (P =.008) and between PET/CT and PET (P =.031) were significant. Primary tumor stage was correctly determined in more patients with PET/CT than with either PET alone or CT alone. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of regional lymph node staging, respectively, were 89%, 94%, 89%, 94%, and 93%, with PET/CT; 89%, 89%, 80%, 94%, and 89% with PET; and 70%, 59%, 50%, 77%, and 63% with CT. Fourteen distant metastases were detected in four patients with CT, four were detected in two patients with PET, and 17 were detected in four patients with PET/CT.Use of dual-modality PET/CT significantly increases the number of patients with correctly staged NSCLC and thus has a positive effect on treatment.Accuracy of positron emission tomography in mediastinal node assessment in coal workers with lung cancer.The purpose of this study was to explore the accuracy of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) in the assessment of mediastinal lymph node in coal workers who had non-small cell lung cancer. We retrospectively reviewed 42 retired coal workers who had lung cancer without distant metastasis, between May 2007 and May 2010. Regarding the mediastinal lymph nodes, when the standard uptake value was greater than 2.5, it was considered "malignancy positive." After histological examination of the mediastinal lymph nodes, anthracotic and metastatic ones were detected. The results of PET/CT were analyzed to determine its accuracy. Of these 42 patients, PET/CT detected 47 positive mediastinal lymph nodes in 24 patients with a mean SUV maximum of 6.2 (2.6-13.8). One hundred and thirty-one mediastinal lymph node foci were dissected. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of FDG-PET/CT in detecting nodal metastases were 84% (16/19), 65% (15/23), 66% (16/24), 83% (15/18), and 74% (31/42) on a per-patient basis, respectively. Mediastinal node staging with FDG-PET/CT in coal workers is insufficient due to the high false-positive rates due to the presence of pneumoconiosis. In these patients, an invasive technique such as mediastinoscopy seems mandatory for confirmation of ipsilateral or contralateral mediastinal lymph node metastasis.Improved radiologic staging of lung cancer with 2-[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography and computed tomography registration.To determine if volumetric nonlinear registration or registration of thoracic computed tomography (CT) and 2-[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) datasets changes the detection of mediastinal and hilar nodal disease in patients undergoing staging for lung cancer and if it has any impact on radiologic lung cancer staging.Computer-based image registration was performed on 45 clinical thoracic helical CT and FDG-PET scans of patients with lung cancer who were staged by mediastinoscopy and/or thoracotomy. Thoracic CT, FDG-PET, and registration datasets were each interpreted by 2 readers for the presence of metastatic nodal disease and were staged independently of each other. Results were compared with surgical pathologic findings.One hundred and thirty lymph node stations in the mediastinum and hila were evaluated each on CT, PET, and registration datasets. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value, respectively, for detecting metastatic nodal disease for CT were 74%, 78%, 55%, 88%; for PET with CT side by side, 59% to 76%, 77% to 89%, 48% to 68%, and 84% to 91%; and for CT-PET registration, 71% to 76%, 89% to 96%, 70% to 86%, and 90% to 91%. Registration images were significantly more sensitive in detecting nodal disease over PET for 1 reader (P = 0.0156) and were more specific than PET (P = 0.0107 and 0.0017) in identifying the absence of mediastinal disease for both readers. Registration was significantly more accurate for staging when compared with PET for both readers (P = 0.002 and 0.035).Registration of CT and FDG-PET datasets significantly improved the specificity of detecting metastatic disease. In addition, registration improved the radiologic staging of lung cancer patients when compared with CT or FDG-PET alone.Impact of point spread function reconstruction on thoracic lymph node staging with 18F-FDG PET/CT in non-small cell lung cancer.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the impact of point spread function (PSF) reconstruction on quantitative values and diagnostic accuracy of FDG PET/CT for nodal staging in non-small cell lung cancer.Fifty-eight consecutive PET/CT examinations were reconstructed with both ordered subset expectation maximization (OSEM) and PSF algorithms. Two readers independently performed a randomized blinded review of PET/CT examinations and gave a nodal status (N0, N1, N2, or N3) to each PET data set. When discordant, a consensus was reached with a third reader. Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values (NPV), and positive and negative likelihood ratios (LRs) were assessed and compared using a McNemar test. All PET data sets were then independently analyzed to extract quantitative PET values in 208 nodes and compare them using Bland-Altman analysis.Bland-Altman analysis showed that, on average, PSF reconstruction increased SUVmax, SUVmean, and node/background ratios by 48%, 28%, and 27%, respectively. This increase was more marked for nodes less than 1 cm than for nodes 1 cm or greater (P < 0.0001 for SUVmax, SUVmean, and node/background ratios). Point spread function PET had higher sensitivity (97%) and NPV (92%) than OSEM PET (78% and 57%, respectively; P = 0.01 and P = 0.04, respectively). Negative LR was 0.04 for PSF PET and 0.31 for OSEM PET.By improving activity recovery, especially for nonenlarged nodes, PSF significantly improves the sensitivity, NPV, and negative LR of FDG-PET for nodal staging in non-small cell lung cancer. These data suggest that preoperative invasive nodal staging may be omitted in the case of a negative PSF FDG-PET/CT.Incremental value of PET/CT Over CT for mediastinal nodal staging of non-small cell lung cancer: Comparison between patients with and without idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis.We aimed to compare the incremental value of FDG PET/CT over CT for the assessment of mediastinal nodal status between patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis (IPF) and those with NSCLC but without IPF.Forty-two patients with NSCLC and IPF (mean age, 66 years) were matched to 168 patients with NSCLC but without IPF (mean age, 65 years). Patients underwent surgical mediastinal nodal staging after both integrated PET/CT and contrast-enhanced CT scans had been obtained. Histopathologic nodal assessment served as the reference standard.PET/CT had better specificity (91% [29/32 patients] vs 47% [15/32]; p = 0.0002) and accuracy (83% [35/42] vs 50% [21/42]; p = 0.001) than CT did in patients with IPF. In patients without IPF, PET/CT was better than CT alone with regard to sensitivity (62% [26/42] vs 40% [17/42]; p = 0.0067), specificity (96% [121/126] vs 84% [106/126]; p = 0.0002), and accuracy (88% [147/168] vs 73% [123/168]; p < 0.0001). Thus, the incremental accuracy of PET/CT, which was 33% (14/42) for patients with IPF and 14% (24/168) for patients without IPF (p = 0.0041), was mainly the result of improved specificity.PET/CT offers significantly increased accuracy versus CT in mediastinal nodal staging in patients with NSCLC and IPF compared with patients with NSCLC but without IPF, mainly because of improved specificity.False-positivity of mediastinal lymph nodes has negative effect on survival in potentially resectable non-small cell lung cancer.It has been shown that increased metabolic activity of primary tumour has a negative effect on survival in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) staged with positron emission tomography integrated computed tomography (PET/CT). We hypothesized that an increased metabolic activity of mediastinal lymph nodes would have worse survival even if it is false.Three hundred and twenty-eight consecutive patients with NSCLC histology were imaged with PET/CT within 90 days of surgery between September 2005 and March 2009. Patients who had neoadjuvant chemotherapy (n = 22), patients with prior history of NSCLC (n = 9) or other malignancies within 5 years (n = 11) were excluded from the study. Patients with negative mediastinoscopy underwent resection. Pathological results were revised according to the seventh tumor-node-metastasis staging system. Kaplan-Meier test was used for survival. Log-rank and Cox analyses were used for comparisons.A total of 286 patients (262 male; mean age: 58.5 years) were evaluated. There were 22 (6.7%) operative deaths and none of the patients were lost to follow-up. The median follow-up in the remaining 264 patients was 26 months (range, 2-61 months). Tumour size, nodal spread and stage were all strongly associated with survival from NSCLC (P < 0.001). There were 63 true-positive, 65 false-positive (FP), 152 true-negative (TN) and six false-negative findings on mediastinal staging after PET/CT. The maximum standardized uptake value of primary tumour was significantly higher in FP patients than in TN patients (P = 0.012). After excluding pN2-positive patients, TN patients had better survival than FP patients (P = 0.006). Multivariate analysis showed that false-positivity of mediastinal lymph nodes was independently associated with worse survival (hazard ratio = 0.63; P = 0.02). There were 146 patients with pT1-4, pN0 treated with R0 surgical resection. Disease-free survival and overall survival were also significantly better for TN patients in completely resected group (P = 0.009 versus 0.016).We have shown that false-positivity of mediastinal lymph nodes had yielded worse survival in surgically staged or resected NSCLC patients staged with PET/CT. This result may help to allocate patients with potentially poor prognosis for considered additional therapy.Cost-effectiveness of hybrid PET/CT for staging of non-small cell lung cancer.Although the diagnostic effectiveness of integrated PET/CT for staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) has already been proven, it remains to be determined if tumor staging with combined metabolic and anatomic imaging is also cost-effective. The objective of this study was to evaluate from a payers' perspective the cost-effectiveness of staging NSCLC with CT alone (representing the mainstay diagnostic test) and with integrated PET/CT.The study is based on 172 NSCLC patients from a prospective clinical study who underwent diagnostic, contrast-enhanced helical CT and integrated PET/CT. Imaging was performed at the University Hospital Ulm between May 2002 and December 2004. To calculate treatment costs, we differentiated among cost for diagnosis, cost for nonsurgical treatment according to the clinical diagnosis, and cost for surgical procedures according to the clinical tumor stage.The diagnostic effectiveness in terms of correct TNM staging was 40% (31/77) for CT alone and 60% (46/77) for PET/CT. For the assessment of resectability (tumor stages Ia-IIIa vs. IIIb-IV), 65 of 77 patients (84%) were staged correctly by PET/CT (CT alone, 70% [54/77]). The incremental cost-effectiveness ratios per correctly staged patient were $3,508 for PET/CT versus CT alone. The incremental cost-effectiveness ratios per quality-adjusted life year gained were $79,878 for PET/CT vs. CT alone, decreasing to $69,563 assuming a reduced loss of utility (0.10 quality-adjusted life years) due to surgical morbidity.Cost-effectiveness analyses showed that costs for PET/CT are within the commonly accepted range for diagnostic tests or therapies. Therefore, reimbursement of PET/CT for NSCLC staging can be also recommended from an economic point of view.Prospective preoperative mediastinal lymph node staging by integrated positron emission tomography-computerised tomography in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer.Mediastinal lymph node staging determines the treatment strategy for non-small-cell lung cancer. This study aims to evaluate prospectively the accuracy of preoperative integrated 18-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography-computerised tomography ((18)FDG PET-CT) for mediastinal lymph node staging.Preoperative integrated (18)FDG PET-CT was used to analyse mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer. Nodal stations were identified according to the American Thoracic Society mapping system. Lymph nodes with a standardised uptake value (SUVmax) >3 were considered to be positive. The mediastinal lymph nodes were harvested during lung resection and the results of integrated (18)FDG PET-CT were compared to the mediastinal lymph node histology results.A total of 51 patients were enrolled in this study. The mean interval between integrated (18)FDG PET-CT and surgery was 31+/-15.8 days (range: 2-78 days). The mean mediastinal lymph node harvested and station number per patient during surgery were 11.8+/-5.6 (range: 2-27) and 3.8+/-1 (range: 2-6), respectively. The incidence of N2 pathological disease was 19.6%. The integrated (18)FDG PET-CT sensitivity and specificity were 40+/-30% and 85+/-11%, respectively. The positive and negative predictive values were 40+/-30% and 85+/-11%, respectively. False-positive results (six patients) were mainly due to inflammatory lymph nodes. False-negative results (six patients) were mainly due to infra-centimetrical, malignant lymph node invasion.The sensitivity of integrated (18)FDG PET-CT for mediastinal lymph node staging in patients selected for surgery is low. When positive mediastinal lymph nodes are detected, invasive mediastinal staging must be performed. On the other hand, the specificity is high: patients with negative integrated (18)FDG PET-CT can be operated upon without invasive mediastinal staging.Preoperative intrathoracic lymph node staging in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer: accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography.To evaluate the accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography with 18F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) and computed tomography (PET/CT) in preoperative intrathoracic lymph node staging in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and to ascertain the role of invasive staging in verifying positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) results.Retrospective, single institution study of consecutive patients with suspected or pathologically proven, potentially resectable NSCLC undergoing integrated PET/CT scanning in the same PET centre. Lymph node staging was pathologically confirmed on tissue specimens obtained at mediastinoscopy and/or thoracotomy. Statistical evaluation of PET/CT results was performed on a per-patient and per-nodal-station bases.A total of 1001 nodal stations (723 mediastinal, 148 hilar and 130 intrapulmonary) were evaluated in 159 patients. Nodes were positive for malignancy in 48 (30.2%) out of 159 patients (N1=17; N2=30; N3=1) and 71 (7.1%) out of 1001 nodal stations (N1=24; N2=46; N3=1). At univariate analysis, lymph node involvement was significantly associated (p<0.05) with the following primary tumour characteristics: increasing diameter, maximum standardised uptake value >9, central location and presence of vascular invasion. PET/CT staged the disease correctly in 128 out of 159 patients (80.5%), overstaging occurred in nine patients (5.7%) and understaging in 22 patients (13.8%). The overall sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy of PET/CT for detecting metastatic lymph nodes were 54.2%, 91.9%, 74.3%, 82.3% and 80.5% on a per-patient basis, and 57.7%, 98.5%, 74.5%, 96.8% and 95.6% on per-nodal-station basis. With regard to N2/N3 disease, PET/CT accuracy was 84.9% and 95.3% on a per-patient basis and on per-nodal-station basis, respectively. Referring to nodal size, PET/CT sensitivity to detect malignant involvement was 32.4% (12/37) in nodes <10mm, and 85.3% (29/34) in nodes > or = 10mm.Our data show that integrated PET/CT provides high specificity but low sensitivity and accuracy in intrathoracic nodal staging of NSCLC patients and underscore the continued need for surgical staging.Additional value of PET-CT in the staging of lung cancer: comparison with CT alone, PET alone and visual correlation of PET and CT.Integrated positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) is a new imaging modality offering anatomic and metabolic information. The purpose was to evaluate retrospectively the accuracy of integrated PET-CT in the staging of a suggestive lung lesion, comparing this with the accuracy of CT alone, PET alone and visually correlated PET-CT. Fifty patients undergoing integrated PET-CT for staging of a suggestive lung lesion were studied. Their tumor, node, metastasis (TNM) statuses were determined with CT, PET, visually correlated PET-CT and integrated PET-CT. These TNM stages were compared with the surgical TNM status. Integrated PET-CT was the most accurate imaging technique in the assessment of the TNM status. Integrated PET-CT predicted correctly the T status, N status, M status and TNM status in, respectively, 86%, 80%, 98%, 70% versus 68%, 66%,88%, 46% with CT, 46%, 70%, 96%, 30% with PET and 72%, 68%, 96%, 54% with visually correlated PET-CT. T status and N status were overstaged, respectively, in 8% and 16% with integrated PET-CT, in 20% and 28% with CT, in 16% and 20% with PET, in 12% and 20% with visually correlated PET-CT and understaged in 6% and 4% with integrated PET-CT, versus 12% and 6% with CT, 38% and 10% with PET and 12% with visually correlated PET-CT. Integrated PET-CT improves the staging of lung cancer through a better anatomic localization and characterization of lesions and is superior to CT alone and PET alone. If this technique is not available, visual correlation of PET and CT can be a valuable alternative.Low dose non-enhanced CT versus standard dose contrast-enhanced CT in combined PET/CT protocols for staging and therapy planning in non-small cell lung cancer.To evaluate low dose non-enhanced CT and standard dose contrast-enhanced CT in combined PET/CT protocols for staging and therapy planning of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Retrospective analysis was performed of 50 consecutive patients with proven NSCLC who had been referred for primary staging (n=41) or restaging (n=9). All patients underwent a multi-phase PET/CT consisting of a low dose non-enhanced attenuation scan and an arterial and portal-venous contrast-enhanced CT scan followed by whole-body PET. Fused datasets of non-enhanced and contrast-enhanced PET/CT were compared per patient by using the TNM staging system, and per lesion regarding localisation, characterisation and delineation of tumour lesions. The staging results were validated either by histopathology or by clinical-radiological follow-up for >or=6 months.In 47/50 patients, the results of T staging did not differ between the two PET/CT protocols. Three patients could only be correctly classified as having T4 tumours after contrast application. Regarding N staging, both protocols yielded the same results. In M staging, there was only one patient with an improvement of the results as a result of contrast application. The lesion-based analysis of 92 sites showed no difference in the accuracy of lesion localisation and only one revision of lesion characterisation by contrast-enhanced PET/CT. The assessment of tumour delineation was altered by contrast application in 58/92 sites (p<0.0001). In 10/50 patients, contrast-enhanced PET/CT detected additional clinically important findings.In patients with advanced NSCLC, contrast-enhanced CT as part of the PET/CT protocol more accurately assessed the TNM stage in 8% of patients compared with non-contrast PET/CT. However, for planning of 3D conformal radiotherapy and non-conventional surgery, contrast-enhanced PET/CT protocols are indispensable owing to their superiority in precisely defining the tumour extent.Multimodality approach to mediastinal staging in non-small cell lung cancer. Faults and benefits of PET-CT: a randomised trial.Correct mediastinal staging is a cornerstone in the treatment of patients with non-small cell lung cancer. A large range of methods is available for this purpose, making the process of adequate staging complex. The objective of this study was to describe faults and benefits of positron emission tomography (PET)-CT in multimodality mediastinal staging.A randomised clinical trial was conducted including patients with a verified diagnosis of non-small cell lung cancer, who were considered operable. Patients were assigned to staging with PET-CT (PET-CT group) followed by invasive staging (mediastinoscopy and/or endoscopic ultrasound with fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA)) or invasive staging without prior PET-CT (conventional work up (CWU) group). Mediastinal involvement (dichotomising N stage into N0-1 versus N2-3) was described according to CT, PET-CT, mediastinoscopy, EUS-FNA and consensus (based on all available information), and compared with the final N stage as verified by thoracotomy or a conclusive invasive diagnostic procedure.A total of 189 patients were recruited, 98 in the PET-CT group and 91 in the CWU group. In an intention-to-treat analysis the overall accuracy of the consensus N stage was not significantly higher in the PET-CT group than in the CWU group (90% (95% confidence interval 82% to 95%) vs 85% (95% CI 77% to 91%)). Excluding the patients in whom PET-CT was not performed (n=14) the difference was significant (95% (95% CI 88% to 98%) vs 85% (95% CI 77% to 91%), p=0.034). This was mainly based on a higher sensitivity of the staging approach including PET-CT.An approach to lung cancer staging with PET-CT improves discrimination between N0-1 and N2-3. In those without enlarged lymph nodes and a PET-negative mediastinum the patient may proceed directly to surgery. However, enlarged lymph nodes on CT needs confirmation independent of PET findings and a positive finding on PET-CT needs confirmation before a decision on surgery is made.NCT00867412.Fusion positron emission/computed tomography underestimates the presence of hilar nodal metastases in patients with resected non-small cell lung cancer.The 5-year survival for patients with resected stage II (N1) non-small cell lung cancer ranges from 40% to 55%. No data exist addressing the benefit of neoadjuvant therapy for patients with stage II disease. This is largely in part due to the lack of a reliable, minimally invasive method to assess hilar nodes. This study is aimed at determining the ability of fusion positron emission/computed tomography (PET/CT) to identify hilar metastases in patients with resected non-small cell lung cancer.A retrospective review of surgically resected patients with fusion PET/CT within 30 days of resection was performed. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for PET/CT in detecting hilar nodal metastases was calculated for a range of maximum standardized uptake values (SUVmax). Hilar nodes from patients with falsely positive PET/CT scans were analyzed for the presence of histoplasmosis. Additionally, the impact of hilar node size greater than 1 centimeter on the calculated values was assessed.There were 119 patients evaluated. The number of lymph nodes resected ranged from 1 to 12 (X=2.98). There was decreased sensitivity and increased specificity with higher SUVmax cutoff values. At the standard SUVmax value of 2.5, the sensitivity and specificity were only 48.5% and 80.2%. The addition of size of hilar node by CT led to a modest improvement in sensitivity at all SUVmax cutoff values.Fusion PET/CT lacks sensitivity and specificity in identifying hilar nodal metastasis in patients with resected non-small cell lung cancer. Further prospective studies assessing the utility of PET/CT versus alternative sampling techniques are warranted.Diagnosis of the presence of lymph node metastasis and decision of operative indication using fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography and computed tomography in patients with primary lung cancer.We evaluate whether integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography and computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) scan can diagnose the presence of lymph node metastasis more accurately than computed tomography (CT) scan alone.Forty-two patients with lung cancer preoperatively underwent integrated PET/CT scan using FDG and CT scan and underwent pulmonary resection and lymph node dissection. We judged cases as lymph node metastasis if the lymph node visually accumulated FDG at PET/CT scan and measured 1 cm or greater in the short axis at CT scan. We retrospectively analyzed whether our judgments in each modality were consistent with the pathological diagnosis.Two-hundred and seventeen stations of lymph node were dissected and 21 stations (9.7%) were histologically diagnosed as positive metastasis. Thirty-two stations of lymph node visually accumulated FDG at PET/CT scan and 17 stations measured 1 cm or greater in the short axis at CT scan. Concerning the diagnosis of lymph node metastasis, PET/CT scan showed significantly higher sensitivity than CT scan (81% vs. 48%, p=0.024). The false-positive rate was significantly high in PET-positive lymph nodes measuring less than 1 cm in diameter. There were 4 false-negative lymph nodes with both scans. All of these were less than 7 mm in diameter and had a low percentage of metastatic foci in the lymph node. Concerning the diagnosis of N staging, there was no significant difference between PET/CT scan and CT scan (83% vs. 69%, p=0.124). However, the identification of N2 disease at PET/CT scan was significantly more accurate than that at CT scan (100% vs. 38%, p=0.031).PET/CT is superior to CT scan in lymph node staging. However, because the false-positive rate is high in PET-positive lymph nodes measuring less than 1 cm in diameter, we think that clinical background should be considered and other modalities or histological examinations should be undertaken if necessary. J. Med. Invest. 57: 305-313, August, 2010.Comparison of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography and mediastinoscopy in mediastinal staging of non-small cell lung cancer: analysis of 212 patients.Mediastinal staging is crucial to determine the prognosis and treatment options for patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). In this study, we compared the results of integrated positron emission tomography-computerised tomography (PET/CT) with those of mediastinoscopy in mediastinal staging of NSCLC patients.PET/CT and mediastinoscopy was performed on 250 consecutive patients diagnosed with NSCLC between September 2005 and March 2008. Thirty-eight patients were excluded from the study. Standard cervical mediastinoscopy was performed in all patients, and simultaneous extended cervical mediastinoscopy was performed in 52 patients with left sided lesions. Patients with negative mediastinoscopy underwent resection. The pathological results were correlated with PET/CT findings.A total of 212 patients (199 male, 13 female ; mean age : 58.3 years) were evaluated. In PET/CT analysis 60 true-positive, 45 false-positive, 103 true-negative and 4 false-negative patients were found. The rate of PET/CT positivity of mediastinal lymph nodes was 49.5%. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and accuracy for PET/CT were 93.8%, 69.6%, 57.1%, 96.3% and 76.9% respectively. The incidence of N2 disease in NSCLC patients with negative mediastinal lymph node uptake on PET/CT was 3.7% (4 of 107). In univariate analysis, right upper lobe tumours were significantly (p < 0.05) more associated with occult N2 disease.In patients with positive mediastinal lymph node uptake on PET/CT invasive mediastinal staging appears necessary for exact staging. Mediastinoscopy can be omitted in NSCLC patients with negative mediastinal uptake on PET/CT in regions where the rate of PET/CT positivity of mediastinal lymph nodes is high.Imaging of proliferation with 18F-FLT PET/CT versus 18F-FDG PET/CT in non-small-cell lung cancer.To compare the diagnostic efficacies of (18)F-FLT and (18)F-FDG PET/CT in non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC), focusing on the correlation between FLT and FDG tumour uptake and tumour cell proliferation as indicated by the cyclin D1 labelling index.A total of 31 patients with NSCLC underwent FLT and FDG PET/CT scanning followed by surgery. PET/CT images were compared with the pathology. Tumour cell proliferation was assessed by cyclin D1 immunohistochemistry.The sensitivities of FLT and FDG PET/CT for the primary lesion were 74% and 94%, respectively (p=0.031). For N staging, 77% patients were correctly staged, 6% overstaged, 16% understaged by FLT, while the values for FDG were 77%, 16% and 6%, respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and positive predictive value with FLT for lymph nodes were 65%, 98%, 93% and 89%, respectively, and 85%, 84%, 84% and 52% with FDG (p<0.01).Tumour SUV of FLT was significantly correlated with the cyclin D1 labelling index (r=0.644; p<0.01), but the SUV of FDG was not significantly correlated (r=0.293; p>0.05).In terms of N staging, FLT PET/CT resulted in understaging of more patients but overstaging of fewer patients, and for regional lymph nodes showed better specificity, accuracy and positive predictive value than FDG PET/CT in NSCLC. Tumour FLT uptake was correlated with tumour cell proliferation as indicated by the cyclin D1 labelling index, suggesting that further studies are needed to evaluate the use of FLT PET/CT for the assessment of therapy response to anticancer drugs.[Value of endobronchial ultrasound-transbronchial needle aspiration biopsy for diagnosis of PET-CT positive mediastinal lymph nodes].To evaluate the clinical value of endobronchial ultrasound-transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) biopsy for diagnosis of PET-CT positive mediastinal lymph nodes.One hundred and twenty-six patients with lung cancer undergoing both PET-CT scanning and EBUS-TBNA biopsy in the First Affiliated Hospital of Guanzhou Medical College from July 2008 to August 2010 were included in this study. There were 89 male and 37 female patients with a mean age of 56.3 years (range 34 to 81 years). (18)FDG-PET was considered positive in mediastinal nodes if the PET-CT reported hypermetabolic activity consistent with malignant disease (standardized uptake value > 2.5). All of the patients were clinically followed up.Among the 126 patients, 185 stations of lymph nodes were punctured. The mean diameter of the nodes was 13.6 mm and the range was 6 - 23 mm. There were no procedural complications. The diagnostic accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity of EBUS-TBNA were 95.7%, 95.7%, and 100%, respectively.EBUS-TBNA is a minimally invasive, highly effective and accurate, practical and safe procedure for diagnosis of PET-CT positive mediastinal lymph nodes.[Utility of PET/CT for mediastinal staging of non-small cell lung cancer in stage III (N2)].To evaluate the accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography with (18)F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG) and computed tomography (PET/CT) in mediastinal lymph node staging in patients with potentially operable (N2) non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and to ascertain the role of invasive staging in verifying positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) results.A retrospective study of consecutive patients with pathologically-proven NSCLC and N2 staging by enhanced CT was performed. A PET/CT scan was performed for all the patients. Lymph node staging was pathologically confirmed when it was possible or by consensus in the Thoracic Cancer Committee. Sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value and positive predictive value of PET/CT in N2 cases were determined.A total of 34 patients with N2 by CT were evaluated. PET/CT showed N2 in 30 patients. Discrepancies were found in four patients, two patients were classified as N1 in PET/CT and two patients as N0. Lymph node staging was pathologically confirmed in 20 patients. No false positives were found in PET/CT study. Sensitivity was 94.7%, specificity and positive predictive values were 100% and negative predictive value was 50%.Our data show that integrated PET/CT provides high sensitivity and positive predictive value in mediastinal nodal staging of NSCLC patients. Therefore, in patients with potentially resectable lung cancer, neoadjuvant chemotherapy candidate, mediastinoscopy could be reserved for restaging after induction therapy.Pattern and predictors of false positive lymph node involvement on positron emission tomography in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.Objectives The aim of this study was to elucidate the optimal parameters for diagnosing false positive (FP) lymph nodes (LNs) in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.Methods We reviewed 292 patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) imaging was performed at 1 hour (early) post-FDG injection and repeated 2 hours (delayed) after injection. We analyzed the relationship between the pathology of LNs and the results of PET, and the percent change in the standardized uptake value (%ΔSUV) between the two time-points.Results Eighteen of 46 cases (39.1%) in the FP group showed higher SUVs for their LNs compared with those for primary tumor, whereas 13.2% in the true positive group (p = 0.032) had higher SUVs for their LNs. Thirty-four of 36 cases in the true positive group had %ΔSUV ranging from 0% to 61.5% compared with only 13 of 33 in the FP group. Twenty out of 22 cases (90.9%) where %ΔSUV was over 61.5% or under 0% were considered as FP.Conclusions Patients with higher SUVs for LNs than for primary tumors and patients with extremely high or low %ΔSUVs tended to have FP LNs.Efficacy of helical dynamic CT versus integrated PET/CT for detection of mediastinal nodal metastasis in non-small cell lung cancer.The purpose of our study was to compare the diagnostic efficacies of helical dynamic CT and integrated PET/CT for the prediction of mediastinal nodal metastasis in stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).One hundred forty-three patients with stage T1 NSCLC underwent both helical dynamic CT and integrated PET/CT followed by surgical nodal staging. In helical dynamic CT, patients were regarded to have stage N2 disease when a nodule showed a peak enhancement > or = 110 H or a net enhancement > or = 60 H. In integrated PET/CT, nodes were regarded as positive for malignancy when they showed > or = 3.5 in maximum standardized uptake value with a discrete margin and more 18F-FDG uptake than mediastinal structures. Sensitivities, specificities, and accuracies for mediastinal nodal metastasis detection were compared for helical dynamic CT and integrated PET/CT using the McNemar test.Of the 143 patients, 34 (24%) had positive mediastinal nodes. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy for mediastinal nodal metastasis prediction on helical dynamic CT were 65% (22 of 34 patients), 89% (97 of 109), and 83% (119 of 143), respectively, whereas those on integrated PET/CT were 56% (19 of 34), 100% (109 of 109), and 90% (128 of 143). The p values were 0.664, < 0.001, and 0.015.In stage T1 NSCLC, contrast-enhanced helical dynamic CT better predicts, but not significantly so, mediastinal nodal metastasis than PET/CT, whereas PET/CT shows perfect specificity and higher accuracy than helical dynamic CT.The clinical impact of integrated FDG PET-CT on management decisions in patients with lung cancer.To retrospectively evaluate the clinical impact of FDG PET-CT on the management pathway of patients with lung cancer.One hundred and sixty-one patients with suspected lung cancer undergoing FDG PET-CT during the study period were analyzed. Before PET-CT, lung cancer MDT recorded scan indication, conventional clinical stage, and proposed treatment plan. The accuracy of integrated PET-CT compared with stand alone CT in preoperative staging of lung cancer was evaluated with pathological staging used as the reference standard. The effect of PET-CT on the subsequent management of patients was also evaluated.The agreement between CT and integrated PET-CT in preoperative staging of lung cancer was significant (p<0.001). In 16 (10%) patients PET-CT excluded tumour as there was no FDG uptake. PET-CT revealed occult metastasis in 25 (16%) patients. It was also a better overall predictor for T status (64% vs. 58%) and N status (78% vs. 65%). For N staging PET-CT was more accurate for N1 (82% vs. 72%) and N2 (85% vs. 80%) disease. Regression analyses suggested that PET-CT was a better predictor of overall TNM staging for lung cancer. FDG PET scanning changed or influenced management decisions in 66 (41%) patients with lung cancer. Changes in TNM staging following PET-CT were significant predictors (p=0.02) in making a decision to abandon thoracotomies.Addition of PET-CT to comprehensive evaluation of lung cancer can have significant clinical impact. There is marked improvement in staging the disease. Patients were frequently spared unnecessary treatment, and management was more appropriately targeted. PET permits reduction in the number of thoracotomies performed for non-resectable disease with predicted reduction in the morbidity rate and cost associated with unnecessary interventions.Presurgical staging of non-small cell lung cancer: positron emission tomography, integrated positron emission tomography/CT, and software image fusion.To compare the diagnostic accuracy of positron emission tomography (PET) and integrated PET/CT and to evaluate the performance of software fusion for staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Thirty-six patients (17 men and 19 women) with NSCLC underwent staging with integrated PET/CT followed by mediastinal lymph node dissection and tumor resection. Twenty-five of the 36 patients (69%) underwent separate CT studies for software fusion of images. Two blinded reviewers analyzed in consensus all PET images, and an experienced radiologist was added to assess integrated and software-fused PET/CT images. Histopathologic findings served as "gold standard" for determining the diagnostic accuracy of all modalities.Reviewers examining PET and integrated PET/CT classified T stage accurately in 67% (20 of 30 patients) and 97% (29 of 30 patients), respectively (p < 0.05). Overall, interpretations based on PET staged 57% (17 of 30 patients) correctly, over-staged 6 patients (20%), and under-staged 7 patients (23%). Interpretations based on integrated PET/CT correctly staged 83% (25 of 30 patients), over-staged 3 patients (10%), and under-staged 2 patients (7%). The overall staging accuracy of integrated PET/CT was significantly higher than that of PET (p < 0.05). Automatic software fusion of separately obtained PET and CT studies was successful in 68% of the patients but failed in 32%. In successful software fusion cases, the results of software fusion with regards to T stage and N stage were not different from integrated PET/CT.Integrated PET/CT compared with PET alone was associated with 26% points-greater overall diagnostic accuracy (p = 0.01). The software fusion method failed to provide acceptable co-registration in > 30% of the patients.Diagnostic performance of (18)F-FDG PET/CT for lymph node staging in patients with operable non-small-cell lung cancer and inflammatory lung disease.As (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) is taken up by inflammatory lymph nodes, it could be falsely interpreted as metastasis. Therefore, we evaluated the diagnostic ability of positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) for lymph node staging of lung cancer when inflammatory lung disease coexisted. Patients with operable non-small-cell lung cancer and FDG-avid lymph nodes were retrospectively classified into two groups; those with inflammatory lung disease (ILD) and those without it (NILD). Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis was performed for maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax), pattern of FDG uptake, maximum Hounsfield unit, and size, and then the areas under the ROC curves (AUCs) were compared between subgroups. There were 124 patients (ILD/NILD = 38/86) and 396 FDG-avid lymph nodes (ILD/NILD = 140/256). The average number of FDG-avid lymph nodes was greater in ILD (3.7 vs. 2.9, p = 0.039), whereas the proportion of metastasis was higher in NILD (25.4% vs. 11.4%, p = 0.002). With all N1-N3 lymph nodes and the NILD group, the AUC values of all four parameters were significantly greater than 0.5 (p < 0.05), and SUVmax was the most valuable parameter for lymph node metastasis. However, in the ILD group, only the AUC value of SUVmax was significantly greater than 0.5. These results were reproduced when analyses were performed with N1-N2 lymph nodes. In conclusion, SUVmax was the most valuable PET/CT parameter for assessment of lymph node metastasis in patients with operable non-small-cell lung cancer. In addition, it was the only valuable parameter when inflammatory lung disease coexisted.[The value of extra-lung lesions on ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT in improving diagnosis of lung cancer].¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT has several shortcomings in discriminating between lung carcinoma and pulmonary benign lesions. The aims of the present study is to explore the value of extra-lung lesions on ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT image in the diagnosis of lung cancer.A total of 126 suspected lung cancer patients underwent ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT scan. Preliminary diagnoses were based on the PET characteristics, SUVmean value, and CT characteristics of the lesions in the lung, and the diagnoses were modified based on the detected extra-lung lesions. The difference between the two methods and their disparity were calculated.Extra-lung lesions were identified on the PET/CT image in 81 patients; extra-lung metastasis modified 13 probable malignancies to affirmative malignancy and 1 probable malignancy to benign lesion. Non-metastasis modified 2 probable malignancies to affirmative malignancy and 1 probable malignancy to benign lesion. Fifteen were correct, whereas 2 were misdiagnosed. The diagnoses modification rate was 13.5% (17/126), and the modified diagnoses accuracy is 88.2% (15/17).Extra-lung lesions demonstrated on ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT improved the diagnostic accuracy of lung cancer. Tuberculosis was identified as the most important reason for false positive diagnoses after modification by extra-lung lesions.Integrated positron-emission tomography for nodal staging in lung cancer.As lymph node metastasis is the most important factor determining the surgical outcome of lung cancer, we evaluated the accuracy and clinical usefulness of functional imaging with integrated positron-emission tomography and computed tomography in nodal staging of non-small-cell lung cancer. Between October 2003 and August 2004, 43 newly diagnosed patients underwent curative surgical resection or mediastinoscopic nodal biopsy after chest computed tomography as well as whole-body functional imaging for clinical staging. Based on histopathologic findings in the lymph nodes, we compared the diagnostic usefulness of computed tomography and functional imaging. Twenty-two patients were N0 stage, 6 were N1, 11 were N2, and 4 were N3. Although functional imaging seemed to be superior for evaluation of N2 nodes, there were no significant differences in the sensitivity, specificity, positive-predictive value, negative-predictive value, or accuracy. The situation was similar for N1 nodes, and there were no significant differences except for the false-negative rate. High false-positive and negative-rates for N2 lymph nodes suggest that functional imaging should not replace mediastinoscopy.Standard uptake value of positron emission tomography in clinical stage I lung cancer: clinical application and pathological correlation.The aim of this study was to assess the standard uptake value in clinical stage I non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) and its correlation with pathological status and prognosis.We retrospectively reviewed 674 patients diagnosed with NSCLC between January 2002 and June 2005. Patients with clinical stage I diseases undergone a preoperative positron emission tomography-computed tomography scan followed by anatomic resection. We reviewed the clinical features of 152 patients with an average follow-up of 87 months.We analysed the clinical features of 108 patients with stage I NSCLC and 44 patients with non-stage I NSCLC. There were no statistical differences in age, histological type, location or tumour differentiation between the two groups. In the Stage I group, the patients had lower maximum standard uptake value (SUVmax; 3.80 ± 3.17 vs 5.73 ± 3.65, P = 0.001), lower carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) levels (2.86 ± 4.80 vs 9.11 ± 17.21 ng/ml, P = 0.027) and smaller tumour size (2.39 ± 0.98 vs 3.73 ± 2.04 cm, P < 0.001). The patients with higher SUVmax had a more advanced pathological stage, poorer tumour differentiation and larger tumour size. A higher SUVmax was an independent factor predicting an advanced pathological stage (SUVmax ≥ 3.3, odds ratio 3.246). The median survival of patients with SUVmax ≥ 3.3 and SUVmax <3.3 were 64.32 and 53.08 months, respectively (P = 0.654).Higher preoperative 18-fluorodeoxyglucose uptake by a tumour was significantly associated with an advanced pathological stage but not correlated with a poorer prognosis. An aggressive preoperative work-up for occult N2 disease should be emphasized, avoiding inappropriate thoracotomy.Integrated PET/CT in non small cell lung cancer staging--clinical and pathological agreement.Integrated PET/CT has become a fundamental tool in the preoperative assessment of non small lung cancer (NSCLC) providing useful anatomical and metabolic information to characterize tumoral lesions and to detect unsuspected metastatic disease.To compare the agreement between clinical and pathological staging before and after the use of PET/CT.Retrospective study of patients with NSCLC who underwent potentially curative surgery throughout 10.5 years. Cohen's kappa coefficient was used to evaluate staging agreement.One hundred and fifty patients were evaluated, 78% males, with a mean age of 65 (±9.6) years. Thirteen percent were submitted to neoadjuvant chemotherapy. PET/CT was performed in 41%. Global agreement between clinical and pathological staging was 51% (kappa=0.3639). There was a statistically significant difference between the staging results in patients who underwent PET/CT, when compared to the subgroup who did not (p=0.003). For those with PET/CT false negatives occurred in less 39%, false positives in more 12% and clinical and pathological staging coincided in more 27%. The overall results reflected an improvement in the agreement between clinical and pathological staging in the PET/CT subgroup (67%, kappa=0.5737 vs 40%, kappa=0.2292). PET/CT accuracy was enhanced when patients re-staged after neoadjuvant therapy were excluded and a substantial staging agreement was obtained for those who had the exam only for staging purposes (73%, kappa=0.6323).Inclusion of PET/CT in NSCLC preoperative assessment improved the accuracy of the clinical staging, with a good level of agreement with pathological staging.Lymph node metastasis diagnosis using positron emission tomography with 2-[18F] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose as a tracer and computed tomography in surgical cases of non-small cell lung cancer.Positron emission tomography with 2-[18F] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose as a tracer and computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) are utilized for the diagnosis of lymph node (LN) metastasis from lung cancer. In this study, we analyzed the diagnostic ability of FDG-PET for N staging by focusing on the clinical features of false-positive (FP) and false-negative (FN) cases.From March 2006 to February 2010, 112 patients underwent preoperative examinations using FDG-PET/CT followed by radical resection with hilar and mediastinal dissection. We analyzed their clinicopathological characteristics based on preoperative FDG-PET/CT findings and post-operative histopathological diagnosis of resected LNs.Based on the PET/CT results, 17 patients were misdiagnosed (9 FN and 8 FP). The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and negative and positive predictive values for N1/N2 were 50.0, 94.5, 84.0, 93.0 and 58.3%, respectively, whereas those for N2 were 57.8, 90.3, 84.8, 90.3 and 61.1%, respectively. FP findings more frequently occurred in cases with elevated white blood cell (WBC) count (P=0.015) and smokers (P=0.04). In the FN group, the maximum standardized uptake value for the primary tumour was lower than that in the true-positive (TP) group (P=0.01). The short-axis sizes of 71 LNs differently diagnosed by PET/CT and histopathology findings were significantly smaller in the FN group than the TP group (P<0.001), whereas there was no difference between TP and FP. As for FN LNs in the TP group, there was no significant difference.PET/CT showed a good ability to detect metastatic LNs, especially for N2 diagnosis. However, there were some limitations, especially in cases with elevated peripheral WBC count and/or smoking history.The role of integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography in the assessment of nodal spread in cases with non-small cell lung cancer.Integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET/CT) scanning has become the standard for oncologic imaging. We sought to determine the role of PET/CT in mediastinal non-small cell lung cancer staging. One hundred and twenty-seven consecutive patients were enrolled in the study where PET/CT was performed due to pathologically defined non-small cell carcinoma from a single center. They all underwent complete resection with a thoracotomy and systemic lymph node dissection (SLND) between October 2005 and January 2007. Postoperative pathology results of lymph node stations regarding the nodal spread and stage were compared with clinical stage obtained by PET/CT. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, negative predictive value (NPV) and positive predictive value (PPV) of PET/CT in N2 cases were determined to be 72.0%, 94.4%, 92.7%, 97.7% and 49.2%, respectively. Maximum standard uptake (SUV(max)) cut-off value for mediastinal N2 involvement in PET/CT was obtained by applying 'receiver operating characteristic' (ROC) analysis that was set to 5.2. Correct stage with PET/CT was established in 76.3% of cases. Staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), according to the PET/CT for which we determined 97.79% NPV, we consider that thoracotomy without preoperative mediastinal invasive staging in cases of negative mediastinal involvement in PET/CT can be certainly performed.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography integrated with computed tomography to determine resectability of primary lung cancer.Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography integrated with computed tomography (FDGPET/CT) was evaluated as a routine staging technique for primary lung cancer.We prospectively compared FDG-PET/CT in determining clinical stage and surgical indication with conventional staging not including positron emission tomography (PET). A total of 50 consecutive patients diagnosed with primary lung cancer by cytological or histological examination were studied; 20 of them underwent surgery.Discrepancies between the two staging methods were observed in 14 patients (28%). The stage assigned by PET increased in 12 cases (24%) and decreased in 2 (4%). PET staging was accurate in eight cases with otherwise undetected distant metastases (M1) but was incorrect in six cases, including five where it overdiagnosed nodal metastases (N). Two clinical N3 patients (4%) would have missed a chance of surgery if the surgical indication had been determined by PET staging alone. According to our criteria for surgery, other patients were assigned correctly to surgery by PET staging. The maximum standard uptake value (maxSUV) of all primary lesions ranged from 0 to 23.0 (mean +/- SD, 8.0 +/- 4.4). The mean maxSUV among surgical cases (5.8 +/- 3.6) was significantly smaller than among nonsurgical cases (9.5 +/- 4.2) (P < 0.05).Staging examination including FDG-PET/CT and brain magnetic resonance imaging ordinarily can determine the clinical stage and resectability of primary lung cancer. False-positive findings in regional lymph nodes, possibly reflecting past infectious disease, are the most important remaining problem.[Comparing serum tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan with PET-CT for lung cancer diagnosis].Positron emission tomography-computed tomography (PET-CT) is a new bio-imaging system which combined metabolic with anatomic imaging. This system has better three-dimensional definition and earlier tumor detection potential. This study was to compare the accuracy of tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan with PET-CT for lung cancer diagnosis and staging.A total of 43 lung cancer patients diagnosed by operation or acupuncture, received breast CT scan, tumor antigen detection, and PET-CT scan, were selected. The accuracies of these 2 methods and their impacts on lung cancer staging were compared.The accurate diagnosis rate of tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan was 67.44%, and that of PET-CT scan was 90.70%. Local focus detection rates were 86.05% and 95.35%, respectively; mediastinal lymph nodes detection rates were 65.12% and 83.72%, respectively. PET-CT detected 6 cases of distant metastasis which were not detected by tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan. Compared with CT scan, 5 (11.63%) cases were upstaged and 7 (16.28%) cases were downstaged by PET-CT, which led to therapeutic strategy changes in 4 (9.3%) cases.Compare with tumor antigen detection combined with CT scan, PET-CT scan is more sensitive and accurate in diagnosing and staging lung cancer.Mediastinal lymph node staging by means of positron emission tomography is less sensitive in elderly patients with non-small-cell lung cancer.We sought to identify the impact of age on the sensitivity and specificity of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET-CT; CT) on mediastinal lymph node staging of patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC).We conducted a retrospective review of 206 consecutive patients with histologically proven NSCLC who underwent resection and/or mediastinoscopy in our center between September 2004 and January 2007. All of these patients had preoperative staging with integrated PET-CT as an adjunct to chest CT before resection and/or mediastinoscopy. Diabetic patients and patients who received neoadjuvant chemotherapy were excluded. The pathologic results of all of these cases were reviewed and correlated with those on CT and integrated PET-CT.The sensitivity and positive predictive values (PPV) of PET-CT in mediastinal nodal staging were significantly lower in elderly patients (age>or=65 years; sensitivity, 42%; PPV, 66%) than in younger patients (age<65 years; sensitivity, 52%; PPV, 74%). Specificity and negative predictive values were similar in both groups.PET-CT staging of the mediastinum is less sensitive in elderly patients with NSCLC who have a lower PPV. Positive mediastinal uptake on PET-CT should be verified by mediastinoscopy, irrespective of age. Elderly patients with positive mediastinal uptake should not be refuted a curative intent surgical resection on the basis of positive mediastinal uptake alone.[The advantage of Positron Emission Tomography combined with Computer Tomography (PET-CT) in the diagnosis of lung cancer (experience with 408 patients)].The authors analyzed the results of PET-CT scans made with oncological indications among 408 patients. One hundred and fifty-four PET-CTs were done to characterize pulmonary foci, after which in 59 cases lung surgery was performed. The method's sensitivity in respect to malignancy was 100%, specificity was 56%. Staging of affected lymph nodes resulted in 17 mediastinoscopies and 54 thoracotomies. In the former indications PET-CT-positive lymph nodes always need cytologic/histologic verification. M-staging done with PET-CT was performed in 141 cases, mediastinal restaging of patients having received neoadjuvant chemotherapy was done in 24 cases. The latter indications we consider superfluous because of the diagnostic inaccuracy of PET-CT. In 175 cases we analyzed the frequently determining factor of the PET-CT scan in the indication of lung surgery. The authors wish to share their experience for the better use of this method and to accelerate the inclusion of PET-CT into the diagnostic protocol.Standard PET/CT of the chest during shallow breathing is inadequate for comprehensive staging of lung cancer.The incidence of malignancy associated with subcentimeter pulmonary nodules (micronodules) in patients with malignant disease has been reported to be as high as 58%. Thus, detection of small lung nodules is important for appropriate staging of lung cancer. Because of respiratory motion, small parenchymal lung lesions can be missed on CT acquired during shallow breathing. Micronodules are usually too small to be characterized reliably with 18F-FDG PET. We aimed to determine the incidence of missed pulmonary micronodules on PET/CT studies acquired during shallow breathing.The study included 142 consecutive cancer patients (62 male and 80 female; mean age, 54 y) who underwent whole-body PET/CT during shallow breathing and breath-hold CT of the chest during maximal inspiration. CT findings were reviewed independently, and noncalcified nodules missed on the shallow-breathing scan were evaluated for size, location, and metabolic activity.Breath-hold chest CT detected an additional 125 parenchymal lung nodules (mean size, 3.4 +/- 1.6 mm; range, 1-9 mm) in 48 (34%) of the 142 patients. In these patients, 3 nodules, on average, were missed during shallow breathing. In 18 patients (13%), micronodules were identified exclusively on breath-hold images. None of the missed nodules demonstrated 18F-FDG uptake.Acquisition of standard PET/CT chest images during shallow breathing is inadequate for comprehensive cancer staging.Preoperative staging of non-small-cell lung cancer: comparison of whole-body diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging and 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography.To investigate the diagnostic value of whole-body magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) including diffusion-weighted imaging with background signal suppression (DWIBS) for preoperative assessment of non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) in comparison to (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (18)FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT).Thirty-three patients with suspected NSCLC were enrolled. Patients were examined before surgery with PET/CT and whole-body MRI including T1-weighted turbo spin echo (TSE), T2-weighted short tau inversion recovery (STIR) and DWIBS sequences (b = 0/800). Histological or cytological specimens were taken as standard of reference.Whole-body MRI with DWIBS as well as PET/CT provided diagnostic image quality in all cases. Sensitivity for primary tumour detection: MRI 93%, PET/CT 98%. T-staging accuracy: MRI 63%, PET/CT 56%. N-staging accuracy: MRI 66%, PET/CT 71%. UICC staging accuracy: MRI 66%, PET/CT 74%. Sensitivity for metastatic involvement of individual lymph node groups: MRI 44%, PET/CT 47%. Specificity for individual non-metastatic lymph node groups: MRI 93%, PET/CT 96%. Assessment accuracy for individual lymph node groups: MRI 85%, PET/CT 88%. Observer agreement rate for UICC staging: MRI 74%, PET/CT 90%.Whole-body MRI with DWIBS provides comparable results to PET/CT in staging of NSCLC, but shows no superiority. Most relevant challenges for both techniques are T-staging accuracy and sensitivity for metastatic lymph node involvement.Numerous radiological methods are available for the crucial staging of lung cancer. Whole-body DWIBS MRI provides comparable results to PET/CT in NSCLC staging. No evident superiority of whole-body DWIBS over PET/CT in NSCLC staging. Challenges for both techniques are T-staging and detection of small metastases.Positron emission tomography may underestimate the extent of thoracic disease in lung cancer patients.Although widely utilised in the staging of lung cancer various studies have questioned whether the accuracy of this staging modality is sufficient to replace conventional invasive staging techniques. We have therefore reviewed our experience in order to assess the accuracy of PET CT as an intrathoracic staging tool for non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Two hundred patients referred for surgery between June 2006 and January 2008 underwent PET CT followed by staging mediastinoscopy and, if appropriate, resection. Results of scans and histopathology were correlated and analysed.Overall, PET CT correctly staged 99 out of 200 patients (49.5%), under-staged 59 (29.5%), and over-staged 42 (21%). Superior mediastinal nodes were incorrectly staged by PET CT in 35 (19%) of 186 patients undergoing mediastinoscopy: in 15 (8%) mediastinoscopy revealed metastatic disease not detected on PET CT and 20 (11%) had negative histology despite a positive scan. Five (2.5%) resections were benign despite avid FDG uptake, and 6 (3%) were malignant despite a negative scan. PET CT had false positive result of 6.5%, 5.5%, 4.5% and 3.5%, respectively for hilar, station 2, 7 and 5 node groups. The false negative result was 12.5%, 10.5% and 8%, respectively for hilar, intrapulmonary and station 4 nodes. Twelve (6%) of patients were under-staged regarding chest wall and mediastinal invasion, and 10 (5%) patients had metastatic nodules in the lung (T4) not detected by PET CT. Stage I or II disease was identified by PET CT in 141 patients of whom 26 (18.4%) had IIIa or higher stage disease. The false positive and negative predictive values for PET CT with respect to N2 or greater status were 17.2% (11.8-24.2) and 48.6% (32.2-65.3), respectively.Our experience would suggest that PET CT alone is not sufficiently accurate to replace mediastinoscopy and other conventional biopsy techniques in the evaluation of NSCLC cases. It may better be viewed as a valuable additional tool with which to inform decision making and to screen for disseminated disease.Reliability of positron emission tomography-computed tomography in identification of mediastinal lymph node status in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.The involvement of mediastinal lymph nodes is a very important prognostic factor in patients with potentially resectable non-small cell lung cancer. Our aim in this study was to investigate the value of positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scanning in staging lung cancer, especially for mediastinal lymph node evaluation, and to determine whether this could decrease the need for mediastinoscopy.Seventy-eight patients with non-small cell lung cancer who were potential candidates for surgical resection and admitted to the thoracic surgery unit of our hospital from March 2006 to June 2008 joined this prospective study. Positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scanning was performed as part of the prospective studies used to diagnose or stage the tumors. All 78 patients underwent tissue sampling of mediastinal lymph nodes to compare these with imaging results. The diagnostic efficacy of the computed tomographic and positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scans compared with histopathologic findings were calculated with sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy.Final histology was available on 397 lymph node stations (N1, N2, and N3) sampled from 78 patients during mediastinoscopy or surgical intervention. Sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of mediastinal lymph node involvement in patients undergoing thoracic computed tomographic scanning were 45.4%, 80.5%, 27.7%, and 90%, respectively. The accuracy of computed tomographic scanning was 75.6%. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of mediastinal lymph node involvement in patients undergoing positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scanning were 81.8%, 89.5%, 56.2%, and 96.7%, respectively.There is a need for mediastinoscopy in positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scanning-positive mediastinal lymph nodes, but it might not be necessary for positron emission tomographic-computed tomographic scanning-negative lymph nodes.[Application of ¹⁸F-FDG PET/CT in pulmonary disease: a report of 419 cases].The application and the value of PET/CT in lung cancer are on the way to development. The aim of this study is to summarize the data from 419 patients with pulmonary tumor or tumor-like disease and to explore the appliance of PET/CT.From Dec 2007 to Aug 2011, 594 patients with pulmonary tumor or tumor-like disease underwent PET/CT examination during the different course of treatment, which were treated by single surgery team from Peking University Cancer Hospital. Of these patients, 419 cases diagnosed pathologically were included into study. The clinicapathological and follow-up data were collected to analyze the value of PET/CT in diagnosis, TNM staging, therapy response evaluation and posttherapy monitoring.Four hundred and nineteen cases comprised of 63 benign and 356 malignant, of which, 338 were primary lung cancer, and 18 were metastases. The SUVmax cutoff was defined as 2.5 to differentiate the benign and malignant disease. PET/CT obtained the role of diagnosis with sensitivity as 85.0%, specificity as 52.4%, accuracy rate as 79.2%, positive predictive value as 89.2% and negative predictive value as 42.9%, respectively. Of 338 primary cases, 275 underwent PET/CT at initial diagnosis, in which, 46 (16.7%) distant metastasis were found, including 8 additional metastasis not found by conventional utilities. Six of 43 recurrences were found by PET/CT following conventional examination. In T staging, SUVmax is positively correlated with diameter of tumors (P<0.05). In N staging, 610 stations of lymph nodes were resected from 168 cases, with 37 stations predicted as positive by PET/CT and 102 stations pathologically proven positive, therefore, calculating the sensitivity as 36.3%, specificity as 93.9%, accuracy rate as 84.3%, positive predictive value as 54.4% and negative predictive value as 88.0%, respectively. Ten patients underwent PET/CT scan for chemotherapy response evaluation, with SUVmax changing following T downstaging.PET/CT is one optional method for diagnosis of pulmonary tumors. In TNM staging, PET/CT showed the superiority than conventional utilities in M staging, but possesses the high specificity but inferior sensitivity in N staging. Therefore, PET/CT should be used as routine examination for postoperation follow-up. Furthermore, PET/CT performed the outstanding role in chemotherapy response evaluation.Maximum standard uptake value of mediastinal lymph nodes on integrated FDG-PET-CT predicts pathology in patients with non-small cell lung cancer.Positron emission tomography (PET) scans often help direct biopsies of mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), but the maximum standard uptake value (maxSUV) of individual nodes has not been evaluated.This is a prospective study of consecutive patients with NSCLC, all of whom underwent integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission-computed tomography (FDG-PET-CT) and had biopsy or resection of their mediastinal lymph nodes.There were 397 patients. One-hundred and forty-three patients had N2 disease and 1,252 N2 nodes were pathologically examined. The median maxSUV of the nodes that had metastatic disease were the following: for the 2R node, 10.4 (range, 0-18.6); for 4R, 8.6 (range, 0-18.3); for 5, 8.9 (range, 0-26.3); for 6, 7.6 (range, 0-19.6); for 7, 7.7 (range, 0-14); for 8 and 9, 5.4 (range, 0-8.9). The median maxSUV for all of the N2 nodes that were benign was 0 (range, 0-18.8) (p < 0.05 for all stations except for nodes 8 and 9). When a maxSUV of 5.3 is used the accuracy of integrated FDG-PET-CT for each N2 nodal station is maximized and is at least 92% for each.The maxSUV of individual mediastinal lymph nodes is a predictor of malignancy. There is overlap between false and true positives. Definitive biopsies are required to prove cancer irrespective of the maxSUV value. However, when a maxSUV of 5.3 is used instead of the traditional value of 2.5, the accuracy for FDG-PET-CT for each N2 nodal station increases to at least 92%.LUCIS: lung cancer imaging studies.Pulmonary nodules are of high clinical importance, as they may prove to be an early manifestation of lung cancer. Pulmonary nodules are small, focal opacities that may be solitary or multiple. A solitary pulmonary nodule (SPN) is a single, small (= 30 mm in diameter) radiographic opacity. Larger opacities are called masses and are often malignant. As imaging techniques improve and more nodules are detected, the optimal management of SPNs remains unclear. Current strategies include tissue sampling or CT follow-up. The aim of this PhD was to examine current non-invasive methods used to characterise pulmonary nodules and masses in patients with suspected lung cancer and to stage NSCLC. In doing so, this PhD helps to validate the existing methods used to diagnose and stage lung cancer correctly and, hopefully, aids in the development of new methods. In the first study, 213 participants with pulmonary nodules on CT were examined with an additional HRCT. In this study, it was concluded that HRCT of a solitary pulmonary nodule, assessed using attenuation and morphological criteria is a fast, widely available and effective method for diagnosing lung cancer correctly, and especially for ruling out cancer. In the second study, 168 patients with pulmonary lesions on CT were examined with an additional F-18-FDG PET/CT. It was concluded that when used early in the work-up of the lesions, CT raised the prevalence of lung cancer in the population to the point at which further diagnostic imaging examination could be considered redundant. Standard contrast-enhanced CT seems better suited to identify patients with lung cancer than to rule out cancer. Finally, the overall diagnostic accuracy as well as the classification probabilities and predictive values of the two modalities were not significantly different. The reproducibility of the above results was substantial. In the third study, 59 patients with pulmonary nodules or masses on chest radiography were examined with an additional DCE-CT. A qualitative as well as a quantitative assessment method was examined. It was concluded that although the results of the qualitative approach were acceptable in their own right, they did not, however, add anything new when compared to standard CT. The quantitative approach gave rise to several conclusions concerning DCE-CT analysis as well as the use of DCE-CT in the diagnosis of lung cancer: First, that DCE-CT is best analysed using logarithmic scale data transformation; second, that irrespective of the ROI method applied, it was not possible to discriminate malignant and benign; and, third, that the lack of reproducibility should be addressed. These results show us that DCE-CT is currently not a clinically feasible method for analysing pulmonary lesions. This does not necessarily mean that DCE-CT should be abandoned, but it does signify the need for further development of the current DCE-CT methods. Finally, in the fourth study, 114 patients with NSCLC were examined with both a CT and with an additional F-18-FDG PET/CT. It was concluded that there was no significant difference in the overall diagnostic accuracy of the two modalities when imaging the mediastinum for staging purposes. In conclusion, although standard contrast-enhanced CT has brought us far in the characterisation of pulmonary nodules and masses, the last decade has seen a constant move away from strictly anatomical approaches to imaging, towards more functional or analytical approaches. The desire is, of course, to be able to safely distinguish between malignant and benign nodules without the need for invasive procedures.Mediastinal nodal staging of nonsmall cell lung cancer using integrated 18F-FDG PET/CT in a tuberculosis-endemic country: diagnostic efficacy in 674 patients.Integrated (18)fluorine fluorodeoxyglucose ((18)F-FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) has shown somewhat variable sensitivity and specificity for mediastinal nodal staging in granulomatous disease endemic areas. The purpose of the study was to prospectively evaluate the efficacy of PET/CT for mediastinal nodal staging in nonsmall cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients in a tuberculosis-endemic country.Prospective assessment of the diagnostic efficacy of integrated PET/CT for detecting mediastinal nodal metastasis was performed in 674 patients (M:F ratio = 502:172; mean age, 61 years) with NSCLC. Patients underwent an integrated PET/CT examination and subsequent surgical nodal staging (by mediastinoscopy only in 121 patients and by thoracotomy in 553). Nodes showing greater (18)F-FDG uptake than mediastinum at PET without benign calcification or high attenuation >70 household unit (HU) at unenhanced CT were regarded as being positive for malignancy. The histologic nodal assessment results were used as reference standards.Of 2477 mediastinal nodal stations evaluated in 674 patients, 275 (11%) stations in 180 (27%) patients proved to be malignant. On a per-person basis, the overall sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of PET/CT for mediastinal nodal staging were 61% (110 of 180), 96% (473 of 494), and 86% (583 of 674), respectively. On a per-nodal station basis, they were 46% (126 of 275), 98% (2154 of 2202), and 92% (2280 of 2477).Integrated PET/CT provides high specificity and reasonably high accuracy, but somewhat low sensitivity for mediastinal nodal staging of NSCLCs. The high specificity is achieved at the expense of sensitivity by interpreting calcified nodes or nodes with high attenuation at CT, even with high FDG uptake at PET, as benign in a tuberculosis-endemic region.Diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging can be used in place of positron emission tomography for N staging of non-small cell lung cancer with fewer false-positive results.One of the deficiencies of positron emission tomography for N staging in lung cancer is a false-positive result caused by concurrent lymphadenitis. Recently, diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging has been reported to be able to image tumors of body organs. The aim of this study is to examine the usefulness of diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging for N staging of non-small cell lung cancer compared with positron emission tomography-computed tomography.Both positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging were prospectively used in 88 patients before surgical intervention for non-small cell lung cancer to examine 734 lymph node stations. The diagnostic results of positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging were compared. The diameters of the metastatic foci within lymph nodes were measured on hematoxylin and eosin-stained sections to compare the detectable size of metastatic foci between positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging.The accuracy of N staging in the 88 patients was 0.89 with diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging, which was significantly higher than the value of 0.78 obtained with positron emission tomography-computed tomography (P = .012), because of less overstaging in the former. Among the 734 lymph node stations examined pathologically, 36 had metastases, and the other 698 did not. Although there was no significant difference in the diagnosis of the 36 metastatic lymph node stations between the 2 methods, diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging was more accurate for diagnosing the 698 nonmetastatic stations than positron emission tomography-computed tomography because of fewer false-positive results (P = .002). The detectable size of metastatic foci within lymph nodes was 4 mm in both positron emission tomography-computed tomography and diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging.Diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging can be used in place of positron emission tomography-computed tomography for N staging of non-small cell lung cancer with fewer false-positive results compared with positron emission tomography-computed tomography.Advances in positron emission tomography technology have increased the need for surgical staging in non-small cell lung cancer.Pretreatment staging of patients with non-small cell lung cancer is critically important in determining an appropriate treatment plan. As positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) are proven complementary modalities in clinical staging, recent advances in PET technology have brought forth integrated PET/CT as the new standard. We tested the hypothesis that improvements in PET technology have not increased the sensitivity or specificity of PET in the staging of non-small cell lung cancer to an extent that surgical staging is no longer required.This is a retrospective, single-institution review of 336 patients from 1995 to 2005 with biopsy-proven non-small cell lung cancer who underwent [18F] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-PET before mediastinal lymph node sampling by cervical mediastinoscopy or thoracotomy. Clinical records, histopathologic reports, and PET findings were reviewed. Data were analyzed by the Pearson chi2 test.Within the study population, 210 patients had routine PET and 126 had integrated PET/CT. For detecting mediastinal metastases the sensitivities of PET versus integrated PET/CT were 61.1% versus 85.7% (P < .05), specificities were 94.3% versus 80.6% (P < .001), positive predictive values were 68.8% versus 55.8%, negative predictive values were 92.1% versus 95.2%, and overall accuracy was 88.6% versus 81.7%.Improvements in PET technology have increased integrated PET/CT sensitivity at the cost of significantly decreased specificity. Although it may appear that integrated PET/CT incurs fewer false negative results, the dramatic increase in false positive results reinforces the notion that integrated PET/CT should be used only as an adjunct to clinical staging and that surgical staging remains the gold standard in non-small cell lung cancer.Outcomes of mediastinoscopy and surgery with or without neoadjuvant therapy in patients with non-small cell lung cancer who are N2 negative on positron emission tomography and computed tomography.The objectives of this study were (1) to assess the results of mediastinoscopy and mediastinal lymphadenectomy and (2) to compare outcomes of surgical treatment with or without neoadjuvant therapy in patients with non-small cell lung cancer who are N2 negative on integrated positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET/CT).This was a retrospective, single-institution review of patients with non-small cell lung cancer who were N2 negative on CT and PET/CT. All patients underwent mediastinoscopy; if N2 positive, patients underwent neoadjuvant therapy followed by pulmonary resection, and if N2 negative, patients underwent pulmonary resection with mediastinal lymphadenectomy.Between 2003 and 2007, there were 750 patients (547 men). Of these, 51 patients were N2 positive at mediastinoscopy and then underwent neoadjuvant therapy (mediastinoscopy N2 group), and 699 were N2 negative at mediastinoscopy and then underwent mediastinal lymphadenectomy. Mediastinal lymphadenectomy revealed that 635 had N0 or N1 disease (N2-negative group), and 64 had N2 disease (surgery N2 group). Overall 5-year survival was 73% for the N2-negative group, 44% for the surgery N2 group, and 47% for the mediastinoscopy N2 group. Disease-free 5-year survival was 59% for the N2-negative group, 27% for the surgery N2 group, and 29% for the mediastinoscopy N2 group.We found that there were no significant differences in overall and disease-free survivals between the surgery N2 group and the mediastinoscopy N2 group. The benefit of neoadjuvant therapy in patients with PET/CT-negative but mediastinoscopy-positive N2 disease should be confirmed by randomized studies.Evaluation of pulmonary nodules and lung cancer with one-inch crystal gamma coincidence positron emission tomography/CT versus dedicated positron emission tomography/CT.Dedicated positron emission tomography (PET)/CT scanners using BGO and related detectors (d-PET) have become standard imaging instruments in many malignancies. Hybrid gamma camera systems using NaI detectors in coincidence mode (g-PET) have been compared to d-PET but reported usefulness has been variable when gamma cameras with half-inch to three-fourth-inch thick crystals have been used without CT. Our aim was to compare g-PET with a 1-in.-thick crystal and inbuilt CT for lesion localization and attenuation correction (g-PET/CT) and d-PET/CT in patients presenting with potential and confirmed lung malignancies. One hour after (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG), patients underwent BGO d-PET/CT from jaw to proximal thigh. This was followed by one to two bed position g-PET/CT 194 +/- 27 min after FDG. Each study pair was independently analysed with concurrent CT. d-PET/CT was interpreted by a radiologist experienced in both PET and CT, and g-PET/CT by consensus reading of an experienced PET physician and an experienced CT radiologist. A TNM score was assigned and studies were then unblinded and compared. Fifty-seven patients underwent 58 scan pairs over 2 years. Eighty-nine per cent concordance was shown between g-PET/CT and d-PET/CT for the assessment of intrapulmonary lesions, with 100% concordance for intrapulmonary lesions >10 mm (36 of 36). Eighty-eight per cent (51 of 58) concordance was shown between g-PET/CT and d-PET/CT for TNM staging. Coincidence imaging using an optimized dual-head 1-in.-thick crystal gamma camera with inbuilt CT compares reasonably well with dedicated PET/CT for evaluation of indeterminate pulmonary lesions and staging of pulmonary malignancies and may be of some value when d-PET/CT is not readily available.Regional nodal staging with 18F-FDG PET-CT in non-small cell lung cancer: Additional diagnostic value of CT attenuation and dual-time-point imaging.[Fluorine-18]-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography ((18)F-FDG PET-CT) is widely performed in the regional nodal staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). However, the uptake of (18)F-FDG by tubercular granulomatous tissues may lead to false-positive diagnosis. This is of special concern in China, where tubercular granulomatous disease is epidemic. Herein, we evaluated the efficacy of an additional CT attenuation and a dual-time-point scan in determining the status of lymph nodes.Eighty NSCLC patients underwent curative surgical resection after (18)F-FDG PET-CT and separate breath-hold CT examinations. The initial images were analyzed by two methods. In method 1, nodal status was determined by (18)F-FDG uptake only. In Method 2, nodal status was determined by (18)F-FDG uptake associated with CT attenuation. For dual-time-point imaging, the retention index (RI) of benign and malignant nodal groups with positive uptake in the initial scan was examined.A total of 265 nodal groups were documented. On a per-nodal-group basis, the diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of Method 1 were 66.7%, 89.7%, and 85.3%, respectively, whereas those of Method 2 were 64.7%, 96.7%, and 90.6%, respectively. The improvement in diagnostic specificity and accuracy associated with the addition of CT attenuation in Method 2 as compared to Method 1 was statistically significant (p<0.01). Thirty-nine nodal groups with positive uptake in the initial scan underwent dual-time-point imaging and the difference in the RI between benign and malignant groups showed no statistical significance (p>0.05).(18)F-FDG PET-CT has high diagnostic value for preoperative lymph-node (N) staging of NSCLC patients. We show that (18)F-FDG uptake combined with CT attenuation improves the diagnostic specificity and accuracy of nodal diagnosis in NSCLC. For the lymph nodes with positive uptake in the initial scan, dual-time-point imaging has limited effect in differentiation.The correlation of SUVmax with pathological characteristics of primary tumor and the value of Tumor/ Lymph node SUVmax ratio for predicting metastasis to lymph nodes in resected NSCLC patients.We aimed to investigate the correlation of maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) with pathological characteristics of primary tumor and to determine a Tumor/ Lymph node (T/LN) SUVmax ratio predicting metastasis to lymph nodes in NSCLC patients.Eighty-one NSCLC patients who had PET/CT examination at initial staging and subsequently underwent surgical resection were retrospectively evaluated. There were 100 PET/CT positive mediastinal or hilar lymph node stations. Pathological characteristics of the tumor such as largest tumor diameter, tumor histology, differentiation, number of mitosis, degree of stromal inflammation, necrosis; etiology of PET/CT positive lymph node stations; SUVmax of primary tumor and positive lymph node stations were recorded. A T/LN SUVmax ratio was calculated for each lymph node station.SUVmax of the primary tumor was positively correlated with the largest tumor diameter (p=0.001, r=0.374), number of mitosis (p<0.001, r=0.405), and postoperative pathological stage (p=0.007, r=0.298). Patients with squamous cell carcinoma had a statistically significant higher mean SUVmax, number of mitosis and advanced N stages compared to adenocarcinoma. The etiology of 100 PET/CT positive lymph node stations were metastasis in 14, anthracosis in 40, reactive in 39, granulomatous in 4, and silicosis in 3 patients. A T/LN SUVmax ratio of 5 or lower was suggestive for a malignant lymph node with a sensitivity of 92.8% and specificity of 47%.SUVmax of a primary tumor is related to certain pathological characteristics, such as largest diameter, histology, and number of mitosis. A T/LN SUVmax ratio lower than 5 predicts the metastasis to lymph nodes with a high sensitivity.Diffusion-weighted MR imaging in comparison to integrated [¹⁸F]-FDG PET/CT for N-staging in patients with lung cancer.The purpose of this study was to prospectively determine the diagnostic accuracy of diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) using MRI in the staging of thoracic lymph nodes in patients with lung cancer, and to compare the performance to that of PET/CT.20 consecutive patients (pts) with histologically proven lung cancer were included in this study. In all pts FDG-PET/CT was routinely performed to stage lung carcinoma. Additionally, MRI (1.5T) was performed including native T1w, T1w post contrast medium, T2w, and DWI sequences. Regarding the N stage based on the results of the PET/CT there were 5 patients with N0, 3 patients with N1, 5 patients with N2 and 7 patients with N3. Image analysis was performed by two radiologists (R1 and R2), respectively. The reviewers had to chose between 1 (at least one lymph node within a station is malignant) or 0 (no lymph nodes suspicious for malignancy). First the T1 post contrast sequence was analyzed. In a second step the DWI sequence (b=800) was analyzed. Both steps were performed in a blinded fashion.MR imaging with or without DWI only agreed with the results of the PET/CT regarding the N stage in 80% of the patients-15% were understaged and 5% overstaged. There was excellent interobserver agreement; the N-staging result only differed in 1 patient for DWI, resulting in correlation coefficients of 0.98 for DWI and 1.0 for MRI. Compared to PET-CT MRI overstaged one and understaged 4 patients, while DWI overstaged one and understaged 3 patients. This resulted in correlation coefficients of 0.814 (R1 and R2) for MRI and 0.815 (R1) and 0.804 (R2) for DWI. Regarding the ADC values there were no significant differences between ipsilateral hilar (1.03 mm(2)/s ± 0.13), subcarinal (0.96 mm(2)/s±0.24), ipsilateral mediastinal (1.0mm(2)/s ± 0.18), contralateral mediastinal (0.93 mm(2)/s ± 0.23) and supraclavicular (0.9 mm(2)/s ± 0.23) lymph nodes.Diffusion-weighted imaging does not show a clear advantage over conventional MR protocols in the N-staging of lung cancer. MRI with or without DWI shows a moderately correlation with PET/CT with a tendency for understaging.Positron emission tomography in staging early lung cancer: a randomized trial.Among patients with early-stage non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), preoperative imaging tests are important in defining surgical candidates.To assess whether whole-body positron emission tomography and computed tomography (PET-CT) plus cranial imaging correctly upstages cancer in more patients with NSCLC than does conventional staging plus cranial imaging.Randomized clinical trial with recruitment from June 2004 to August 2007. The centralized, computer-generated, variable block size randomization scheme was stratified by treatment center and cancer stage. Participants, health care providers, and outcome assessors were not blinded to imaging modality assignment.8 hospitals and 5 PET-CT centers in academic institutions.Eligible patients were older than 18 years; had histologic or cytologic proof of stage I, II, or IIIA NSCLC on the basis of chest radiography and thoracic CT; and had a tumor considered to be resectable.PET-CT or conventional staging (abdominal CT and bone scan). All patients also had cranial imaging using CT or magnetic resonance imaging.The primary outcome was correct upstaging, thereby avoiding stage-inappropriate surgery. Secondary outcomes were incorrect upstaging and incorrect understaging.170 patients were assigned to PET-CT and 167 to conventional staging. Eight patients (3 who had PET-CT and 5 who had conventional staging) did not have planned surgery. Disease was correctly upstaged in 23 of 167 PET-CT recipients and 11 of 162 conventional staging recipients (13.8% vs. 6.8%; difference, 7.0 percentage points [95% CI, 0.3 to 13.7 percentage points]), thereby sparing these patients from surgery. Disease was incorrectly upstaged in 8 PET-CT recipients and 1 conventional staging recipient (4.8% vs. 0.6%; difference, 4.2 percentage points [CI, 0.5 to 8.6 percentage points]), and it was incorrectly understaged in 25 and 48 patients, respectively (14.9% vs. 29.6%; difference, 14.7 percentage points [CI, 5.7 to 23.4 percentage points]). At 3 years, 52 patients who had PET-CT and 57 patients who had conventional staging had died.The relatively small sample and the fact that some patients did not have planned surgery limited the ability to determine precise differences in clinical outcomes that were attributable to testing strategies.Preoperative staging with PET-CT and cranial imaging identifies more patients with mediastinal and extrathoracic disease than conventional staging, thereby sparing more patients from stage-inappropriate surgery, but the strategy also incorrectly upstaged disease in more patients.Mediastinoscopy might not be necessary in patients with non-small cell lung cancer with mediastinal lymph nodes having a maximum standardized uptake value of less than 5.3.Accurate pretreatment staging in non-small cell lung cancer remains tantamount in formulating an appropriate treatment plan. The maximum standardized uptake value obtained with integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography has been proposed to be a predictor of malignancy in mediastinal lymph nodes. A recent study has also suggested that accuracy of integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography might be improved by increasing the maximum standardized uptake value used for calling a lymph node positive from 2.5 to 5.3. We tested the hypotheses that the maximum standardized uptake value is a predictor of individual lymph node metastasis in non-small cell lung cancer and that pathologic staging with mediastinoscopy might not be necessary in patients with a maximum standardized uptake value of less than 5.3 in their mediastinal lymph nodes.This is a retrospective review of 765 lymph nodes sampled from 110 patients in a single institution with biopsy-proved non-small cell lung cancer. All patients underwent integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computed tomography before biopsy or resection of their mediastinal lymph nodes. Surgical staging was the reference standard. All N2 lymph nodes were individually assessed according to station. Data were analyzed by using the Pearson chi(2) test.Twenty-one (19%) of 110 patients had N2 disease, and a total of 765 N2 lymph nodes were pathologically examined. The mean and median maximum standardized uptake values for N2 nodes with metastatic disease were 9.2 (95% confidence interval, 7.0-11.4) and 7.2 (range, 2.2-25.8), respectively. For benign N2 nodes, the mean and median maximum standardized uptake values were 1.5 (95% confidence interval, 1.4-1.6) and 1.0 (range, 1.0-9.6), respectively (P < .05). When integrated fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomographic/computed tomographic scans were reinterpreted by using a maximum standardized uptake value of 5.3 as a cutoff for malignancy, sensitivity decreased from 93% to 81% (P = .15), specificity increased from 86% to 98% (P < .01), positive predictive value increased from 22% to 64% (P < .01), negative predictive value was unchanged at 99%, and overall accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography increased from 87% to 97% (P < .01).The maximum standardized uptake value is a predictor of individual lymph node metastasis in non-small cell lung cancer. Accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography/computed tomography is significantly improved by using a maximum standardized uptake value of 5.3 to assign malignancy, thereby dramatically decreasing the number of false-positive results. More importantly, these results suggest that some patients with non-small cell lung cancer with a maximum standardized uptake value less than 5.3 in their N2 lymph nodes might be able to forego mediastinoscopy and proceed directly to thoracotomy. This represents a significant change in the current management of standardized uptake value-positive mediastinal lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer.Is mediastinoscopy still the gold standard to evaluate mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with non-small cell lung carcinoma?In this study, we aimed to define the efficacy of F-18 FDG PET/CT for the detection of mediastinal lymph node metastases by comparing the mediastinal findings of F-18 FDG PET/CT with the histopathological results obtained either by mediastinoscopy or thoracotomy in patients with clinically operable non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).This is a prospective, single-institution study of 68 consecutive patients with suspected or pathologically proven, localized, clinically resectable NSCLC (8 females and 60 males; mean age: 60.36 ± 1.01 years, range: 43-78 years). The patients underwent integrated PET/CT scanning at the same PET center. Standard cervical mediastinoscopy and extended mediastinoscopy were performed to sample the lymph nodes. During thoracotomy, complete mediastinal lymph node dissection was routinely performed.Mediastinoscopy gave true positive results in 9 patients and true negative results in 57 patients. There were two false negative results. Mediastinoscopy had a sensitivity of 81.8% (95% CI: 63-82), a specificity of 100% (95% CI: 96-100), a PPV of 100% (95% CI: 77-100), a NPV of 96.6% (95% CI: 93-96), and an accuracy of 97% for the detection of mediastinal lymph node metastases. When PET/CT results were compared with postoperative pathological examination results, PET/CT correctly identified 48 out of 50 patients (96%) who did not have metastatic lymph node involvement. N2/N3 disease was correctly determined by PET/CT in 8 of 11 patients (72.7%) who had positive results on histological analysis. When only N2 and N3 nodal diseases were included in the calculation with the aim of making a comparison with mediastinoscopy (for mediastinal nodes), integrated PET/CT had a sensitivity of 72.7% (95% CI: 51-80), a specificity of 97.7% (95% CI: 92-99), a PPV of 88.9% (95% CI: 62-97), a NPV of 93.3% (95% CI: 88-95) and an accuracy of 92.6% (95% 83-95) for the detection of intrathoracic N2 and N3 nodal metastases.Our data shows that due to its high sensitivity and accuracy, mediastinoscopy is still the most reliable method to evaluate mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with NSCLC.Lymph node staging by means of positron emission tomography is less accurate in non-small cell lung cancer patients with enlarged lymph nodes: analysis of 1,145 lymph nodes.Despite documented superiority of integrated positron emission tomography-computerized tomography (PET-CT) over computerized tomography (CT) in lymph node staging in non-small cell lung cancer, little is known about the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of integrated PET-CT among enlarged lymph nodes. We sought to assess if PET-CT is uniformly accurate among enlarged and non-enlarged lymph nodes.A retrospective review of 206 consecutive patients with histologically proven non-small cell lung cancer who underwent resection and/or mediastinoscopy in our centre over 30 months period was carried out. All these patients had pre-operative staging with integrated PET-CT as an adjunct to chest CT prior to resection and/or mediastinoscopy. Diabetic patients (BM>or=8.0 mmol/l) and those who received neo-adjuvant chemotherapy were excluded. The pathological results of all these cases were reviewed and correlated with those on CT and integrated PET-CT.The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive and negative predictive values were higher in integrated PET-CT than CT alone in all lymph nodes, whether N1 or N2. When lymph nodes were stratified by size, the sensitivity of PET-CT was significantly higher among enlarged (>1cm) than non-enlarged (<or=1cm) lymph nodes (74% vs. 40%, P<0.0001), but with a significantly lower specificity (81% vs. 98%, P<0.0001) and a lower accuracy (78% vs. 90%, P 0.008).Integrated PET-CT remains superior to CT in nodal staging of non-small cell lung cancer. However, in the presence of enlarged lymph nodes, PET-CT becomes less specific, less accurate but more sensitive in detecting metastatic spread to the lymph nodes. Interpretation of PET-CT findings in NSCLC patients with enlarged lymph nodes (>1cm) should be with caution as the specificity of PET-CT is lower and its ability to detect truly negative nodes become reduced. NSCLC patients with enlarged nodes by CT criteria who are PET-CT negative may require cervical mediastinoscopy to rule out metastatic spread to these nodes. Prospective studies are warranted.Improving the inaccuracies of clinical staging of patients with NSCLC: a prospective trial.Clinical stage affects the care of patients with nonsmall cell lung cancer.This is a prospective trial on patients with suspected resectable nonsmall cell lung cancer. All patients underwent integrated positron emission tomographic scanning and computed tomographic scanning, and all suspicious metastatic sites were investigated. A, T, N, and M status was assigned. If N2, N3 and M1 were negative, patients underwent thoracotomy and complete thoracic lymphadenectomy.There were 383 patients. The accuracy of clinical staging using positron emission tomographic scanning and computed tomographic scanning was 68% and 66% for stage I, 84% and 82% for stage II, 74% and 69% for stage III, and 93% and 92% for stage IV, respectively. N2 disease was discovered in 115 patients (30%) and was most common in the subcarinal lymph node (30%). Unsuspected N2 disease occurred in 28 patients (14%) and was most common in the posterior mediastinal lymph nodes (subcarinal, 38%; posterior aortopulmonary, 15%). It was found in 9% of patients who were clinically staged I (58% in the posterior mediastinal lymph nodes) and in 26% of patients clinically staged II (86% in posterior mediastinal lymph nodes).Despite integrated positron emission tomographic scanning and computed tomographic scanning, clinical staging remains relatively inaccurate for patients with nonsmall cell lung cancer. Recent studies suggest adjuvant therapy for stage Ib and II nonsmall cell lung cancer; thus the impact on preoperative care is to find unsuspected N2 disease. Unsuspected N2 disease is most common in posterior mediastinal lymph nodes inaccessible by mediastinoscopy. Thus one should consider endoscopic ultrasound fine-needle aspiration, especially for patients clinically staged as I and II, even if the nodes are negative on positron emission tomographic scanning and computed tomographic scanning.Role of preoperative PET-CT in assessing mediastinal and hilar lymph node status in early stage lung cancer.Positron emission tomography combined with computed tomography (PET-CT) is important in the assessment and workup of lung cancer staging. However, inconsistencies between clinical image results obtained and pathologic findings of surgical specimens are still very common, particularly in patients with clinical early stage lung cancer. We sought to clarify the role of PET-CT in predicting mediastinal lymph node status preoperatively in clinical early stage lung cancer patients.The cases were collected retrospectively from January 2008 to February 2009. All patients were good surgical candidates, and clinically early-stage during the pre-op evaluation, which included CT, PET scan, and cardiopulmonary tests. All patients underwent surgery, with complete pathological evaluation of mediastinal lymph node (LNs). The pathological status and PET Standardized uptake value (SUV)(max) of mediastinal LNs were collected to calculate the ROC curve, and to determine the best cut-off value of PET SUV(max). Other cofactors, including sex, tumor size, tumor SUV(max), histology type, and lobar distribution, were analyzed utilizing correlation study, Chi-square test, and t-test for significance.A total of 83 patients were enrolled into the study. The majority of the cases were in pathological early stage (Stage I: 67.5%, Stage II: 12%). The cut-off point of mediastinal LN SUV(max) was 1.6 calculated by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve (sensitivity: 40%, specificity: 88.7%, negative predictive rate: 95.1%). The hilar LN SUV(max) was found to have a poor correlation to the final pathologic status of hilar nodes with insignificant p value (0.487). Tumor SUV(max) and increased hilar LN uptake (SUV(max) > 2.0) were found to be significantly correlated with the pathologic status of mediastinal LNs. The false positive rates by PET-CT scan in N1 and N2 nodes were 70% and 78%, respectively, primarily due to inflammatory process (as anthracosis the leading cause).Integrated PET-CT is a useful tool for predicting the negativity of mediastinal LN status pre-operatively in clinically early stage (Stages I and II) lung cancer but may be relatively inaccurate in predicting hilar LN status and largely confounded by false positives caused by inflammatory process.FDG PET/CT and mediastinal nodal metastasis detection in stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer: prognostic implications.We aimed to compare the prognoses of patients with pathologically true negative (P-TN) N2 and PET/CT false negative (FN) results in stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Our institutional review board approved this retrospective study with a waiver of informed consent. The study included 184 patients (124 men and 60 women; mean age, 59 years) with stage T1 NSCLC who underwent an integrated PET/CT and surgery. After estimating the efficacy of PET/CT for detecting N2 disease, we determined and compared disease-free survival (DFS) rates in three groups (P-TN [n = 161], PET/CT FN [n = 12], and PET/CT true positive [TP, n = 11]) using the Kaplan-Meier analysis and log-rank test.Pathologic N2 disease was observed in 23 (12%) patients. PET/CT had an N2 disease detection sensitivity of 48% (11 of 23 patients), a specificity of 95% (153 of 161), and an accuracy of 89% (164 of 184). The 3-year DFS rate in the PET/CT FN group (31%, 95% confidence interval [CI]; 13.6-48.0%) was similar to that of the TP group (16%, 95% CI; 1.7-29.5%) (p = 0.649), but both groups had significantly shorter DFS rates than the P-TN group (77%, 95% CI; 72.0-81.2%) (p < 0.001).The PET/CT shows a high specificity, but low sensitivity for detecting N2 disease in stage T1 NSCLC. Patients with PET/CT FN N2 disease have survival rates similar to PET/CT TP N2 disease patients, which are both substantially shorter than the survival rate of P-TN patients.Preoperative staging of lung cancer with combined PET-CT.Fast and accurate staging is essential for choosing treatment for non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC). The purpose of this randomized study was to evaluate the clinical effect of combined positron-emission tomography and computed tomography (PET-CT) on preoperative staging of NSCLC.We randomly assigned patients who were referred for preoperative staging of NSCLC to either conventional staging plus PET-CT or conventional staging alone. Patients were followed until death or for at least 12 months. The primary end point was the number of futile thoracotomies, defined as any one of the following: a thoracotomy with the finding of pathologically confirmed mediastinal lymph-node involvement (stage IIIA [N2]), stage IIIB or stage IV disease, or a benign lung lesion; an exploratory thoracotomy; or a thoracotomy in a patient who had recurrent disease or death from any cause within 1 year after randomization.From January 2002 through February 2007, we randomly assigned 98 patients to the PET-CT group and 91 to the conventional-staging group. Mediastinoscopy was performed in 94% of the patients. After PET-CT, 38 patients were classified as having inoperable NSCLC, and after conventional staging, 18 patients were classified thus. Sixty patients in the PET-CT group and 73 in the conventional-staging group underwent thoracotomy (P=0.004). Among these thoracotomies, 21 in the PET-CT group and 38 in the conventional-staging group were futile (P=0.05). The number of justified thoracotomies and survival were similar in the two groups.The use of PET-CT for preoperative staging of NSCLC reduced both the total number of thoracotomies and the number of futile thoracotomies but did not affect overall mortality. (ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT00867412.)Efficacy of convex probe endobronchial ultrasound (CP-EBUS) assisted transbronchial needle aspiration for mediastinal staging in non-small cell lung cancer cases with mediastinal lymphadenopathy.Endobronchial ultrasound-guided transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) is a sampling method for the patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) that have enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes that are detected with computed tomography (CT). We aimed to investigate the value of EBUS-TBNA in sampling enlarged mediastinal lymph nodes in the patient with NSCLC.From January 2007 to May 2009, patients were diagnosed NSCLC with CT scans showing enlarged lymph nodes (node >1 cm) or a positron emission tomography (PET/CT) finding of the mediastinum underwent EBUS-TBNA.EBUS-TBNA was successfully performed in all 52 patients (mean age, 52 years; 45 men) from 93 mediastinal lymph nodes. EBUS detected lymph node metastasis in 40 patients (77%). 12 patients (23%) with negative lymph node samples were underwent mediastinoscopy. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of EBUS-TBNA in the detection of mediastinal metastasis were 95 %, 100%, 100%, 83%, and 96%, respectively. EBUS-TBNA was uneventful, and there were no complications.EBUS-TBNA is an effective, safe and minimally invasive procedure following PET/CT or CT scanning in the mediastinal staging of potentially operable NSCLC.Prediction of lymph node metastases in NSCLC. Three dimensional anatomical parameters do not substitute FDG-PET-CT.To distinguish between benign and malignant mediastinal lymph nodes in patients with NSCLC by comparing 2D and semi-automated 3D measurements in FDG-PET-CT.FDG-PET-CT was performed in 46 patients prior to therapy. 299 mediastinal lymph-nodes were evaluated independently by two radiologists, both manually and by semi-automatic segmentation software. Longest-axial-diameter (LAD), shortest-axial-diameter (SAD), maximal-3D-diameter, elongation and volume were obtained. FDG-PET-CT and clinical/FDG-PET-CT follow up examinations and/or histology served as the reference standard. Statistical analysis encompassed intra-class-correlation-coefficients and receiver-operator-characteristics-curves (ROC).The standard of reference revealed involvement in 87 (29%) of 299 lymph nodes. Manually and semi-automatically measured 2D parameters (LAD and SAD) showed a good correlation with mean intraclass coefficients of .80 and .72, respectively. Semi-automated prediction revealed the highest areas-under-the-ROC-curve for volume (.75, 95%CI: .69-81) and SAD (.75, 95%CI: .70-.81). AUC for LAD and maximal-3D diameter were about .68. Substantially lower accuracies were found for elongation (.57, 95%CI: .50-.64).Optimized semi-automated three dimensional parameters by CT cannot approximate reported data on FDG-PET-CT for lymph node assessment in NSCLC. SAD remains the most accurate and at the same time simple to achieve anatomical criterion for definition of NSCLC target lesions.The accuracy of integrated PET-CT compared with dedicated PET alone for the staging of patients with nonsmall cell lung cancer.The treatment of patients with nonsmall cell lung cancer (NSCLC) is determined by the stage. We evaluated the accuracy of staging using integrated positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) and compared it with dedicated PET visually correlated with CT scan.A prospective blinded trial was performed on a consecutive series of patients with NSCLC. Patients underwent integrated PET-CT scanning with 2-[18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG-18). A radiologist assigned the T, N and M status. No sooner than 2 weeks the same radiologist read the dedicated PET alone, without the integrated CT images and a T, N and M status was assigned again. The most recent CT scan was available and visually correlated with both studies. All patients underwent biopsies of suspicious N2 or N3 lymph node or distant metastases and if negative, pulmonary resection with lymphadenectomy was performed.There were 129 patients. Integrated PET-CT is a better predictor than PET for all stages of cancer and achieved statistical significance for stage I (52% versus 33%, p = 0.03) and for stage II (70% versus 36%, p = 0.04). It also is a better overall predictor for T status (70% versus 47%, p = 0.001) and the N status (78% versus 56%, p = 0.008). Nodal analysis shows that integrated PET-CT was more accurate for the total N2 nodes (96% versus 93%, p = 0.01) and for the total N1 nodes (90% versus 80%, p = 0.001). It was also more sensitive, specific, and had a higher positive predictive value for both N2 and N1 nodes (p < 0.05 for all). Integrated PET-CT is significantly more sensitive at the 4R, 5, 7, 10 L and 11 stations and more accurate at the 7 and 11 lymph nodes stations than dedicated PET.Integrated PET-CT using FDG-18 better predicts stage I and II disease as well as the T and N status of patients with NSCLC when compared with dedicated PET alone. It is more accurate at some nodal stations but still only achieves an accuracy of 96% and 90% for the N2 and N1 nodes, respectively.Detection of nodal metastatic disease in patients with non-small cell lung cancer: comparison of positron emission tomography (PET), contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT), and combined PET-CT.Of 31 patients with lung cancer, 19 underwent PET-CT and 12 had CT followed by PET. Thoracic lymph nodes were sampled by mediastinoscopy or thoracotomy. Sensitivities, specificities, positive (PPV), and negative predictive values (NPV) were calculated based on histopathology. Ninety nodes (41 malignant) were identified. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV were 94%, 73%, 66%, and 96% for PET-CT, respectively. In 12 patients who underwent PET and CT separately, these values were 90%, 31%, 64%, and 71% for PET and 81%, 50%, 69%, and 66% for CT, respectively.Accuracy of helical computed tomography and [18F] fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography for identifying lymph node mediastinal metastases in potentially resectable non-small-cell lung cancer.Computed tomography (CT) and [18F] Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) are considered suitable methods for the noninvasive staging of the mediastinum. Our study was intended to estimate the efficacy of contrast-enhanced helical CT (hCT) and FDG-PET, alone and combined, in the diagnosis of lymph node mediastinal metastases.This study was a prospective and blind comparison of the efficacy of hCT and FDG-PET with two alternative reference standards, mediastinoscopy, and mediastinoscopy plus thoracotomy plus a 6-month follow-up to diagnose lymph node mediastinal metastases in 132 consecutive patients with potentially resectable non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC). The metastatic disease was assessed histopathologically. Further clinical information was obtained postoperatively after a median follow-up of 42 months.The prevalence of cN2,3 is 0.28. For hCT the sensitivity and specificity are 0.86 (95% CI, 0.70 to 0.93) and 0.67 (95% CI, 0.56 to 0.75), for PET 0.94 (95% CI, 0.81 to 0.98) and 0.59 (95% CI, 0.49 to 0.68), and for hCT and PET combined in-parallel 0.97 (95% CI, 0.84 to 0.99) and 0.44 (95% CI, 0.34 to 0.53), which translate into a negative predicted probability of 0.98 (95% CI, 0.88 to 1.00). The crude diagnostic odds ratio of PET in the total sample studied is 13.1, in the subgroup hCT+ 11.04 (3.0 to 40 0.1), and in the hCT- 3.5 (0.5 to 21.5). Similar results were obtained for hCT stratified by PET.hCT and PET perform similarly in the mediastinal staging of NSCLC, both tests are conditionally dependent and provide complementary information, and their diagnostic value mainly resides on the negative results.N stage disease in patients with non-small cell lung cancer: efficacy of quantitative and qualitative assessment with STIR turbo spin-echo imaging, diffusion-weighted MR imaging, and fluorodeoxyglucose PET/CT.To prospectively compare the diagnostic capability of short inversion time inversion-recovery (STIR) turbo spin-echo (SE) imaging, diffusion-weighted (DW) magnetic resonance (MR) imaging, and fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) combined positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) in N stage assessment in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).This prospective study was approved by the institutional review board, and written informed consent was obtained from all patients. A total of 250 consecutive patients with NSCLC (136 men; mean age, 73 years; 114 women; mean age, 72 years) prospectively underwent pretherapeutic STIR turbo SE imaging, DW MR imaging, and FDG PET/CT, as well as surgical and pathologic examinations (N0 disease, n = 157; N1 disease, n = 72; N2 disease, n = 16; N3 disease, n = 5). Lymph node-to-saline ratio (LSR), lymph node-to-muscle ratio (LMR), apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC), maximal standardized uptake value (SUV(max)), and visual scoring were assessed for 135 metastatic lymph nodes and 135 randomly selected nonmetastatic lymph nodes. Receiver operating characteristic curve analysis was used to determine feasible threshold values. Diagnostic capabilities for N stage assessment were compared with the McNemar test on a per-patient basis.When feasible, threshold values were used for quantitative assessment; sensitivity and accuracy of LSR and LMR (sensitivity, 82.8%; accuracy, 86.8%) proved to be significantly higher than those of ADC (sensitivity: 74.2%, P = .01; accuracy: 84.4%, P = .04) and SUV(max) (sensitivity: 74.2%, P = .01). For qualitative assessment, sensitivity of STIR turbo SE imaging (77.4%) was significantly higher than that of DW MR imaging (71.0%, P = .03) and FDG PET/CT (69.9%, P = .02).Quantitative and qualitative assessments of N stage disease in patients with NSCLC obtained with STIR turbo SE MR imaging are more sensitive and/or more accurate than those obtained with DW MR imaging and FDG PET/CT.http://radiology.rsna.org/lookup/suppl/doi:10.1148/radiol.11110281/-/DC1.[Value of (18)F-FDG PET-CT in the preoperative N staging of non-small cell lung cancer].To evaluate the diagnostic value of PET-CT with (18)F-FDG in preoperative N staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), especially the additional value of CT attenuation and the dual-time-point imaging in determining the lymph nodes status.Forty-three NSCLC patients underwent curative surgical resection after integrated (18)F-FDG PET-CT examination. The initial scan images were analyzed by two methods. In the first method, the nodal status was determined by (18)F-FDG uptake only (method PET). In the second method, the nodal status was determined by uptake associated with CT attenuation (method PET and CT attenuation). Nodal uptake was interpreted visually and semi quantitatively. For dual-time-point imaging, a retention index (RI) > 10% was regarded as increasing trend. Histopathologic results served as the reference standard.On the per-nodal-station (group) basis, the diagnostic sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, PPV, and NPV were 88.0%, 88.4%, 88.3%, 59.5% and 97.4%, respectively, by the method 1; 84.0%, 94.6%, 92.9%, 75.0% and 96.8%, respectively, by the method 2. The specificity and accuracy between these two methods had statistically significant difference (P < 0.05). Twenty-eight nodal groups underwent dual-time-point imaging and the differences of DeltaSUV(max) and RI between benign and malignant groups had no statistically significant difference (P > 0.05). Eleven groups were malignant in 23 lymph nodal groups which had an increasing trend. Among the 5 nodal groups which did not show increase in delayed scan, one group was malignant.(18)F-FDG PET-CT has high diagnostic value in the preoperative N staging of NSCLC, and combining uptake with CT attenuation of lymph nodes can improve the specificity and accuracy. For the lymph nodes with high uptake in the initial scan, increasing uptake in delayed scan has little effect in differential diagnosis, but no increasing in delayed phase is more prone to benign diagnosis.[Significance of dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET imaging in evaluation of hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis in non-small-cell lung cancer].To explore the diagnostic value of dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging in detecting hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis in non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Forty-six patients with NSCLC underwent standard whole body single-time 18F-FDG PET-CT scans and a delayed imaging for the thorax alone before surgery, meanwhile, the standard uptake value (SUV) and retention index (RI) were calculated.A total number of 584 lymph nodes were excised in the 46 patients. Of these, 134 metastatic lymph nodes were pathologically confirmed in 31 patients. There were 189 lymph nodes detected and suspected to be metastatic by standard single-time 18 F-FDG PET-CT imaging, and 161 by dual-time-point imaging. Therefore, the sensitivity, specificity, diagnostic accuracy, positive predictive value and negative predictive value in the detection of hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis were 87.3%, 84.0%, 84.8%, 61.9% and 95.7% by standard single-time 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging, versus 94.8%, 92.2%, 92.8%, 78.9% and 98.1%, respectively, by dual-time-point imaging. There was a statistically significant difference in the detection of lymph node metastasis between the standard single-time imaging and dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging.Dual-time-point 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging is more sensitive, specific and accurate than standard single-time 18F-FDG PET-CT imaging in the detection of hilar and mediastinal lymph node metastasis, and may provide more information for diagnosis, staging and treatment of non-small cell lung cancer.Integrated FDG-PET/CT does not make invasive staging of the intrathoracic lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer redundant: a prospective study.Staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) is important for determining choice of treatment and prognosis. The accuracy of FDG-PET scans for staging of lymph nodes is too low to replace invasive nodal staging. It is unknown whether the accuracy of integrated FDG-PET/CT scanning makes invasive staging redundant.In a prospective study, the mediastinal and/or hilar lymph nodes in patients with proven NSCLC were investigated with integrated FDG-PET/CT scanning. Pathological confirmation of all suspect lymph nodes was obtained to calculate the accuracy of the fusion images. In addition, the use of the standardised uptake value (SUV) in the staging of intrathoracic lymph nodes was analysed.105 intrathoracic lymph node stations from 52 patients with NSCLC were characterised. The prevalence of malignancy in the lymph nodes was 36%. The sensitivity of the integrated FDG-PET/CT scan to detect malignant lymph nodes was 84% and its specificity was 85% (positive likelihood ratio 5.64, negative likelihood ratio 0.19). SUV(max), SUV(mean) and the SUV(max)/SUV(liver) ratio were all significantly higher in malignant than in benign lymph nodes. The area under the receiver operating curve did not differ between these three quantitative variables, but the highest accuracy was found with the SUV(max)/SUV(liver) ratio. At a cut-off value of 1.5 for the SUV(max)/SUV(liver )ratio, the sensitivity and specificity to detect malignant lymph node invasion were 82% and 93%, respectively.The accuracy of integrated FDG-PET/CT scanning is too low to replace invasive intrathoracic lymph node staging in patients with NSCLC. The visual interpretation of the fusion images of the integrated FDG-PET/CT scan can be replaced by the quantitative variable SUV(max)/SUV(liver) without loss of accuracy for intrathoracic lymph node staging.Diffusion-weighted imaging is superior to positron emission tomography in the detection and nodal assessment of lung cancers.Diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging (DWI) makes it possible to detect malignant tumors based on the difference in the diffusion of water molecules among tissues. The aims of this study are to examine the usefulness of DWI compared with positron emission tomography-computed tomography (PET-CT) in the assessment of lung cancer, and the relationships between the apparent diffusion coefficient (ADC) value and several pathologic factors.Sixty-three patients with primary non-small cell lung cancer were enrolled in this study. The DWI and PET-CT were performed before surgery. There were 42 adenocarcinomas, 19 squamous cell carcinomas, and 2 other cell types.Sixty-one lung cancers (97%) were detected visually with DWI. This was significantly higher than 54 lung cancers (86%) with PET-CT. The accuracy for N staging by DWI was 0.81 (51 of 63), which was not significantly higher than 0.71 (45 of 63) by PET-CT. The sensitivity (0.75) for individual metastatic lymph node stations by DWI was significantly higher than that (0.48) by PET-CT. The specificity for individual nonmetastatic lymph node stations was 0.99 by DWI and 0.97 by PET-CT, respectively. The accuracy (0.95) for the diagnosis of lymph node stations by DWI was significantly higher than that (0.90) by PET-CT. There was a weak reverse relationship (correlation coefficient: 0.286) between the ADC value and the maximum standardized uptake value, but no relationship between ADC value and tumor size. The ADC values increased while the cell differentiation increased.Diffusion-weighted magnetic resonance imaging is superior to PET-CT in the detection of primary lesions and nodal assessment of non-small cell lung cancers.Non-small cell lung cancer: prospective comparison of integrated FDG PET/CT and CT alone for preoperative staging.To evaluate prospectively the accuracy of integrated positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) with use of fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG), compared with that of stand-alone CT, for the preoperative staging of non-small cell lung cancer, with surgical and histologic findings used as the reference standard.Institutional review board approval and patient informed consent were obtained. From November 2003 to February 2004, 106 patients (78 men, 28 women; mean age, 56 years) with non-small cell lung cancer underwent curative surgical resection (tumor resection and lymph node dissection) after stand-alone CT followed by integrated FDG PET/CT. Tumor stages were determined by using the TNM and American Joint Committee on Cancer staging systems. Histopathologic results served as the reference standard. Statistically significant differences in tumor staging between integrated PET/CT and stand-alone CT were determined with P < .05 obtained by using the McNemar test or with a generalized estimating equation.The primary tumor was correctly staged in 84 patients (79%) at stand-alone CT and in 91 patients (86%) at integrated FDG PET/CT (P = .25). For the depiction of malignant nodes, the sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of CT were 70% (23 of 33 nodal groups), 69% (248 of 360), and 69% (271 of 393), respectively, whereas those of PET/CT were 85% (28 of 33), 84% (302 of 360), and 84% (330 of 393) (P = .25, P < .001, and P < .001, respectively). There were 112 false-positive interpretations at CT for 54 hilar, 16 subcarinal, 29 paratracheal, 10 subaortic, and two pulmonary ligament nodal groups and one upper paratracheal group, compared with only 58 false-positive interpretations at PET/CT for 32 hilar, seven subcarinal, 13 lower paratracheal, and six subaortic nodal groups. There were 10 false-negative interpretations at CT for four hilar, two lower paratracheal, and two subcarinal nodal groups, one prevascular and retrotracheal group, and one inferior pulmonary group, but only five false-negative interpretations at PET/CT (one each for paratracheal, subaortic, subcarinal, inferior pulmonary, and hilar nodal groups).Integrated FDG PET/CT is significantly better than stand-alone CT for lung cancer staging and provides enhanced accuracy and specificity in nodal staging.STIR turbo SE MR imaging vs. coregistered FDG-PET/CT: quantitative and qualitative assessment of N-stage in non-small-cell lung cancer patients.To conduct a prospective comparison of the accuracy of short inversion time (TI) inversion-recovery (STIR) turbo spin-echo (SE) imaging and coregistered 2-[fluorine-18] fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose (FDG)-positron emission tomography (PET) with computed tomography (CT) (coregistered FDG-PET/CT) to assess the N-stage in non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) patients.A total of 115 consecutive NSCLC patients prospectively underwent CT, STIR turbo SE imaging, and FDG-PET, as well as surgical and pathological examinations. All STIR turbo SE images were obtained with a 0.9% saline phantom, which was placed alongside the chest wall of each patient, and coregistered FDG-PET/CTs were reconstructed using commercially available software. For quantitative assessments, the ratio of signal intensity (SI) of each lymph node to that of 0.9% saline phantom (lymph node-saline ratio [LSR]) and maximal standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) of each lymph node were calculated. Feasible threshold values were determined by using the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve-based positive test, and diagnostic capabilities of N-stage were compared by McNemar's test on a per patient basis.When feasible, threshold values were adopted, quantitative sensitivity (90.1%) and accuracy (92.2%) of STIR turbo SE imaging were significantly higher than those of quantitative and qualitative sensitivities (76.7% and 74.4%) and accuracies (83.5% and 82.6%) of coregistered FDG-PET/CT on a per patient basis (P < 0.05).STIR turbo SE imaging is at least as valid as coregistered FDG-PET/CT for quantitative and qualitative assessment of the N-stage for NSCLC patients.Prediction of pathologic node-negative clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma for optimal candidates undergoing sublobar resection.Patients with pathologic node-negative early lung cancer may be optimal candidates for sublobar resection. We aimed to identify predictors of pathologic lymph node involvement in clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma.The data from a multicenter database of 502 patients with completely resected clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma were retrospectively analyzed to determine the relationship between the lymph node metastasis status and tumor size on high-resolution computed tomography (HRCT) or maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) on [18F]-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT). Revised SUVmax was used to correct interinstitutional discrepancies.In multivariate analyses, either a solid tumor size on HRCT (P = .001) or an SUVmax on FDG-PET/CT (P = .049) was an independent predictor of lymph node metastasis. The predictive criteria of pathologic node-negative early lung cancer were a solid tumor size of less than 0.8 cm or an SUVmax of less than 1.5. Patients who met the predictive criteria of pathologic node-negative disease had less pathologic invasiveness, such as lymphatic, vascular, or pleural invasion (P < .001), and better disease-free survival (P < .0001) than those who did not, and 86 (40.4%) of the 213 patients with T1b (2-3 cm) tumors met the predictive criteria.Either a solid tumor size or an SUVmax was a significant independent predictor of nodal involvement in clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma. The pathologic node-negative status criteria of a solid tumor size of less than 0.8 cm on HRCT or an SUVmax of less than 1.5 on FDG-PET/CT may be helpful for avoiding systematic lymphadenectomy for clinical stage IA lung adenocarcinoma, even in cases of T1b (2-3 cm) tumor.Staging of non-small-cell lung cancer with integrated positron-emission tomography and computed tomography.We compared the diagnostic accuracy of integrated positron-emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) with that of CT alone, that of PET alone, and that of conventional visual correlation of PET and CT in determining the stage of disease in non-small-cell lung cancer.In a prospective study, integrated PET-CT was performed in 50 patients with proven or suspected non-small-cell lung cancer. CT and PET alone, visually correlated PET and CT, and integrated PET-CT were evaluated separately, and a tumor-node-metastasis (TNM) stage was assigned on the basis of image analysis. Nodal stations were identified according to the mapping system of the American Thoracic Society. The standard of reference was histopathological assessment of tumor stage and node stage. Extrathoracic metastases were confirmed histopathologically or by at least one other imaging method. A paired sign test was used to compare integrated PET-CT with the other imaging methods.Integrated PET-CT provided additional information in 20 of 49 patients (41 percent), beyond that provided by conventional visual correlation of PET and CT. Integrated PET-CT had better diagnostic accuracy than the other imaging methods. Tumor staging was significantly more accurate with integrated PET-CT than with CT alone (P=0.001), PET alone (P<0.001), or visual correlation of PET and CT (P=0.013); node staging was also significantly more accurate with integrated PET-CT than with PET alone (P=0.013). In metastasis staging, integrated PET-CT increased the diagnostic certainty in two of eight patients.Integrated PET-CT improves the diagnostic accuracy of the staging of non-small-cell lung cancer.False-negative rate after positron emission tomography/computer tomography scan for mediastinal staging in cI stage non-small-cell lung cancer.To assess the false-negative (FN) rate of positron emission tomography (PET)-chest computed tomography (CT) scan in clinical non-central cIA and cIB non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) for mediastinal staging.Between January 2007 and December 2010, 402 patients with potentially operable NSCLC were assessed by thoracic CT scan and 18-fluoro-2-deoxy-d-glucose PET-CT for mediastinal staging and to detect extrathoracic metastases, of which 153 surgically treated patients (79 cIA and 74 cIB cases) were prospectively included in the study. Central tumours were excluded on the basis of CT scan criteria, defined as contact with the intrapulmonary main bronchi, pulmonary artery, pulmonary veins or the origin of the first segmental branches. CT scan was considered negative if lymph nodes were <1 cm at the smaller diameter. 18FDG PET-CT was considered negative when the high maximum standard uptake value (SUVmax) was <2.5. Non-invasive surgical staging was carried out in this group, and curative resection plus systematic mediastinal dissection was performed except in the event of unexpected oncological contraindication.Composite non-invasive staging (CT scan, PET-CT) showed a negative predictive value (NPV) of 92% (CI 83.6-96.8) in the cIA group and 85% (CI 74-92) in the cIB group. There were 6 of 79 (7.6%) false-negatives (FNs) in cIA and 11 of 74 (14.8%) in cIB. Multilevel pN2 were detected in four cases, all of them in the cIB group. The most frequently involved N2 was subcarinal (two cases) in cIA and right lower paratracheal (R4) and seven (five cases) in cIB. Occult (pN2) lymph nodes were more frequent in tumour sizes≥5 cm (pT2b, nine cases, four FNs, P=0.03), pN1, adenocarcinoma [excluding minimally invasive adenocarcinoma (MIA) and lepidic predominant growth (LPA)] (P=0.029) and female patients, but no other risk factors for mediastinal metastases were identified (age, clinical stage, tumour location, central or peripheral, P>0.05). Multilevel pN2 was significantly more frequent in the cIB group (P<0.03). In pT≤1 cm (T1a), NPV was significantly better (NPV=100%, P<0.05) than the other subgroups studied (IA>1 cm and IB).Composite results for non-invasive mediastinal staging (CT scan, PET-CT) showed 11% of FNs in cI stage (7.6% in non-central cIA and 14.8% in cIB). In tumours≤1 cm, NPV makes surgical staging unnecessary. In women with adenocarcinoma and non-central cIB, however, the high FN rate makes invasive staging necessary, particularly in pT2b to decrease the incidence of unexpected pN2 in thoracotomy.Positron emission tomography with CT in the evaluation of non-small cell lung cancer in populations with a high prevalence of tuberculosis.To determine the utility of positron emission tomography with CT (PET-CT) in the evaluation of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) in an Asian context where tuberculosis rates are moderately high.Case records of consecutive patients with NSCLC undergoing PET-CT at the Singapore General Hospital over a 1-year period were retrospectively reviewed. The authors evaluated the sensitivity and specificity of PET-CT at their institution using surgical pathology or the tincture of time as the gold standard.A total of 54 patients underwent PET-CT during this period. Seven patients were evaluated for solitary pulmonary nodule, for which PET-CT gave a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 75%. There was one patient with false positive PET-CT due to active tuberculosis. In total, 41 patients underwent PET-CT for staging of NSCLC. There was one false positive (patient was found to have active tuberculous lymphadenitis) and one false negative for NSCLC. This gave a sensitivity of 92.3% and a specificity of 95%. Histology from the adrenal glands was available in two patients with PET-CT that was positive for adrenal metastases. One proved to be benign whereas the other was consistent with metastasis. Two patients had PET-CT positive for liver metastases, which was verified by histology. Two patients with positive PET-CT for lesions in the colon turned out to be benign histologically.Positron emission tomography with CT for the evaluation and follow-up of solitary pulmonary nodule and NSCLC can provide additional useful information to conventional radiology for treatment planning and a non-invasive determination of prognosis. However, physicians need to be aware of the limitations of this imaging modality, particularly when tuberculosis has a high prevalence in the population.The maximum standardized 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose uptake on positron emission tomography predicts lymph node metastasis and invasiveness in clinical stage IA non-small cell lung cancer.In patients with clinical stage IA non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), we investigated whether the maximum standardized uptake value (SUVmax) of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) by the tumor correlated with lymph node metastasis, intratumoral lymphatic and vascular invasion of tumor cells, and pleural invasion. From April 2005 to November 2008, 58 patients underwent a lobectomy with systematic hilar and mediastinal lymph node dissection for clinical stage IA NSCLC. All patients had integrated FDG-positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) performed in our center as part of the preoperative workup within one month of resection. The relationships between the SUVmax and pathologic results of lymph node metastasis, intratumoral lymphatic and vascular invasion of tumor cells, and pleural invasion were examined. Compared with tumors with an SUVmax < or = 2.0, tumors with an SUVmax>2.0 had more frequent lymph node metastasis, intratumoral lymphatic and vascular invasion of tumor cells and pleural invasion (all P<0.05). Our results suggest that in patients with clinical stage IA NSCLC, SUVmax is an important predictor of tumor invasiveness.Value of PET/CT versus enhanced CT for locoregional lymph nodes in non-small cell lung cancer.To compare the diagnostic efficacies of integrated (18)F FDG PET/CT images and contrast-enhanced helical CT images in locoregional lymph node metastasis in the patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).From June 2005 to June 2007, 122 potentially operable patients with proven or suspected non-small cell lung cancer underwent integrated PET/CT and contrast-enhanced CT scans followed by surgical nodal staging. The results of reviewing PET/CT and enhanced CT images for the locoregional lymph node metastasis were compared in relation to pathologic findings.Preoperative nodal staging was compared with postoperative histopathological staging, 80% (98 of 122) of patients correctly staged, 13% (16 of 122) of patients were overstaged, and 7% (8 of 122) were understaged by PET/CT, while those values for CT were 56% (68 of 122), 26% (32 of 122), and 18% (22 of 122), respectively. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of PET/CT for lymph nodes were 86%, 85%, 85%, 64%, 95%, respectively; compared with 69%, 71%, 70%, 43%, 88% for CT (P=0.000, 0.000, 0.000, 0.001, 0.001, respectively). 81% false-negative interpretations and 72% false-positive interpretations on CT were corrected by PET/CT. 57% false-negative interpretations and 45% false-positive interpretations on PET/CT were corrected by CT. 6 % (9 of 153) positive lymph nodes and 8% (40 of 486) negative nodes at pathology were incorrectly diagnosed both by PET/CT and CT.Integrated PET/CT improves the sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value than enhanced CT in the assessment of locoregional lymph nodes, and provides more efficient and accurate data of nodal staging, with a better effect on diagnosis and therapy in non-small cell lung cancer.Value of dual-time-point FDG PET/CT for mediastinal nodal staging in non-small-cell lung cancer patients with lung comorbidity.To evaluate the efficacy of dual-time-point F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography (FDG PET)/ computed tomography (CT) for mediastinal nodal staging in non-small-cell lung cancer patients with lung comorbidity.Fifty-three pathologically proven non-small-cell lung cancer patients with pulmonary comorbidity and 49 patients as controlled group without comorbidity were enrolled. PET/CT was performed at 1-hour (whole body) post-FDG injection and repeated 2 hours (thoracic) after injection. All patients received radical surgery with system mediastinal lymph node (LN) dissection. The results of LN detection by single-time-point and dual-time-point scan were compared with the histopathologic findings.On a per-patient basis, in patients with pulmonary comorbidity, the sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, and positive predictive values (PPV), and negative predictive values of single-time-point scan were 87.5%, 59.5%, 67.9%, 48.3%, and 91.7%, respectively. Those values of dual-time-point scan were 93.8%, 67.6%, 75.5%, 55.6%, and 96.2%, respectively. In patients without comorbidity, dual-time-point scan was similar in those values to single-time-point. On a per-nodal station basis, the specificity, accuracy, and PPV of dual-time-point scan were better than those of single-time-point with statistically significant differences (P = 0.017, 0.002, and 0.027, respectively) in patients with pulmonary comorbidity, but the difference was not statistically significant in patients with no pulmonary comorbidity.Dual-time-point FDG PET/CT is more effective for mediastinal nodal staging than single-time-point in patients with pulmonary comorbidity. Dual-time-point scan was useful for diagnosis of mediastinal LN metastases in reducing the false-positive results in all patients, but improved specificity, accuracy, and PPV only in patients with pulmonary comorbidity.Non-small cell lung cancer staging: efficacy comparison of integrated PET/CT versus 3.0-T whole-body MR imaging.To compare prospectively the diagnostic efficacies of integrated positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) and 3.0-T whole-body magnetic resonance (MR) imaging for determining TNM stages in non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Institutional review board approval and informed consent were obtained. The study included 165 patients (125 men, 40 women; mean age, 61 years) with NSCLC proved at pathologic examination who underwent both unenhanced PET/CT and whole-body MR imaging. Pathologic findings for T (n = 123) and N (n = 150) staging and pathologic or follow-up imaging findings (n = 154) for M staging were reference standards. The efficacies of PET/CT and whole-body MR imaging for lung cancer staging were compared by using the McNemar test.Primary tumors (n = 123 patients) were correctly staged in 101 (82%) patients at PET/CT and in 106 (86%) patients at whole-body MR imaging (P = .263). N stages (n = 150 patients) were correctly determined in 105 (70%) patients at PET/CT and in 102 (68%) patients at whole-body MR imaging (P = .880). Thirty-one (20%) of 154 patients had metastatic lesions. Accuracy for detecting metastases was 86% (133 of 154 patients) at PET/CT, and that at whole-body MR imaging was 86% (132 of 154 patients) (P > .99). Although the differences were not statistically significant, whole-body MR imaging was more useful for detecting brain and hepatic metastases, whereas PET/CT was more useful for detecting lymph node and soft-tissue metastases.Both PET/CT and 3.0-T whole-body MR imaging appear to provide acceptable accuracy and comparable efficacy for NSCLC staging, but for M-stage determination, each modality has its own advantages.Advantages of diffusion-weighted imaging over positron emission tomography-computed tomography in assessment of hilar and mediastinal lymph node in lung cancer.The significance of diffusion-weighted imaging (DWI) is uncertain for the diagnosis of nodal involvement. The purpose of this study was to examine diagnostic capability of DWI compared with PET-CT for nodal involvement of lung cancer.A total of 160 lung cancers (114 adenocarcinomas, 36 squamous cell carcinomas, and 10 other cell types) were analyzed in this study. DWI and PET-CT were performed preoperatively.The optimal cutoff values to diagnose metastatic lymph nodes were 1.70 × 10(-3) mm(2)/s for ADC value and 4.45 for SUVmax. DWI correctly diagnosed N staging in 144 carcinomas (90 %) but incorrectly diagnosed N staging in 16 (10 %) [3 (1.9 %) had overstaging, 13 (8.1 %) had understaging]. PET-CT correctly diagnosed N staging in 133 carcinomas (83.1 %) but incorrectly diagnosed N staging in 27 (16.8 %) [4 (2.5 %) had overstaging, 23 (14.4 %) had understaging]. Sensitivity, accuracy, and negative predictive value for N staging by DWI were significantly higher than those by PET-CT. Of the 705 lymph node stations examined, 61 had metastases, and 644 did not. The maximum diameter of metastatic lesions in lymph nodes were 3.0 ± 0.9 mm in 21 lymph node stations not detected by either DWI or PET-CT: 7.2 ± 4.1 mm in 39 detected by DWI, and 11.9 ± 4.1 mm in 24 detected by PET-CT. There were significant differences among them. The sensitivity (63.9 %) for metastatic lymph node stations by DWI was significantly higher than that (39.3 %) by PET-CT. The accuracy (96.2 %) for all lymph node stations by DWI was significantly higher than that (94.3 %) by PET-CT.DWI has advantages over PET-CT in diagnosing malignant from benign lymph nodes of lung cancers.Is there any maximum standardized uptake value variation among positron emission tomography scanners for mediastinal staging in non-small cell lung cancer?The maximum standardized uptake value (SUV(max)) varies among positron emission tomography-integrated computed tomography (PET/CT) centers in the staging of non-small cell lung cancer. We evaluated the ratio of the optimum SUV(max) cut-off for the lymph nodes to the median SUV(max) of the primary tumor (ratioSUV(max)) to determine SUV(max) variations between PET/CT scanners. The previously described PET predictive ratio (PPR) was also evaluated. PET/CT and mediastinoscopy and/or thoracotomy were performed on 337 consecutive patients between September 2005 and March 2009. Thirty-six patients were excluded from the study. The pathological results were correlated with the PET/CT findings. Histopathological examination was performed on 1136 N2 lymph nodes using 10 different PET/CT centers. The majority of patients (group A: 240) used the same PET/CT scanner at four different centers. Others patients were categorized as group B. The ratioSUV(max) for groups A and B was 0.18 and 0.22, respectively. The same ratio for centers 1, 2, 3 and 4 was 0.2, 0.21, 0.21, and 0.23, respectively. The optimal cut-off value of the PPR to predict mediastinal lymph node pathology for malignancy was 0.49 (likelihood ratio +2.02; sensitivity 70%, specificity 65%). We conclude that the ratioSUV(max) was similar for different scanners. Thus, SUV(max) is a valuable cut-off for comparing-centers.Node/aorta and node/liver SUV ratios from (18)F-FDG PET/CT may improve the detection of occult mediastinal lymph node metastases in patients with non-small cell lung carcinoma.Research suggests that the semiquantitative determination of nodal (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) uptake on positron emission tomography (PET)/computed tomography (CT) may be useful for the assessment of mediastinal metastases in patients with non-small-cell lung carcinoma (NSCLC). The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic ability of using different standardized uptake value (SUV) parameters in the detection of ipsilateral mediastinal (N2) disease.A total of 102 patients newly diagnosed with non-small-cell lung carcinoma who underwent (18)F-FDG PET/CT before surgery and had not received prior therapy were retrospectively included. All patients underwent surgical resection of the primary tumor and mediastinal lymph node dissection. On a station-based analysis, different SUV parameters (eg, mediastinal lymph node SUV, node/aorta SUV ratio, and node/liver SUV ratio) were evaluated using the histopathologic results as the reference standard. The optimal cutoff value for each SUV parameter was determined with receiver-operating characteristic curve analysis.The areas under the receiver-operating characteristic curves were 0.674, 0.693, and 0.715 for node SUV, node/aorta SUV ratio, and node/liver SUV ratio, respectively (P < .05). With cutoff values of 3.15, 1.37, and 1.02 for node SUV, node/aorta SUV ratio, and node/liver SUV ratio, respectively, the sensitivity of (18)F-FDG PET/CT for N2 staging was 57.1%, 85.7%, and 71.4%, and specificity was 74.2%, 50.5%, and 61.9%.Compared to node SUV alone, the use of node/aorta and node/liver SUV ratios resulted in improved detection of N2 metastases. The two SUV parameters may potentially improve the diagnostic accuracy of (18)F-FDG PET/CT for the diagnosis of N2 disease in patients with non-small-cell lung carcinoma.Positron emission tomography-computed tomography compared with invasive mediastinal staging in non-small cell lung cancer: results of mediastinal staging in the early lung positron emission tomography trial.Patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) require careful preoperative staging to define resectability for potential cure. Fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography combined with computed tomography (FDG PET-CT) is widely used to stage NSCLC. If the mediastinum is positive on PET-CT examination, some practitioners conclude that the patient is inoperable and refer the patient for nonsurgical treatment.In this analysis of a previously reported trial comparing PET-CT with conventional imaging in the diagnostic work-up of patients with clinical stage I, II, or IIIA NSCLC, we determined the accuracy of PET-CT in mediastinal staging compared with invasive mediastinal staging either by mediastinoscopy alone or by mediastinoscopy combined with thoracotomy.All 149 patients had mediastinal nodal staging at mediastinoscopy alone (14), thoracotomy alone (64), or both (71). The sensitivity of PET-CT was 70% (95% confidence interval [CI], 48-85%), and specificity was 94% (95% CI, 88-97%). Of 22 patients with a PET-CT interpreted as positive for mediastinal nodes, 8 did not have tumor. The positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 64% (95% CI, 43-80%) and 95% (95% CI, 90-98%), respectively. Based on PET-CT alone, eight patients would have been denied potentially curative surgery if the mediastinal abnormalities detected by PET-CT had not been evaluated with an invasive mediastinal procedure.PET-CT assessment of the mediastinum is associated with a clinically relevant false-positive rate. Our study confirms the need for pathologic confirmation of mediastinal lymph node abnormalities detected by PET-CT.Stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer: preoperative mediastinal nodal staging with integrated FDG PET/CT--a prospective study.To prospectively evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of integrated fluorine 18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) positron emission tomography (PET) and computed tomography (CT) (PET/CT) for the preoperative diagnosis of mediastinal nodal metastasis in stage T1 non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), with surgical and histologic results as reference standards.Institutional review board approval and informed consent were obtained. From June 2003 to February 2005, 150 patients (89 men and 61 women; mean age, 59 years) with stage T1 NSCLC at stand-alone CT underwent integrated PET/CT and surgical staging. Two observers (one radiologist and one nuclear medicine physician) evaluated prospectively and in consensus the mediastinal nodes by analyzing both PET (functional) and CT (anatomic) images. Nodal stages were determined by using the American Joint Committee on Cancer staging system and surgical and histologic findings as the reference standard. Statistical evaluation of malignant lymph nodes was performed on per-nodal-station and per-person bases.A total of 568 mediastinal nodal stations were evaluated. Nodes were positive for malignancy in 34 (23%) of 150 patients and 55 (10%) of 568 nodal stations. For depiction of malignant nodes, the respective sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of integrated PET/CT were 42% (23 of 55), 100% (513 of 513), 100% (23 of 23), 94% (513 of 545), and 94% (536 of 568) on per-nodal-station basis and 47% (16 of 34), 100% (116 of 116), 100% (16 of 16), 87% (116 of 134), and 88% (132 of 150) on a per-patient basis.Integrated FDG PET/CT provides high specificity and positive predictive value of mediastinal nodal staging in stage T1 NSCLC, although the sensitivity is low.Ratio of the maximum standardized uptake value on FDG-PET of the mediastinal (N2) lymph nodes to the primary tumor may be a universal predictor of nodal malignancy in patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer.The maximum standardized uptake value (maxSUV) on F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) scan of mediastinal (N2) lymph nodes may predict pathology in patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer. However, the maxSUV varies among PET scanners. Thus, we evaluated the ratio of the maxSUV of the lymph node to the primary tumor at different centers to determine whether it was a universal predictor of lymph node malignancy.This is a retrospective review of a prospective database. Patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer, a dedicated FDG-PET with the maxSUV of the primary lung tumor and FDG-avid mediastinal (N2) nodes reported (before therapy), and who underwent lymph node removal were eligible.There were 239 patients with 335 FDG-PET-positive N2 nodes at 14 different PET centers. The median ratio of the maxSUV of the lymph node to the maxSUV of the primary tumor of the pathologically proven malignant nodes was 0.58 (range, 0.32 to 1.61). Benign nodes had a median ratio of 0.40 (range, 0.21 to 1.10, p = 0.02). The median value was similar for all centers except one. Receiver operating characteristics analysis determined the optimal value of the ratio that maximized sensitivity to be 0.56 or greater (+LR 6.6, sensitivity 94%, specificity 72%).The ratio of the maxSUV of the mediastinal (N2) lymph node to the maxSUV of the primary tumor in patients with nonsmall-cell lung cancer predicts mediastinal nodal pathology across different PET centers. When the ratio is 0.56 or greater, there is a 94% chance that the node is malignant. The ratio may take into account the different techniques used at different centers.18F-FDG PET/CT in mediastinal lymph node staging of non-small-cell lung cancer in a tuberculosis-endemic country: consideration of lymph node calcification and distribution pattern to improve specificity.The aim of the study was to assess the accuracy of (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET/CT in mediastinal lymph node staging of patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) in a region with a high prevalence of granulomatous disease.Between March 2004 and February 2006, all patients with NSCLC underwent FDG PET/CT and contrast-enhanced thoracic CT, and subsequent surgical resection. PET/CT and contrast-enhanced CT images of 182 patients (126 men and 56 women; mean age 60.7 years) with NSCLC were acquired. Mediastinal node staging was determined using the American Joint Committee on Cancer (AJCC) staging system. Surgical and histological findings served as the reference standard.A total of 182 patients with 778 mediastinal node stations were evaluated. Sensitivity and specificity of contrast-enhanced CT were 36% and 80% on a per-patient basis and 23% and 92% on a per-node station basis. Sensitivity and specificity of PET/CT were 81% and 73% on a per-patient basis and 75% and 85% on a per-node station basis. After lymph nodes with calcification and bilateral hilar distribution were considered benign, sensitivity and specificity of PET/CT were 75% and 89% on a per-patient basis and 66% and 96% on a per-node station basis.This prospective study suggests that FDG PET/CT can more accurately stage mediastinal lymph nodes than CT. Considering lymph node calcification and distribution pattern could improve specificity at the cost of a decrease in sensitivity.Integrated fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG) PET/CT compared to standard contrast-enhanced CT for characterization and staging of pulmonary tumors eligible for surgical resection.Accurate staging is necessary to determine the appropriate therapy in patients with lung cancer. Few studies have compared integrated fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose (18F-FDG) positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) and contrast-enhanced CT in the characterization and staging of pulmonary tumors considered eligible for surgical resection.To compare 18F-FDG PET/CT with standard contrast-enhanced CT for the diagnosis and staging of lung neoplasms eligible for surgical resection.Seventy-six consecutive patients (56 male, 20 female; mean age+/-SD, 63.4+/-20 years) with 84 pulmonary tumors suspected for malignancy and considered eligible for surgical resection were prospectively enrolled. Seventy-three malignant (65 non-small-cell lung carcinomas, one small-cell lung cancer, two carcinoids, and five metastases) and 11 benign lung tumors (three hamartomas, two sarcoidosis, one amyloidosis, one Wegener granulomatosis, one tuberculosis, and three areas of scarring) were finally diagnosed by histology. Tumor staging was based on the revised American Joint Committee on Cancer.In lesion characterization, the sensitivity and specificity of 18F-FDG PET/CT versus contrast-enhanced CT were 90% vs. 83% and 18% vs. 63% (P<0.05, McNemar test), respectively. In nodal staging, the sensitivity and specificity of 18F-FDG PET/CT versus contrast-enhanced CT were 78% vs. 46% and 80% vs. 93% (P<0.05), respectively.In patients with lung neoplasms considered eligible for surgical resection, (18)F-FDG PET/CT versus contrast-enhanced CT revealed higher sensitivity in nodal staging, but lower specificity both in lesion characterization and nodal staging.Effect of PET/CT on management of patients with non-small cell lung cancer: results of a prospective study with 5-year survival data.We investigated the incremental management impact and prognostic value of staging with (18)F-FDG PET/CT in patients with non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) being considered for potentially curative therapies.Information on 168 consecutive patients with NSCLC being considered for surgery or definitive radiotherapy with curative intent before PET/CT was entered into a prospective database. The pre-PET/CT management plan, based on conventional imaging (conventional CT, appropriately supplemented by bone scintigraphy or other modalities), was defined prospectively by referring clinicians before PET/CT results became available. After PET/CT, actual clinical management was recorded, and patients were followed up until 5 y or death. The appropriateness of PET/CT management plans was assessed by biopsy when available, clinical follow-up, and survival analysis.Stage was discordant on PET/CT and conventional imaging in 50.6% of patients (41.1% upstaged, 9.5% downstaged), with high management impact (change in treatment modality or curative intent) in 42.3% of patients. Both conventional imaging stage and PET/CT stage were strongly predictive of overall survival (OS) but there were greater differences between hazard rates and separations in the OS curves for stage groupings determined using PET/CT. OS was also strongly predicted by PET/CT-directed choice of therapy (P < 0.0001).PET/CT frequently affects patient management and strongly predicts OS in NSCLC, supporting the appropriateness of such changes.The validity of preoperative lymph node staging guidelines of European Society of Thoracic Surgeons in non-small-cell lung cancer patients.The European Society of Thoracic Surgeons (ESTS) has proposed preoperative lymph-node staging guidelines (LNSGs) for non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC) based on the introduction of new staging modalities into clinical practice. The validity of these guidelines was assessed.Among the patients (n=185) with histologically confirmed NSCLC diagnosed between 2007 and 2009, who were suitable for thoracotomy, the 168 who underwent computed tomography (CT) of the chest and CT-integrated positron emission tomography (PET-CT) were included in the study. The preoperative mediastinal stage was confirmed by mediastinoscopy in all patients. A thoracotomy was done for mediastinoscopy-negative patients. The mediastinal staging results were adapted to the ESTS-LNSG (direct thoracotomy for T1-2 N0 tumour according to CT and PET-CT and invasive staging for others) and the validity of the guidelines was tested.In this series, the overall mediastinal lymph-node metastasis (MLNM) prevalence was 29.2%. If the guidelines had been applied, thoracotomy without invasive mediastinal staging would have been done in only 11 (6.5%) patients, and no MLNM would have been detected. Mediastinoscopy would have been performed in 157 patients and MLNM would have been found in 41 (26%). In the 116 mediastinoscopy-negative patients, MLNM would have been detected after thoracotomy in an additional eight patients. Thus, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the guidelines were calculated as 84%, 100%, 100% and 94%, respectively.The preoperative LNSGs for NSCLC proposed by the ESTS are effective.Application of endobronchial ultrasound-guided transbronchial needle aspiration following integrated PET/CT in mediastinal staging of potentially operable non-small cell lung cancer.The role of endobronchial ultrasound-guided transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) following integrated PET/CT scanning in mediastinal staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) has not been assessed.We prospectively evaluated the diagnostic values of PET/CT scanning and EBUS-TBNA for mediastinal staging in 117 patients with potentially operable NSCLC with accessible mediastinal lymph nodes (diameter range, 5 to 20 mm) by EBUS-TBNA. Subgroup analysis according to histologic type was performed.Of 30 cases of mediastinal metastasis, 27 were confirmed by EBUS-TBNA and 3 were confirmed by surgery. EBUS-TBNA results confirmed all cases with true-positive PET/CT scan findings and six of nine cases with false-negative PET/CT scan findings. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value (NPV), and accuracy of EBUS-TBNA in the detection of mediastinal metastasis were 90.0%, 100%, 100%, 96.7%, and 97.4%, respectively. For PET/CT scans, the values were 70.0%, 59.8%, 37.5%, 85.2%, and 62.4%, respectively (p = 0.052; p < 0.001; p < 0.001; p = 0.011; p < 0.001, respectively). In adenocarcinoma (n = 55), EBUS-TBNA detected four of six cases with false-negative PET/CT scan findings, and the NPV was higher for EBUS-TBNA than for PET/CT scans (94.6% vs 77.8%, respectively; p = 0.044). In squamous cell carcinoma (n = 53), the NPV of EBUS-TBNA and PET/CT scans were similarly high (97.9% vs 96.3%, respectively; p = 0.689).EBUS-TBNA was an effective invasive method following PET/CT scanning in the mediastinal staging of potentially operable NSCLC. In mediastinal PET/CT scan-positive cases, EBUS-TBNA was an excellent tool for detecting mediastinal metastasis. Even in mediastinal PET/CT scan-negative cases, EBUS-TBNA can be useful for confirming mediastinal metastases, especially in adenocarcinoma.Mediastinal lymph nodes staging by 18F-FDG PET/CT for early stage non-small cell lung cancer: a multicenter study.Accurate staging of mediastinal lymph nodes metastases is critical for determining the application of stereotactic body radiation therapy (SBRT) for patients with early stage non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC). In this multicenter study the accuracy of (18)F-FDG PET/CT to detect lymph node metastases was evaluated for early stage NSCLC.The data from the patients with stage1 NSCLC who received preoperative (18)F-FDG PET/CT staging and radical surgery was retrospectively reviewed of five centers from February 2004 to August 2010. The lymph node metastases were confirmed histopathologically after radical surgery. And the sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) were calculated for PET/CT staging.Two hundred patients were enrolled. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, PPV and NPV for lymph node metastases on PET/CT were 44%, 83%, 78%, 29% and 91%, respectively. There were eight and 19 cases positive for lymph node metastases with central (n=62) and peripheral (n=138) NSCLC (P>0.05), respectively.(18)F-FDG PET/CT was specific in N(0) staging for T(1-2) NSCLC. The NPV was about 91% in clinical N(0) patients, suggested that (18)F-FDG PET/CT may help to accurately stage N(0) patients and thus identify patients for SBRT.Accuracy of 18F-FDG PET/CT for lymph node staging in non-small-cell lung cancers.This retrospective study evaluated the diagnostic accuracy of 2-(F18)-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose-positron emission tomography ((18)F-FDG-PET)/computed tomography (PET/CT) in the preoperative diagnosis of metastatic mediastinal and hilar lymph node in patients with non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC).A total of 39 patients received preoperative (18)F-FDG PET/CT and the postoperative biopsy. We compared preoperative PET/CT scan results with corresponding intraoperative histopathalogic findings in 39 NSCLC patients. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive and negative predictive value of (18)F-FDG PET/CT were assessed.Histopathologic examination confirmed metastasis in 57 out of the 208 excised lymph nodes; 23 of the 57 nodes were mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes. The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value and negative predictive value of PET/CT in the preoperative diagnosis of mediastinal lymph node metastasis in NSCLC patients were 65%, 96.8%, 92%, 78.5% and 90%, respectively.PET/CT scan showed good accuracy in the preoperative diagnosis of mediastinal and hilar lymph node metastasis in the patients with NSCLC. We recommend that PET/CT scanning be used as a first-line evaluation tool for tumor diagnosis, therapy evaluation and follow-up.Combined endobronchial and endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration for mediastinal nodal staging of lung cancer.Recently, transesophageal endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) has been evaluated for mediastinal nodal staging (N staging) of lung cancer, as this technique is less invasive than mediastinoscopy and possibly more accurate than 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography with computed tomography (PET-CT). However, EUS-FNA does not provide access to pretracheal and hilar lymph nodes. More recently, endobronchial ultrasound-guided transbronchial needle aspiration (EBUS-TBNA) has been introduced as a novel technique for accessing pretracheal and hilar lymph nodes. Although the combined endoscopic approach of EUS-FNA and EBUS-TBNA is presumably more accurate than PET-CT, only a few reports have quantitatively evaluated its diagnostic ability. Therefore, we prospectively assessed the diagnostic yield of this combined endoscopic approach for mediastinal N staging of lung cancer.A consecutive series of 120 patients with suspected resectable lung cancer on CT findings underwent PET-CT and combined EUS-FNA/EBUS-TBNA. The accuracy and other diagnostic indices of the combined approach in mediastinal N staging were compared with those of PET-CT.Among the enrolled patients, a final pathological N stage was established in 110 patients. The accuracy of the combined approach using EUS-FNA and EBUS-TBNA was significantly higher than that of PET-CT (90.0 % vs. 73.6 %; P < 0.0001). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were respectively 71.8 %, 100 %, 100 %, and 86.6 % for the combined approach vs. 47.4 %, 87.5 %, 66.7 %, and 75.9 % for PET-CT.The combined endoscopic approach using EUS-FNA and EBUS-TBNA provided excellent diagnostic performance. Therefore, this approach is strongly recommended before surgery or mediastinoscopy to avoid futile thoracotomy and surgical intervention.Pulmonary lesion assessment: comparison of whole-body hybrid MR/PET and PET/CT imaging--pilot study.To compare the performance of magnetic resonance (MR)/positron emission tomography (PET) imaging in the staging of lung cancer with that of PET/computed tomography (CT) as the reference standard and to compare the quantification accuracy of a new whole-body MR/PET system with corresponding PET/CT data sets.Institutional review board approval and informed consent were obtained. Ten patients in whom bronchial carcinoma was proven or clinically suspected underwent clinically indicated fluorine 18 fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET/CT and, immediately thereafter, whole-body MR/PET imaging with a new hybrid whole-body system (3.0-T MR imager with integrated PET system). Attenuation correction of MR/PET images was segmentation based with fat-water separation. Tumor-to-liver ratios were calculated and compared between PET/CT and MR/PET imaging. Tumor staging on the basis of the PET/CT and MR/PET studies was performed by two readers. Spearman rank correlation was used for comparison of data.MR/PET imaging provided diagnostic image quality in all patients, with good tumor delineation. Most lesions (nine of 10) showed pronounced FDG uptake. One lesion was morphologically suspicious for malignancy at CT and MR imaging but showed no FDG uptake. MR/PET imaging had higher mean tumor-to-liver ratios than did PET/CT (4.4 ± 2.0 [standard deviation] for PET/CT vs 8.0 ± 3.9 for MR/PET imaging). Significant correlation regarding the tumor-to-liver ratio was found between both imaging units (ρ = 0.93; P < .001). Identical TNM scores based on MR/PET and PET/CT data were found in seven of 10 patients. Differences in T and/or N staging occurred mainly owing to modality-inherent differences in lesion size measurement.MR/PET imaging of the lung is feasible and provides diagnostic image quality in the assessment of pulmonary masses. Similar lesion characterization and tumor stage were found in comparing PET/CT and MR/PET images in most patients.Accuracy and predictive features of FDG-PET/CT and CT for diagnosis of lymph node metastasis of T1 non-small-cell lung cancer manifesting as a subsolid nodule.To retrospectively evaluate the diagnostic accuracy and predictive features of F-18 fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography/ computed tomography (FDG-PET/CT) and CT in lymph node (LN) staging of T1 non-small-cell lung cancers (NSCLCs) manifesting as subsolid nodules.From January 2005 to May 2011, 160 patients with pathologically proven T1 subsolid NSCLCs with LN staging were included in this study. Diagnostic accuracies of FDG-PET/CT and CT for LN staging were evaluated. Maximum standardised uptake value (SUVmax) and CT features of primary tumours were evaluated to investigate predictive factors for LN metastasis.LN metastases were found in nine of the 160 patients (5.6%). No LN metastasis was present in patients with a solid proportion ≤50%. Sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of FDG-PET/CT for LN staging on a per-patient basis were 11.1%, 86.1% and 81.9%; those of CT were 11.1%, 96.7% and 91.9%. Among patients with a solid proportion >50%, there were significant differences in SUVmax, solid portion size, solid proportion and lesion location between patients with and without LN metastasis. Multivariate analysis revealed that higher SUVmax, a larger solid proportion and central location were independent predictors of LN metastasis.FDG-PET/CT adds little value to CT in the lymph node staging of T1 subsolid NSCLCs.Lymph node (LN) metastases are important in non-small-cell lung cancer (NSCLC). • Positron emission tomography (PET) helps to stage solid NSCLCs. • FDG-PET/CT adds little to the LN staging of T1 subsolid NSCLCs. • No LN metastasis in patients with a solid proportion ≤50%. • LN metastasis is more common in solid and/or centrally sited tumours.Is palpation of the nonresected pulmonary lobe(s) required for patients with non-small cell lung cancer? A prospective study.Video-assisted lobectomy is an increasingly used technique to treat patients with non-small cell lung cancer but it does not usually afford lung palpation.A prospective study was conducted on patients with tumors amenable to video-assisted lobectomy (noncentral lesion and <5 cm) who underwent open lobectomy via thoracotomy. All patients underwent 64-slice helical computed tomographic scan with intravenous contrast at 5-mm intervals and had integrated 2-deoxy-2-18F-fluoro-D-glucose positron emission tomography computed tomography 30 days or less before thoracotomy. Unsuspected malignant pulmonary nodules that were palpated and removed (from a different lobe than the one resected) and that were not imaged preoperatively were defined as cancer that would have been missed by video-assisted lobectomy.From January 2006 to February 2007, 166 patients had non-small cell lesions that were resected via thoracotomy, despite being amenable to video-assisted surgery, by one surgeon. Thirty-seven (22%) patients had pulmonary nodules that probably would have been missed by video-assisted lobectomy; 14 (8.4%) of these nodules were malignant. These were unsuspected M1 pulmonary lesions in 9 patients and unsuspected different types of primary non-small cell lung cancers in 5 patients. All missed lesions were less than 6 mm and in different lobes from the one resected. Nine (64%) of these 14 patients' primary known lesions were pathologic T1 lesions. Nine patients received adjuvant chemotherapy because of these unsuspected M1 nodules.Open lobectomy that affords palpation of the rest of the lung may discover nonimaged malignant pulmonary nodules in different lobes in 8% to 9% of patients with non-small cell lung cancer despite preoperative fine-cut chest computed tomographic scan with contrast and integrated integrated 2-deoxy-2-18F-fluoro-D-glucose positron emission tomography computed tomographic scanning. The clinical impact of these findings is unknown.Significance of PET/CT in determining actual TNM staging for patients with various lung cancers.We investigated the difference in TNM stage of lung cancer provided by PET/CT (combining positron emission tomography and computed tomography) as compared with TNM stage obtained with conventional imaging studies (CI) with contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) with iron contrast media. Sixty-seven cases of lung cancer were included in this study. Overall, the rate of correction of TNM staging was 70.1% after PET/CT. The correction rate for each factor was 32.8% in T, 37.3% in N, and 37.3% in M. High rates of correction were observed in small cell lung cancer (SCLC), with 75% (6/8 cases) obtained by PET/CT. When SCLCs were divided into limited disease (n = 6) involving 1 hemithorax, including mediastinal and contralateral hilar lymph nodes, and others (extensive disease, n = 2), the correction rate was as high as 80% for limited disease. In conclusion, PET/CT can provide actual TNM staging and recognition for oncologists in staging, which would not mislead to selection of inadequate subsequent treatment.The effectiveness of 18F-FDG PET/CT combined with STIR MRI for diagnosing nodal involvement in the thorax.The purpose of this study was to compare the efficacy of short-tau inversion-recovery (STIR) MRI and 18F-FDG PET/CT for the detection of metastasis in mediastinal and hilar lymph nodes in patients with lung cancer.Ninety-three patients with known or suspected lung cancer with mediastinal and hilar lymph node swelling underwent STIR MRI and 18F-FDG PET/CT examinations. STIR MRI scans were obtained with a 2% copper sulfate phantom placed along the back of each patient, with the lymph node-to-phantom ratio calculated for quantitative analysis. For qualitative analysis, the results of all STIR MRI scans were evaluated using a 5-point visual scoring system. To evaluate the diagnostic capabilities of STIR MRI and 18F-FDG PET/CT, we used receiver-operating-characteristic curve analysis to determine the optimal thresholds for the lymph node-to-phantom ratio, visual score, and maximal standardized uptake value. Further, the capability of each to determine N-stage was compared in each patient using the McNemar test.A total of 137 lymph nodes (82 malignant lesions, 55 benign lesions) were analyzed. When optimal threshold values were adopted, the quantitative and qualitative sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of STIR MRI were not significantly different from those of 18F-FDG PET/CT. However, 18F-FDG PET/CT in combination with qualitative STIR MRI analysis had a significantly higher capability to detect nodal involvement on an individual-patient basis (96.9% specificity, 90.3% accuracy) than did 18F-FDG PET/CT alone (65.6% specificity, 81.7% accuracy).We found that the diagnostic capability of STIR MRI was not significantly different from that of 18F-FDG PET/CT. However, when those methods were combined, the diagnostic capability for N-staging was significantly improved.Positron-emission tomography for lung cancer in a tuberculosis-endemic region.A potential limitation of integrated positron-emission tomography and computed tomography in non-small-cell lung cancer may be false-positive results due to granulomatous disease. This retrospective study examined the accuracy of this imaging modality for mediastinal nodal staging of non-small-cell lung cancer in Hong Kong where tuberculosis remains endemic. There were 249 lymph node stations evaluated in 107 patients, of whom 38 (36%) had active tuberculosis or evidence of previous tuberculosis. Imaging results were compared with histological findings. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of integrated imaging for mediastinal nodal staging were 52%, 86%, and 80%, respectively; the overall positive-predictive value for mediastinal nodal metastasis was 46%, and the overall negative-predictive value was 89%. The positive-predictive value for mediastinal nodal metastasis was 39% in patients with tuberculosis and 50% in controls; the negative-predictive value was high in both groups (92% and 87%). The likelihood ratio for true positives was 6.47 in patients with tuberculosis vs. 10.97 in controls. This suggests that the reliability of positron-emission/computed tomography may be substantially poorer in patients with tuberculosis. Histological confirmation should be considered mandatory in patients with suspected metastasis on integrated imaging.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography and whole-body magnetic resonance imaging in staging of advanced nonsmall cell lung cancer--initial results.To evaluate and compare positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) with whole-body magnetic resonance imaging (wbMRI) in the correct staging of patients with advanced nonsmall cell lung cancer (NSCLC).Fifty-two patients with an NSCLC stage IIIa or IIIb (36 males and 16 females) were included in this study. Patients were referred to our department for restaging. Within 1 week PET/CT and wbMRI were performed in all patients. Images were examined independently by 2 experienced physicians from the Department of Nuclear Medicine and Radiology. Afterward, consensus reading was performed. In 22 patients, surgery served as gold standard, whereas in 30 patients, follow-up controls (after 2 months) were performed.The use of wbMRI correctly T-staged all patients. Especially volume interpolated breathhold examination sequence correctly T-staged all tumors. PET/CT did not correctly stage chest wall infiltration in 4 cases [sensitivity 92.3% (P < 0.05 to wbMRI)/specificity 100%], verified by surgery. PET/CT correctly N-staged 51 patients (sensitivity 96.1%/specificity 100%). WbMRI showed a significant tendency to understage N-status [sensitivity 88.5% (P < 0.05)/specificity 96.1%]. Different N-status by PET/CT changed operability in 4 patients. In 2 patients, distant metastases were detected by both techniques.In the correct staging of advanced NSCLC, PET/CT has advantages in N-staging. This is of high relevance for therapy planning. WbMRI especially using volume interpolated breathhold examination sequences, has certain advantages in T-staging.[Comparison between PET(-FDG) and computed tomography in the staging of lung cancer. Consequences for operability in 94 patients].Lung cancer, a major application of FDG/PET-CT, has recently been introduced in daily practice in France. The authors retrospectively studied its impact on the management of this disease.The results of PET-CT and conventional assessment (brain imaging, chest and abdominal CT and possibly bone scintigraphy) were compared in 94 patients, referred for the staging of non-small cell lung cancer, or the assessment of a solitary lung lesion. The impact of thoracic lymph node involvement on the operability of patients was studied in 44 patients.PET-CT revealed metastases in 20% of the patients without metastases found by conventional imaging and modified the stage of the disease in 28% of the cases. It changed the indication of surgical treatment in 19% of the cases and led to induction chemotherapy in two patients. In addition, two synchronous cancers were discovered. Regarding lymph node involvement, PET-CT remains of diagnostic value regardless of the scanner results.The impact of PET-CT in assessing non-small cell lung cancer was confirmed in the authors' practice. Its interest and the consequences in some patients misclassified with conventional assessment have been demonstrated.Contrast enhanced CT versus integrated PET-CT in pre-operative nodal staging of non-small cell lung cancer.The purpose of this study was to retrospectively evaluate the effectiveness of integrated positron emission tomography-computed tomography (PET-CT) in comparison with contrast enhanced CT (CE-CT) in pre-operative staging of non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) by using surgical and pathological findings as the reference standard.From August 2008 to August 2009, 57 consecutive patients (50 males and 7 females; mean age, 59 years; range, 38-79 years) with NSCLC underwent conventional pre-operative lung cancer staging using clinical data and CE-CT of the chest, and integrated whole-body fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose PET-CT studies. Histopathological results served as the reference standard.Forty-eight of the 57 patients (84%) had no lymph node involvement (N0), five (9%) were found to have N1 disease, and four (7%) had N2 disease. There was a significant difference between CE-CT and PET-CT for nodal staging of N0 disease (P < 0.05). Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and accuracy of hilar and mediastinal lymph node staging were 56%, 73%, 28%, 90%, and 70%, with CE-CT, respectively; and 78%, 92%, 64%, 96%, and 89% with PET-CT, respectively.Integrated PET-CT is more accurate than CE-CT for lymph node staging in NSCLC.